Project Gutenberg's The Wonder Island Boys:  The Tribesmen, by Roger Finlay

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: The Wonder Island Boys:  The Tribesmen

Author: Roger Finlay

Release Date: March 6, 2007 [EBook #20753]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK WONDER ISLAND BOYS ***




Produced by Joe Longo and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net











              THE WONDER ISLAND BOYS

                BY ROGER T. FINLAY

Thrilling adventures by sea and land of two boys and an aged Professor
who are cast away on an island with absolutely nothing but their
clothing. By gradual and natural stages they succeed in constructing all
forms of devices used in the mechanical arts and learn the scientific
theories involved in every walk of life. These subjects are all treated
in an incidental and natural way in the progress of events, from the
most fundamental standpoint without technicalities, and include every
department of knowledge. Numerous illustrations accompany the text.

Two thousand things every boy ought to know. Every page
           a romance. Every line a fact.

         *       *       *       *       *

         _Six titles--60 cents per volume_

         *       *       *       *       *

              THE WONDER ISLAND BOYS
                  The Castaways

              THE WONDER ISLAND BOYS
               Exploring the Island

              THE WONDER ISLAND BOYS
            The Mysteries of the Caverns

              THE WONDER ISLAND BOYS
                  The Tribesmen

              THE WONDER ISLAND BOYS
              The Capture and Pursuit

              THE WONDER ISLAND BOYS
            The Conquest of the Savages

                    PUBLISHED BY
             THE NEW YORK BOOK COMPANY
           147 Fourth Avenue      New York



              THE WONDER ISLAND BOYS

         *       *       *       *       *

                  THE TRIBESMEN

[Illustration: "_He poised his spear as he raised himself out of the
water_" [See p. 144]]



              THE WONDER ISLAND BOYS

                  THE TRIBESMEN

                       BY
                 ROGER T. FINLAY

                  ILLUSTRATED

                 [Illustration]

             THE NEW YORK BOOK COMPANY
                    NEW YORK


               COPYRIGHT, 1914, BY

            THE NEW YORK BOOK COMPANY



CONTENTS



I. THE FIRST OF THE TRIBESMEN

     The first view of the savages. Excitement in their camp. The
     story of the boys. What they had accomplished. Their home at
     the Cataract. The fifth expedition. In the savages' country.
     Some of the mysterious events. "Angel" one of the party. The
     dense forest. The fight between the two tribes. Going closer
     to the battle ground. The wagon as a means of defense. Taking
     position on the shore of a stream. The defeated party
     retreating toward the wagon. Close view of the natives. The
     defeated tribe taking up position behind the wagon. The
     victorious party attacking the wagon. Repelling the charge.
     The fight witnessed by the defeated tribe.

II. TWO SAVAGE ATTACKS

     Their two foes. Preparing for the night. Poisoned arrows.
     Clearing away the brush. Angel restless during the night.
     John's adventure as a scout. The shot in the darkness. The
     result. John's second scouting expedition. Return of the
     warriors. The arrow and the cap. The reappearance. The volley.
     The slain warriors. The trophies. The different headdresses.
     How tribes are distinguished. Determine to go forward.
     Trinkets of civilized people found on the battlefield. Camp
     the second night. Angel discerns the approach of a band. The
     Professor tries to establish communications. Failure. A
     position of defense. The attack and repulse. The second
     volley. Charging the savages. Capture of a wounded chief and a
     warrior. Treating the wounds. The chief advising his men not
     to attack.

III. A THIRD ATTACKING TRIBE

     Difficulty in communicating with the chief. Examining the
     chief's pockets. Finding a photograph of George and Harry.
     Hunting the pockets of the slain warriors. The match box.
     John's startled look. The monogram. Human hair. Its part in
     ornamentation. Scalps. Customs connected with human hair.
     Going forward. Surrounded by the warriors. The running fight.
     The yaks beyond control. The flight. The savages trying to
     outflank them. Warriors on all sides. The river in sight. A
     tributary to the West River. Getting the yaks under control.
     The wounded animals. Heading for a peninsula. The mute
     captive. The siege. Instilling fear. Learning the chief did
     not belong to the attacking party. Consternation on
     discovering that the attacking party did not belong to either
     of the parties who first attacked them.

IV. THE ESCAPE. ENCOUNTERING ANOTHER HOSTILE TRIBE

     War among the natives. John's ability with the gun. Cooped up
     in the peninsula. Recollection in animals. A dual self.
     Memory. No attack during the night. The savage attempt to
     starve them out. Planning to escape. Determine to build a
     raft. John and Harry's night adventure after material.
     Crossing the tributary to the north. Bringing in logs. The
     structure to imitate the wagon. Driving the team into the
     river. Floating the logs under the wagon. Crossing the stream.
     A safe passage. A good retreat. How the ruse affected the
     natives. The amused captive chief. Starting northward. The
     disapproval of the chief. Viewing a fight between tribes.
     Short of ammunition. An unexpected native village. The
     startled warriors. Attacked by the natives.

V. THE RESCUE OF THE CAPTIVE BOYS

     The fight. Defeat of the savages. Charging them through the
     village. The large hut. A cry from within. American boys
     captive. Their own companions. Weak and hungry. Taken to the
     wagon. Their terrible condition. The return of the savages.
     Feeding the famished boys. The second attack. The flanking
     parties. The first volley. Retreating toward the river.
     Followed by the warriors. Outwitting the enemy. Flight of the
     wagon to the hill. A peculiar rock formation. Discovery of a
     cave. Peculiar actions of John and the Professor. Their advice
     to go on. A hurried trip to the river. Arranging the weapon
     for defense. Fearing a night attack.

VI. THE TALE OF THE RESCUED BOYS

     Ralph and Tom. Cast ashore in the north of the island. Meeting
     a band of savages with a captive. Poison berries. Sickness.
     Hunting food. Captured by a tribe of natives. Peculiarities of
     the native headdresses. Taken to the mountains. Escaped.
     Recaptured by another tribe. Sacrificing prisoners. The round
     silver match box. Savage charms. Kindly treated by the second
     tribe. The second escape. Hunting food. Starving. Trying to go
     back to the tribe. The mistake in going to the wrong tribe.
     How boldness saved them. The watch in possession of the chief.
     The initials J. L. V. Treated like brothers. Captured by
     another tribe in a fight. Their last captors.

VII. THE ESCAPE IN THE NIGHT

     John's search in the night. Return. Indicating by signs that
     no savages were in sight. Continuing their flight in the
     night. The course along the bed of the stream. John in the
     advance pushes through the underbrush. By motions indicates
     the possibilities of crossing the river. Finding driftwood.
     The raft. The launching of the wagon. Camping on the opposite
     side. Watching the savages. Deep streams. Shallow water
     courses. Savage strategy. Hunting for food. Coffee and corned
     beef. Woodchuck and pheasants. Discussing the wounded chief.
     Conclude to take him to Cataract. Taking up the march for
     home. Finding the direction of the south pole. The Dog Star
     Sirius.

VIII. THE CATARACT AND ITS MARVELS

     The tramp through the forest. Wonderful effect on the rescued
     boys. New fruit and vegetables. The rubber tree. Carricature
     plant. Sighting Observation Hill. The Old Flag. The change in
     John. Angel happy. The visit of the boys to the shop. The
     rambles about the place. A wonderful stimulus. Angel turning
     the grindstone. Appreciation. The Professor's encomium.
     Rearranging their quarters. Putting up new buildings. The
     barley thief. Making bread. The chief at Cataract. Crutches.
     The novelty to him. Learning to walk. His amazement at the
     workshop. Trying to talk. Threshing barley. The grist mill.
     The home-made violin. Dancing. A religious ceremony. Different
     national customs in dancing.

IX. THE WORK AT THE CATARACT. MAKING WEAPONS.

     Dividing the work. Hunting vegetables. Securing game.
     Cultivating the garden. Making clothing. Footwear. John making
     lasts. Ramie fiber. Preparing more weapons. Angel's new suit.
     New ores and minerals. Cinnabar. Quicksilver. Poisons from
     mercury. The boys' trip to Observation Hill. Angel's gun. The
     talk of the boys. Desire to survey the island. Telling the
     rescued boys their story. Savage traits concerning property.
     Locks. Doing work on holidays. Recreation. The instruments for
     surveying. The boathouse. Chief and the spear. His dexterity.
     How the chief held the spear. The chief and the bolo.

X. UNAWARES IN THE ENEMY'S COUNTRY.

     Observing the heavens. Degrees and what they mean. Angles.
     Calculating position by the stars. The moon as a factor by
     night. The fixed stars in the moon's path. Determine to
     recover the wrecked boat. The boys inaugurate the trip. A
     jolly lark. Through the forest. The alarm in the night. The
     attack of an animal. Missed. Sighting the West River.
     Miscalculation. Discovering their former tracks. In the
     savages' country. The chatter of Angel in the trees. The
     alarm. Savages. Eluding them. Escaping to the north.
     Discovered by the natives. The pursuit.

XI. THE RUSE TO ESCAPE THEIR PURSUERS

     Preparing for defense. Appearance of the savages. The charge.
     Repelling the attack. Driving the team ahead. Harry and Tom as
     rear guards. Harry's injunction to force the team on rapidly.
     The warriors. Turning to the east. Eluding the enemy. The rush
     for the river. Crossing. The savages at the river.
     Reinforcement of the pursuing party. The ruse leaving the
     river. Hiding the wagon. Returning to the river. The two
     warriors swimming the river. Their surprise. Their effort to
     escape. Recognizing the savages as the captors of the boys.
     Consternation in the camp of the enemy. Determining to recross
     the river. The flight to the north. Recrossing. Return home.

XII. THE PROBLEM ABOUT THE CAVE

     Their happy reception at the Cataract. Why their observations
     of the moon led them astray. Distinguishing fixed stars. How
     Angel fought the savages. Individuality. The chief an enigma.
     How he used the grindstone. His interest in machinery. The
     yardstick of the heavens to measure degrees. The Constellation
     Orion. The new calf. Milk and butter. The mysterious visit of
     the chief to the clay banks. Eating clay. Observations by
     Ralph and Tom. The clay eaters of the world. The cave and the
     treasure. The Professor refuses to take a share of it.
     Determination of the boys. Harry and George go to the cave. Go
     back for Ralph and Tom.

XIII. THE ACCIDENT TO JOHN AND THE RESTORATION OF MEMORY

     An island of abundance. Nuts and vegetables. Oils for
     illumination. Unripe fruit. How nature protects her products.
     Eggs. How good and bad are determined. Gases formed within the
     shell. Building an addition to their home. Putting up the new
     building. The accident to John. A terrible wound in the head.
     Chief's solicitude for John. Watching the results of the
     injury. The human traits in the chief. Danger point of the
     fever. The wonderful difference in his eye. Recovers memory. A
     deep sleep. His first words. Aphasia. The brain center. His
     initials J. L. V. on the match safe. Recognizing the chief.

XIV. JOHN'S WONDERFUL STORY

     Native of New England. Ran away to sea. Fortunately fell into
     hands of a humane captain. Became chief clerk. Learned
     navigation. The captain's interest in him. The return. The
     meeting with the captain's daughter. The wedding. Sailing east
     with his wife in the captain's vessel. A plague-infected port.
     Death of his wife. Leaving the accursed port. Death of the
     captain. Disposing of the ship. Travels through India. Enlists
     at Gibraltar. Serves in Matabela campaign. Goes to England. Is
     tutor to a Lord. Goes to Greece. Serves in two campaigns.
     Returns to New York. Enlists for campaign against Indians.
     Five years' service. Goes to Egypt to conduct explorations.
     Returns fever-ridden. Accepts Professorship. Signs as
     Professor in the schoolship _Investigator_. Sickness prevents
     his sailing. Wanders to San Francisco. Engages with friends to
     search South Sea Islands for treasures. Shipwrecked. Finding a
     cave. Captured by savages. Escapes. Meets with an accident.
     Loses all memory.

XV. CHIEF AND THE POISON PLANT

     How John's story impressed them. How the boys entertained John
     with the stories of their adventures. The story of the yaks.
     John tells them how they could have controlled them with the
     different knots and hitches. The spectroscope. Light as a
     medium. The composition of the heavenly bodies. The solar
     spectrum. The boys remember John's story of the cave. His
     story confirming their knowledge about the savages. The
     concert with the flute and violin. Making glass for windows.
     Silver and mercury. Looking-glasses. Amalgam. Making small
     glass mirrors for the inhabitants. The chief's surprise at the
     mirrors. His contribution to the larder. The Amarylla. The
     poison plant. The boys' suspicions of the chief. Good for
     food. Stomach or blood poisons.

XVI. A SURPRISING TRIP TO THE CAVE

     Completion of the house. Furnishing it. The chief recovers
     health. Showing John the message from the lifeboat. "Waters"
     one of his crew. The mystery of the photograph. Information
     that others of the ill-fated _Investigator_ were on the
     island. Reasons why certain tribes sacrificed white captives.
     A new expedition planned. Determine to go overland. Making new
     guns. Ammunition. The boys invite Ralph and Tom to visit the
     cave. The surprise of the boys at the skeletons and the
     treasure. Exploring the cave. A terrific roar. Alarmed.
     Determine to investigate. Finding the Professor and John. The
     surprise party.

XVII. THE WONDERFUL PORTABLE FORT

     The boys ask John about his wonderful cave. The charted
     treasure caves. Seeing the treasure in the cave on the hill
     where the boys were rescued. An occupied cave. The medicine
     men. The two entrances and the cross-shaped interior. How the
     hoards were acquired. Piracy on the high seas. The gold and
     silver of the world. The precious metals taken to Europe by
     the Spaniards. Rushing work on the preparations. The gun
     barrels. Chief showing the boys how to make and use the bows.
     The disappearance of chief. The invention of a portable fort.
     How it was made. Stocking the wagon. Experimenting with the
     fort. Necessity as the mother of invention. The improvements
     in the fort. A new suggestion. Using the fort as a raft.

XVIII. TRAILING A WARRING PARTY OF NATIVES

     Weight and gravity. Acting in all directions. Proving the law
     of universal gravitation. Drilling with the raft equipment.
     Grinding barley flour. Making sleeping mattresses. The bustle
     of final preparations. The good-by to their herd of yaks. The
     march to the falls. John discovers a log in the drift and a
     rope. The dense forest. Crossing the river to the south.
     Finding a camp fire with fresh bones. Numerous traces of
     inhabitants. A glowing fire. Following the trail. Trying to
     catch them before night. Efforts to capture one as a means of
     opening communication. Sighting the camp. Hurried
     consultation. Surrounding the camp of the natives.




LIST OF ILLUSTRATIONS

"He poised his spear as he raised himself out of the water"
                                                       Frontispiece


"The main body of the savages broke for cover, but several,
more venturesome than the rest, sought to carry away
the chief"

"'Come out into the light,' and Harry and George each put
his arms around one of the boys"

"He started back in fright as his own image appeared to him"

The First Boat
The Match Safe
Scene of the Fight on the River
The Wagon Raft
Savage's Hut
Deep Stream
Shallow Stream
Salsify
Rubber
Carricature Plant
Angel, His New Suit and Gun
Poising the Spear
Northern Hemisphere (Stellar Map)
Southern Hemisphere (Stellar Map)
Testing Eggs
Rope Knots
Rope Hitches
The Color Spectrum
Amarylla, Chief's Poison Vegetable
The Portable Fort
Gravitational Pull
Using the Fort as a Raft





THE TRIBESMEN




CHAPTER I

THE FIRST OF THE TRIBESMEN


"They seem to be terribly excited about something, and many of them are
running back and forth," said Harry, from his perch on the wagon top.

George made his way back again in time to see a half dozen of the
savages dart off into the bush to the left. They were from two to three
miles distant when first discovered, so that it was difficult to make
out their movements distinctly.

The Professor could not see them clearly, so that he also took a
position on the top of the wagon. "Do you see any movement to the left
of their camp?"

After gazing a while, Harry answered: "It seems that another party is
coming up." In a moment more he continued: "Yes, and they appear to be
waiting in ambush for them."

George Mayfield and Harry Crandall, together with an aged Professor, had
been wrecked on an island, one year before the opening event in this
chapter. They were attached to a ship training school that met with
disaster in mid-Pacific, and when cast ashore had nothing whatever
except the clothing they wore.

By extraordinary energy they began an investigation of the surroundings
and discovered many things which not only excited their intense
curiosity, but learned that the island was inhabited by one or more
tribes of savages. In this helpless state, with no means of defense, and
compelled to depend on nature for a supply of food and clothing, they
were truly in a pitiful state.

The Professor was a man of profound learning, and knowing that such a
condition must be met in a manner which would enable them to cope with
the situation, gradually turned the attention of the boys to producing
things of use, first making the articles most needed in their
impoverished condition, and afterwards adding some wonderful things
which enabled them to become bold enough to attempt the exploration of
the island.

A brief review of the situation was this: The first consideration was
food. A number of vegetables were found, some of them well known, but in
a wild state, as well as nuts and fruit. Barley was one of the cereals
early discovered, and from that bread was made. Then ramie, a well-known
fiber, was found in the early days of their occupation, as well as flax,
and a wild species of hemp.

They were surprised to find various ores, clay and slate, and with these
began a series of experimental work which was wonderful in its
character, as every part of the work had to be carried on with the most
primitive sort of tools and appliances.

Among the first adventures in the field of making the useful necessities
was the construction of a water wheel; the building of a sawmill, from
which lumber was turned out to make their dwelling; a loom was put up
which enabled them to weave clothing; and, finally, a wagon, which arose
from the desire to utilize a herd of yaks, which they succeeded in
capturing.

Before the present adventure a number of useful articles and tools had
been made, among which might be mentioned a lathe, a foundry, in which
they turned out articles in iron and brass, and this gave them an
opportunity to make first a few pistols, and lastly, several guns, with
which the present expedition was equipped.

All these things interested the boys, and they took delight in every
part of it, and it gave them satisfaction to see the results of their
work on every hand. But that which attracted them more intensely were
the series of exploits which brought to light the hidden mysteries of
the island, and which caused them to name it "Wonder Island."

Four exploring trips had been made by land, and one by sea in a boat
which had been specially built for the purpose, and this vessel was
wrecked shortly after they had discovered the location of the savages.
In the previous expeditions they saw mysterious lights, and had
evidences of human beings by the camp fires used by them.

The first crude boat turned out was left at the foot of a high falls in
a river to the south of their home, and after the return the boys set
out to get the boat. It was missing, and recovered several months
afterwards, but to their surprise, when found, it had two oars and rope
that were placed there by some one.

On returning from one of the trips their flagpole and staff, which was
put up on a high point, called Observation Hill, was missing. Later on a
gruesome skeleton was found on the seashore not far from Observation
Hill, and the wrecked portions of a boat, and to this may be added the
discovery of a lifeboat, similar to their own, among debris on South
river, fully ten miles inland, which must have come from the interior.

[Illustration: _Fig. 1. The First Boat._]

In this boat was found, accidentally, a note written by a captive in
distress, showing that some of the party had been taken by the
inhabitants of the island, and this occurrence determined them the more
to put themselves in condition to aid the captives.

The last important development grew out of the finding of a cave, or a
series of caverns, not far from their home, which contained numerous
skeletons and a vast amount of treasure, showing that it was a pirates'
cave, but up to this time it had not been fully investigated in view of
the more serious need of haste to relieve those who were in the hands of
the savages.

Shortly before leaving on the present expedition, and after returning
from the expedition by sea, which had wrecked the boat, they were
surprised to find a man at their home, who had entirely lost his memory.
This happened six weeks before the occurrence in the opening page, and
during that time he had not uttered a single word, and seemed to be
entirely unconscious of his surroundings.

He was evidently a cultured man, but how he came to the island, or in
what manner his faculties were lost, they could get no clue. He had
proven himself to be harmless, and in many ways he was of great service
to them, and was now with the party, this being the fifth day of the
journey, and the distance from their home was from sixty to seventy
miles.

It should not be forgotten to mention Red Angel. Over eight months
before a baby orang-outan had been captured. He had grown rapidly, and
George, the elder of the two boys, had taken a special delight in
teaching or training him, and the result was that the imitative quality
of the animal made him useful to the party in many ways. Angel was with
them also, and was the only amusing element in their days of stress and
tension.

The condition before them at this time was one of intense interest. For
the first time since their arrival, savages had been seen. From the
first view it was apparent that the party sighted were on the point of
meeting a hostile tribe, and while it was their intention to journey
west to the large stream called by them West River, it was concluded to
remain at the present camping place until they could more fully observe
the attitude of the natives.

During two days previous the route had been through a dense forest, and
they emerged from this only a few hours before, their object being to
make their way to the river, as in the vicinity of the stream there was
not much wood, and the land was covered with comparatively little
underbrush. They felt that with the strongly built wagon, which had been
purposely made with a large, thick body, it would be more serviceable to
them as a means of defense than the woods, because the forest would
serve as places of concealment for their enemies, while adding nothing
to their security.

The strange man, who, in the absence of his true name, was called John,
noting the different ones climbing to the wagon top, also made his way
there, and gazed in the direction pointed out by Harry. He glanced
toward the savages, and then looked wonderingly at the boys and the
Professor. He did not appear at all disturbed, nor did he venture to
indicate by any sign that he understood or comprehended any danger.

And Angel, too, took a hand in the sights. He was beside George, and the
latter pointed out the savages, but if he knew what George meant his
face and actions did not show it. How little we know of the workings of
the human mind, and how should we know more of what passed in the mind
of that animal as he listlessly viewed the scene which so much
interested the others? We shall see, later on, how Angel profited by the
lesson which they tried to teach him.

"They seem to be fighting; at any rate, I can see them going toward each
other, and others running wildly about."

"Our better plan would be," said the Professor, "to go up nearer. In
that way we may be able to take advantage of their quarrel."

This seemed to appeal to the boys, and they were down instantly. The
yaks had been unyoked, prior to this, but they were now hitched up in a
hurried manner, and the wagon moved forward.

A word now as to the equipment of the wagon. It had been made with
unusually high sides, and was of thick boards, so that they did not fear
the arrows which, undoubtedly, were the only form of missiles which
would be hurled against them. Within were ten guns, each with a barrel
twenty inches long, and a three-eighths of an inch bore. All were
muzzle-loaders, as they had no facilities for making breech-loaders, so
that it would be impossible to fire rapidly, after the first ten shots;
but they counted on being able to hold out against a pretty strong force
of savages, armed as they were.

The wagon went forward slowly, and was kept as much as possible within
the sheltering range of the underbrush. All were in the vehicle, as its
height gave them a better view, and in case of a surprise all would be
guarded and safe.

It was somewhat of a relief to note that directly ahead of them was a
small stream, one of the tributaries of the West, and before reaching
the open area near the river, the Professor directed the wagon toward a
clump of brush, behind which the yaks were tethered.

They were thus in a position where they had an ample water supply, and
the Professor remarked, that in campaigning two things were essential,
one was food and the other water, and of the two water was of most value
for a short period, at least. The yaks needed it, and as that was their
means of transportation, every consideration must be given them.

"As we are now campaigning in earnest, we must have some system, and a
thorough understanding of what is to be done," said the Professor. "A
thorough watch must be kept at all times day and night. We must not
separate, but keep closely together, and in watching just as much care
must be taken of our rear and our flanks. We do not know from which
direction these people are likely to spring up. Remember, from our
experiences night before last, this is territory over which they
travel."

It should be stated that in the night referred to a band of the savages
had passed their camp, going in the direction in which the wagon had
taken, and they were of the impression that those discovered to the
south of the stream were the ones who had come so near finding them.

"There is also another matter that should be considered. While we do not
anticipate any disaster to our party, still we should at all times make
provision for any separation, should such a thing take place. I estimate
that we are now directly south of the mouth of West River, and that the
sea to the north is from fifteen to twenty miles away. Now, let it be
understood that in case we are defeated, or by any chance there should
be any separation, the place of retreat will be toward the location of
the wrecked boat, which is near the mouth of the river."

The great difficulty was to impart this to John. He was interested, in a
peculiar sort of way, in the proceedings, and the Professor undertook to
make the situation, as just explained, clear to him. For this purpose he
made a chart to show the tributary stream on which they were encamped,
flowing into the West River, and its course to the sea, and by pointing
out the spot to the west of the river mouth, where the wrecked boat was
landed, he hoped the course could be fully understood. This explanation
seemed to be comprehended by him, but of this there could be no
assurance.

Meanwhile they had not for a moment forgotten to keep in sight the
warring factions, for now that they were much closer the character of
the meeting could not be misunderstood.

"Look at them," cried George; "the other tribe seems to be victorious.
They are coming this way." Such seemed to be the case. The retreating
forces were coming directly toward the wagon, and the situation now
began to take on a very grave aspect.

"What shall we do, Professor, if they come on to us?"

"We are here on a peaceful mission, and should fight only in
self-defense," was his reply. This did not exactly suit the spirit of
the boys, but they deferred to the wisdom of their friend.

It was plain that the tribe first seen was defeated and was being driven
back to the river, and the Professor advised them to prepare for any
emergency. The camp was not more than one hundred and fifty feet from
the edge of the river, and they had a plain, open view before them.

Beyond the river was a bare shore, the shrubbery did not grow near the
water, so that there was an open space of fully three hundred feet or
more on the other shore, thus giving them ample time to note and act,
whatever the circumstances might be. The Professor hoped that the
pursued might deviate from their path and bring them to the river below
their camp, but in this he was disappointed, as the first of the savages
made his appearance from the brush directly across the river, soon
followed by a dozen or more, all in precipitous retreat.

They now had the first close view of the savages. They were almost
wholly naked, and had more the appearance of the North American Indians
than of the South Sea Islanders, which their fancy had pictured them to
be. Each carried a short spear and a bow, and the Professor called
attention to the apparent lack of arrows, as the bows were strung on
their backs, and they carried the spears as though they depended on them
for protection.

"I think they have been beaten because they are out of ammunition. It
will not take them long, however, to make up a supply, and it is
possible that is what they purpose doing."

The victorious party now came in view. Without waiting the defeated
party dashed through the stream not two hundred feet below the wagon,
and before they had fairly landed, espied the wagon. The surprise at
seeing it was almost paralyzing to them for the instant. They sheered
off down the stream, gesticulating wildly.

The pursuers crossed the stream higher up, and, therefore, nearer the
wagon. "Watch the party which has just crossed, so we can see what their
course will be."

"They are circling around behind us."

As they did so the victors emerged from the stream and made direct
toward the location of the Professor and his party. Here was a situation
not counted on. The wise savages had calculated on this chance to arrest
the pursuers, and they showed wisdom in the move.

"Now, boys, we must stop them, but do not shoot to kill at the first
shot. Before anything is done I will try to stop them by peaceful
methods."

The Professor, with a gun in his hand, suddenly stepped out from the
brush, and held up a hand. It may well be imagined that an apparition
was as startling to them as it had been to the others. They stopped for
a moment, and then with a whoop, fitted arrows to their bows, and
darted forward. The Professor stepped back, and calmly said: "Now, boys,
shoot low, and don't get excited."

At the word, and before the savages had gone twenty feet, the boys and
John leveled their pieces, and a volley rang out. Several were seen to
fall, but were only wounded, as they were at once taken in charge by
their companions. The moment the first round was fired, the Professor
ordered the relay guns to be grasped. But the savages, stunned by this
change of affairs, did not wait for the second shot, but rushed back to
the stream as fast as they could go, with the three wounded men.

But where were the other savages? Had they seen the result of the fight?
The Professor hoped that the result would be such as to win them over.
They lurked at a distance beyond the wagon, and as the Professor
advanced toward them and held up a hand, they continued to retreat. He
beckoned to them; but in spite of all efforts they refused to come
near.




CHAPTER II

TWO SAVAGE ATTACKS


To all intents and purposes they had two foes, one in front and the
other in the rear. They possessed a fine position, however, due to the
Professor's foresight. The river was close enough to get the needed
water for themselves and their yaks, and the thick clump of bushes, on
the river side of the wagon, afforded protection for the animals, while
the wagon itself served as an admirable fort.

They could not believe that the band which had been driven across, and
which was now at their rear, would attack them, and it seemed that the
present danger of a night attack might be expected from the pursuing
party. Indeed, the actions of that tribe, after the attack, led the
Professor to believe that they must expect a fight during the night.

The wagon was now brought up close alongside the clump, and with their
bolos a considerable space of the densest part of the brush was cut
away, so as to form a retreat for the yaks, and thus assure them from
harm by any attacks with arrows or spears. Before dark, Harry and John
went to the river several times to bring water for the cattle and for
their own uses, and with the extra boards which the Professor had
wisely brought along, the principal portion of the space below the
wagon body was closed up.

When all had been arranged for defense all felt satisfied they could
withstand a hundred savages armed with spears and arrows. One thing had
to be considered, and that was, whether or not those people poisoned
their arrows, as many races in southern islands do.

As a further precautionary measure, all protecting bushes within two
hundred feet of the wagon were cleared away, so as to afford an open
view in all directions.

Darkness set in, and the eternal stillness all about was oppressive. Two
watched while the other two slept. John appeared in his element. At the
least sign of disturbance in any quarter, his hand was up, and to
further attract attention his hand would be laid upon the arm of his
fellow watcher.

Thus passed away the first half of the night, and then for the first
time Angel began to grow restless. George, who was asleep at this time,
was awakened, as he interpreted Angel's actions with greater facility
than the others.

"I am sure from his actions that something is coming near us. See, he is
motioning toward the forest side and not toward the river." It did seem
as though his perturbations came whenever George pointed toward the
woods.

To the watchers, there was no sound to alarm them, for fully a half
hour, when John slowly moved his hand over to George, as he peered out
to the north, and as he laid his hand on his arm, arose and silently
moved out to the end of the wagon, and slipped to the ground. George
tried to restrain him, and immediately woke the Professor, to whom he
related the circumstance.

There was, indeed, a movement in their front, at the margin of the
clearing. Forms appeared here and there, but the utmost quiet was
observed. Suddenly the report of a gun rang out, and with a shriek, a
form was seen to bound upwardly and fall, just as a shower of arrows
fell against the wagon.

The shot came from John's gun, and he had fired from a position fully
fifty feet away from the wagon, and this is what disconcerted them. They
were expecting the defense to come from the wagon, and here was a shot,
away from it, and it undoubtedly appeared to them that there must be a
number of them defending it, to enable them to put watchers so far from
the wagon.

"That was a shrewd action on the part of John, although it was a
hazardous one, in case they had determined to rush us. But the die is
cast, and we must now fight it out."

John came back to the wagon, and took up the other gun mechanically. The
Professor patted him on the back, as he again stole out. This time he
boldly marched toward the fringe of the clearing, and the Professor
urged Harry to run after and detain him, but he did not heed.

He remained there a full hour before any sign was made by him, but at
the end of that time he came back, and by signs indicated that the
savages were back again.

"Which band do you think has attacked us?"

"It looks to me as though the fellows who were pursued are the ones;
what is that John has brought back?"

He held something in his hand. It was an arrow and a cap, the latter of
which had blood on it. This was determined when a light was struck in
the little compartment below the wagon top.

"Do you think it is possible they could have gotten these arrows since
we saw them to-day?"

"They undoubtedly manufacture them with great facility, and the lack of
them this afternoon would be no indication that they would be without
them to-night."

John's intimation was right. They were seen beyond question, and without
waiting for the initial shot, as before, they bounded across the open
space, and the command was given to fire. The result of the shots was
plainly seen. The rush ceased, and before the Professor could give the
command for the second shot they reached the brush, and the ammunition
was saved.

When morning broke, three forms were recognized lying in the clearing,
but there was no sign of the savages beyond. John, without waiting for
the word, moved toward them, and taking their weapons and searching
their scanty clothing, took something from each, and brought them to the
wagon.

The trophies brought by John were two pocket knives of English or
American manufacture, and other small trinkets, such as any traveler
might carry.

"This is interesting," said the Professor, as he looked over the
articles. "How is it possible they got these articles unless from white
people?"

When Harry and John went to the river for water, the first thing that
caught Harry's eye was an arrow, which he carried back with him to the
wagon and handed to the Professor.

"I think," said he, "there is another body lying over at the edge of the
clearing, the one that John shot at the first attack."

The boys went over, after keeping a careful lookout as they advanced.
They secured his cap and the bow and arrow. When they returned the
Professor looked up, and announced that he had no doubt they had been
attacked by both of the parties.

"Why do you think so?" asked George.

"For several reasons: First, the headdress of the two bands differs, as
you can see by comparing the one you have just brought in, as well as
the peculiar differences shown in the arrows. This is one you found near
the river this morning, and was no doubt dropped by one of them at the
time they attacked us, and it is exactly similar to the one you have
just brought in. You will also notice that the three that were shot in
the last attack have the arrows and headdress different from the
others."

It thus appeared that by force of circumstances they had been thrown
into the paths of these two warring factions, and had become the enemy
of both.

But now something must be done to carry out the determination to rescue
their fellows. How to reach the savages was the problem. They had shown
hostility from the first. It was evident they were far from the usual
habitations of the tribes. They must have their villages farther to the
south and probably west of the present location.

The only course was to go forward, in the hope that friendly relations
might still be established, notwithstanding the unfortunate
circumstances of the night.

During the entire day there was not a sign of either of the parties. The
Professor gave his views by stating that if they went forward at once
the chances of getting into favorable communication would be improved,
and if they could capture one of them it would go far toward putting
them on the right track.

They remained another night at the river, and early in the morning the
stream was crossed and the course of the wagon directed to the south. In
less than half an hour they came upon the scene of the fight between the
two tribes which took place the day before.

Here it was made plain that the two tribes had different weapons and
dissimilar articles of clothing, and numerous odds and ends were
gathered in the hope that some clue might be discovered as to the white
people who were, no doubt, on the island.

Nothing of value in this direction was picked up, although there was
confirmative evidence that the savages had in their possession trinkets
which were taken from captives, and which made the necessity of their
journey still more opportune.

Directly to the front of them was a forest, and to the right an incline,
rather free from wood, and the course was changed in order to gain the
elevation. This was reached about four in the afternoon, and in another
hour they were at the crest of the hill. This gave them an unobstructed
view to the south and west, and there, in the distance, was made out
what appeared to be huts, or evidences of human habitations.

The first care was to select a camping spot, which was as much in the
open as possible, and the utmost care exercised to guard against
surprises.

But what had become of the savages in the rear? It was impossible to
obliterate the tracks of the wagon, so they might be easily followed.

"I believe the hostile attitude of the two warring parties is, after
all, a factor in our favor, because if both try to follow us they are
bound to again come into contact with each other, so we may be free from
that worry."

"Isn't it likely that one or the other may send messengers to the
village, if what we see beyond is any evidence, and thereby bring all of
them against us?" Harry ventured to ask.

"That is a probability I have been considering, and our only course is
to resist their attacks, and, as I have stated, endeavor to capture one
of them, so we can establish communications."

Camp was made for the night, but there was no disturbance, and there was
a visible relief in the minds of all as morning approached and no signs
of an enemy in either quarter.

The yaks were hitched up shortly after breakfast, and the long, sloping
descent began. Angel was ahead swinging from tree to tree, and before
they had proceeded a mile began chattering from the tree top, in his
peculiar way betokening alarm. George ran up, called him down, and
started forward. Angel followed, chattering more vigorously, and when
George turned in another direction he ceased, thus showing conclusively
the direction of the alarm, and it was well they profited by it, for now
within fifteen minutes the savages were plainly seen.

They came forward, fully fifty or more, working their way cautiously
along, and, no doubt, fully aware of the location of the wagon and its
occupants. The crucial time had come, and George rushed back to the
wagon, but before he had fully reached it a scouting party well in
advance of the main body came within hailing distance.

The Professor, as before, walked out from the wagon, and held up his
hand as a token of peace, but to this they made no response, but
continued their cautious forward movement, creeping from one vantage
point to the next, and the wagon was then turned so that its rear end
was toward the oncoming savages.

Harry was directed to drive the team toward a cluster of bush at the
right, and they were urged forward with all haste. The yak is a
fast-moving animal, and started forward on a run, soon gaining the
shelter selected. It should be stated that when the team, which had been
named Jack and Jill, was first broken in, the animals were taught to be
driven by means of lines, and this was now of great service to them.

With their bolos they cut out a space at one side of the undergrowth,
into which the yaks were driven and thus afforded protection, and the
guns were taken out and arranged in order to enable them to be readily
handled.

Before all preparations had been completed the main body came up, and
all breathlessly awaited the attack. They halted several hundred feet
away, and the Professor sought by means of signs to indicate his
peaceful intent, but this did not have the least effect, as arrangement
for an assault was manifested by the preparations which were now plainly
perceptible.

The Professor retreated to the wagon, and his cautioning words were: "Do
not fire excitedly or wildly, and be careful not to fire at too long
range. Furthermore, shoot the leaders, or those who appear to take the
lead. Another thing, fire and reload. Do not take the loaded guns which
are in reserve, because we may need them later on, at a more critical
time. These will be very serviceable if they attempt to rush us. In that
event we shall have six guns and two pistols to meet them with."

Contrary to expectations no immediate attempt was made to attack, and
the Professor again tried to attract them by signs. For a time no
further hostile movement was made, and it began to look as though his
efforts would win; but suddenly, with a concerted movement, the bows
were swung upward, and arrows began to fall dangerously near.

As no movement was made on the part of the Professor and his party, the
savages mistook its meaning, and a charge was made. "Now deliberately
pick your man and fire." No sooner had the order been given before all
fired, and four fell, two of them being, without doubt, the chiefs, as
the howling was beyond all description.

A second volley was not necessary. The two wounded men were surrounded
and carried off. The others lay where they fell, and after a short pause
another rush was made, this time much nearer to the wagon. It was
fortunate that the pause was long enough to enable them to reload. On
they came, and when within seventy-five feet, the Professor gave the
order for another volley. At this distance there was no excuse for a
miss. The leader was a powerful specimen, with a distinctive badge, and
the Professor announced that he intended to use him as a mark, and he
was the first to fall, together with three more.

Thus, at two shots, one-fifth of their fighting force was disabled. "Now
let us charge," said the Professor, and John divining the meaning was
the first to leap from the wagon. The main body of the savages broke for
cover, but several, more venturesome than the rest, sought to carry away
the wounded chief. When one of them turned to discharge his arrow, John
raised his gun to his shoulder, as each of them had taken one of the
reserve guns, but before he could fire, the native turned and followed
his companions, leaving the chief to his fate.

[Illustration: "_The main body of the savages broke for cover, but
several, more venturesome than the rest, sought to carry away the
chief_" [See p. 32]]

The rush with the newly loaded guns was accompanied by shouts on the
part of the boys, who were instructed to do so by the Professor. "Don't
go far beyond the chief," was his order; "we need him, and you must not
venture into an ambush."

The boys did not dare to go far beyond the wounded man, and the
Professor, with the aid of John, had now come up to him, and together
forced him to accompany him back to the wagon. He was wounded in both
legs, the shot having passed through the kneecap of one leg and through
the tendon of the other, thus completely putting him out of action.

When the boys returned from the charge they assisted in conveying him to
the wagon, and the Professor at once applied bandages to his limbs. This
was getting an opportunity, at close range, to view one of their
enemies.

The shot proved to be a glancing one, so that the bullet was still in
the tendon of the right leg. When the Professor applied the bandages the
savage was surprised at the proceeding. He evidently expected different
treatment, and glanced at his captors in amazement. During the first few
minutes of these interesting details, the boys had entirely forgotten
the savages, and the Professor called out a warning not to rest too
securely.

When the natives saw that the pursuit was not kept up they halted and
slowly and cautiously, returned. It was evident that they were
preparing for another fight. The wagon top was removed at one side, and
the chief hoisted up and seated in plain view of his fellows, while the
Professor directed the boys how to secure him in that position.

The entire band now appeared at the edge of the wood, not two hundred
feet away, evidently with the view to another attack. All the guns had
now been reloaded, and with the chief with them they had no fear of an
attack with arrows.

The Professor placed himself before the chief, and by motions endeavored
to inform the chief that if his men made any attack on them he would
forfeit his life. The chief understood, and in a peculiar guttural
tongue informed his men of the danger he was in.

Without further incident they disappeared, and now began the effort to
instil and extract information. He was entirely naked except a
distinctive headdress and a breech cloth, of very peculiar workmanship.
The color of his skin was not black, like the negro, but rather
copper-colored, like the Indian, thus confirming the impression which
was first obtained the night before.




CHAPTER III

A THIRD ATTACKING TRIBE


There was no common ground on which to start the mute conversation, and
the only replies volunteered by him were occasional grunts. Not a groan
escaped his lips when the Professor sought to remove the bullet, but he
sat there stoically, and bore it without a sign. The boys could not help
but admire his heroic mien throughout the trying hour, and when the
bullet was finally cut out and the wound carefully bound up, it looked
as though he tried to thank the Professor for the service.

During the remainder of the afternoon the Professor persisted in the
effort to gain some information, but not the slightest glimpse of
intelligence was extracted.

Finally George said: "I wonder if he has anything in those pouches? We
found some things in the others, you remember." This was a hint not to
be overlooked. A search was made, and among numerous trinkets was a
photograph of a dozen or more young men, and with a shout George
recognized it as one which had been taken on shipboard several weeks
before the explosion on board the _Investigator_, and which sent her to
the bottom.

George and Harry were both in the picture, and were pointed out. Here
was the very thing which was needed as a connecting link in their
interview with the chief. With the picture before him the chief was
requested to look at George and then at the picture, and so in the case
of Harry. The chief saw, and recognized the similarity, and his eyes
opened in astonishment. This was a most remarkable discovery.

When the Professor pointed to the others in the picture, and then to the
chief, the latter seemed for the first time to comprehend, but he slowly
shook his head and grunted, or made use of his own language to indicate
that he had no knowledge of them. The boys were fairly wild with
delight.

"Why not hunt the pockets of the other fellows?" shouted out Harry, as
he scrambled over the tailboard. About a hundred and fifty feet beyond
were the two who had fallen at the first fire, and they were searched,
but nothing in any way connecting them with their companions was
revealed, and later they went over the contents of the chief's pockets
with greater care.

An American coin, a matchbox, and several other articles, which were
apparently the relics of stickpins, were all that had any appreciable
value. There was nothing on any of the articles which had a name or even
the initials to give them a clue. As they were returning to the wagon
Harry picked up a small silver match safe, and on this were the initials
"J L V." "Who is J L V? Did you know of anyone by that name?"

"I don't remember anyone by that name. The name is not an unusual one to
begin with a V."

The Professor did not recall anyone by that name. The box was handed
around, and when John saw it, he started as though he had been struck.
He reached for it and almost grasped it from the Professor's hand, and
turned it over and over, and glanced at the initials, and then looked at
the Professor, and then at the boys, and his eyes ceased their
wanderings as he gazed at the chief.

[Illustration: _Fig. 2. The match safe._]

Could it be possible that his name was John L. V.? Was that his match
safe? What a wonderful possibility lay in these two happenings which
came so close together!

The chief, too, looked at the match safe, and when the Professor pointed
to John and then directed the captive's attention to the match safe, he
did it with the view of ascertaining whether or not he had ever seen
John. But to all these questionings the savage shook his head and
grunted a plain negative.

A careful watch had been kept during the entire day, in the hope that
the savages would reappear, and that the treatment of the chief would be
such as to predispose him in their favor, and thus open the way to
obtain such information as would be of service in aiding their
companions.

As night approached preparations were made to guard against any night
attack, and the prisoner was securely bound to prevent him from
obtaining any of the weapons. One singular thing about all of the
headgear and other articles of wear was the profusion of human hair,
which was worked into many of the garments or formed a prominent
decorative feature.

George was the first to notice this peculiarity. "Why is it that most
savage tribes take human hair or scalp their victims?"

"The North American Indian was noted for the custom of taking the scalp
of his enemies. It probably grew out of the desire to use the locks for
the purpose of decorations, just as you see in the case before you. In
olden times it was the custom of the vanquished to indicate submission
by plucking out a handful of hair and offering it to the victim as a
token of submission, but whether this grew out of the custom of
scalping, or whether the latter was an outgrowth of the hair token, is
not known."

"What interests me is, why they should take a portion of the skin if
they wanted the hair simply for decoration?"

"Principally because that was the easiest way to keep the lock intact.
Spencer, in his 'Evolution of Ceremonial Forms of Government,' relates
some curious things growing out of this custom of taking tribute of
hair. Thus, the habit of stroking the mustache, a custom prevalent
among Spanish courtiers, arose from this habit. The stroking was done in
the presence of ladies and superiors to indicate submission, or as an
evidence of inferiority."

"Why is it that these savages pay more attention to their headgear than
any other part of their clothing?"

"The savage regards the head as the most important part of the body. It
is also the portion which is first seen by an enemy or recognized by a
friend, hence he considers it a necessity to properly attire it for the
purpose of inculcating fear in one, or admiration in the other. Vanity
in the lower order of people leads them to excesses in the matter of
dress or ornamentation, just the same as with many civilized people."

Long before morning dawned Angel grew restless, and could not be quieted
by George. The latter believed that the savages had returned, if the
actions of Angel were any indications; but as the sun came up and a
careful scrutiny was made, nothing alarming was in sight.

An early breakfast was prepared, and the yaks yoked up, preliminary to a
start for the south. With a chief in their hands they felt safer in
their position than before, and were now in a condition to treat with
the natives.

Hardly had the wagon started before Harry ran up in haste and excitedly
whispered: "I see them coming; look to the south." Not far beyond was a
mass of them coming up hurriedly, less than a half mile away, and a
stealthy movement among the shrubbery in the immediate vicinity showed
the presence of the advance scouts which Angel had undoubtedly scented
an hour before.

The yaks were headed to the north, to give them ample opportunity to
employ their weapons, and the chief was placed at the tailboard of the
wagon, in full view of the pursuers, in the hope that his people would
heed the warning given the day before. This seemed to have no effect in
the warlike attitude of the attacking party.

"What I fear most is the possible attempt to surround us; to prevent
that it is better to drive the team forward at a pretty rapid rate."

The yaks were urged along, and their motion considerably accelerated by
the shrieks and howls of the demons, as they brandished their arrows and
spears. Thus far not an arrow had been loosened, and the fire of the
party in the wagon was reserved.

As the wagon surged forward the din increased, and soon a shower of
arrows fell among them, none taking effect, because accurate aim was not
possible while they were in motion. And now a concerted movement was
apparent to surround the wagon. Over one hundred warriors were counted,
and among them certain chiefs, recognized by their distinctive
headdress.

"Go for the river, Harry," was the Professor's injunction.

The yaks were now beyond all control. Several of the arrows found their
marks in the poor animals, and they were now vying with the foremost
savages in making speed. Eventually the flanks of the attacking party
outran the team, and the Professor made his way to the front, leaving
George and John to take care of the rear.

When one of the prominent chiefs, who was leading the flanking party,
presented a fair target, the Professor shot, and had the satisfaction of
seeing him fall, and this temporarily checked the pursuit on that side.
Grasping Harry's gun, he fired into the party on the opposite side, with
good effect. The opening shot by the Professor was a signal for George
and John.

And now began one of the most exciting running duels between the
contending forces. The Professor knew that if the river could be reached
they would have only one side to defend, but they were fully three miles
or more from the crossing point of the stream, and to make matters
worse, the team was beyond control, and was traveling to the northwest,
whereas the direct course to the river was to the north or northeast.

There was no help for it. They must keep cool, and reserve their fire.
After each shot the weapon of each would be reloaded, so that they
always had a reserve force of guns. The arrows came spasmodically, and
only a few of them from the trailing members of the band came near. The
danger was from those who were attempting to encircle the wagon.

John was requested by sign to go to the forward end, and he promptly
responded, and at every shot one of the pursuers went down. The main
object was to keep them away from the team a sufficient distance to
prevent injury to the yaks, and this required the greatest energy and
watchfulness.

The attacking party began to have a wholesome fear of the guns, and kept
at a distance, which prevented them from effectively using the arrows.
This pace was kept up for two miles, and the effect was now apparent on
the poor animals. Harry noticed it, but he kept up a brave front, and
did his share in the firing.

But now there was increased activity in the ranks of the enemy. Most of
the advance party had gathered at a clump of bush ahead, and partly to
the right, and Harry made every effort to divert the team to the left;
but they were blind to the urging, and too excited to heed the tugging
of Harry.

The Professor divined the purpose of the remarkable quiet on the part of
the savages, and called to George to come to the forward end in
anticipation of a rush, en masse, from the shelter of the brush. By some
instinct the yaks turned to the left before the danger point was
reached, but the band nevertheless rushed forward in rage, and to the
gratification of our party, they were so close together that aiming for
the thick of the pursuers was sufficient to assure a mark for each shot.

They did not heed the fallen, or wait to care for them, but rushed on
and endeavored to head off the yaks. Those in the wagon did not notice
that before them, and close at hand, lay a broad river. Harry was the
first to announce it with a shout, when he saw the party in the lead
halt, and move to the rear.

"What stream is this?" exclaimed George, excitedly.

"This must be the West River."

"And see, there is another stream to the right."

What a lucky circumstance that the team had made its way to the forks of
the two rivers, and that they were now protected by the streams on both
flanks. It was also fortunate for them that the team was by this time so
completely worn out, that as they were going out along the narrow tongue
of land, and the danger from their foes was growing less, that Harry
carefully crept along the wagon pole to the heads of the animals and by
quieting words soon restored them, and succeeded in bringing them under
control before the shores were reached.

Both animals had been wounded, and the first care of the Professor was
to relieve them. One of the arrows still hung in the side of Jill, and
when the wounds were dressed they did not seem any the worse for their
experience, but they were very tired, and inflamed with the excitement.

The peninsula within which they lay was not more than fifty feet wide
where the wagon was halted, and two hundred feet away its width was not
over one hundred feet, so it will be seen they were in a position which
could be easily defended. There was plenty of provision on hand, but the
matter of ammunition was the immediate cause of alarm. At least thirty
rounds had been fired in the running fight, and the first thing was to
take stock of this necessary article.

Only eight rounds were left, for the guns, and twenty for the pistols,
but as they were now safe from further attack this was not such a
calamity as they expected.

[Illustration: _Fig. 3. Scene of the fight at the River._]

Their captive was mute during the entire skirmish, and it was a
remarkable exhibition of a savage trait for the pursuers to disregard
the condition of one of their chiefs, by firing on him while in that
condition. How many were killed or disabled they had no means of
knowing, but many must have fallen, for when they lined up across the
tongue of land behind them the number had considerably diminished.

"It seems as though they intend to make a siege of it," was Harry's
comment, as he noticed them preparing a fire.

The wagon was drawn up so that its broadside was toward the enemy, and
the boards which had been carried, let down so as to form a screen for
the part below the body. This afforded a safe place for the yaks, if
perchance during the night the attacking party should get near enough by
stealth to use their arrows.

As night approached there was an evident movement on the part of the
besiegers, which could not be understood, until it was noticed that they
had taken a much closer position. This was considered most annoying, and
with a view to giving them another lesson, a few shots were fired into
the thickest groups. This was answered by howls of anger, as they rushed
back beyond the line of their former camp fire.

"They will learn a good lesson if they keep after us much longer. They
have a wholesome fear of us now, and if our ammunition holds out, we can
wipe out the whole lot," was George's grim comment after the last
incident.

"Fear is certainly a wonderful thing in this world," commented the
Professor; "without it the entire history of the world would have to be
changed and rewritten."

"Why do you think so?"

"If you stop to consider the element of fear you will see that it is at
the bottom of almost every human aspiration. Why does a man work to lay
up a store for a rainy day? Why does he toil day after day, and often
lose his life in the effort? What prompts the mother to guard her
infant in the face of every danger? You may say it is love, but behind
that love is fear which prompts the action."

During the night, when John and Harry were on guard, John quietly stole
from the wagon, and as stealthily as a savage moved out over the ground
toward the Indian encampment. Heretofore there had been a protest
against his doing so, but in this case Harry did not offer any
objections.

On his return Harry noticed several objects which he carried back and
was surprised to see they were the peculiar headdresses worn by the
attacking party. It was a matter of wonder to him that John should make
a prize of these things, but when the Professor was called, and he
noticed them, his face lighted up, and nodding his head, said: "Well,
this is a wonderful piece of information."

"What is it?"

"How stupid I have been, not to recognize that before."

"What is the matter with the headgears that John brought in?"

"Look at the topknot of the fellow we have in the wagon."

The moonlight was sufficiently clear to enable Harry to distinguish a
pronounced difference.

"So another tribe that our captive does not belong to has been pursuing
us?"

This news was of so much importance that Harry waked up George, although
it was not his hour for the watch.

"What do you think, George, the fellow we have does not belong to the
attacking party." George was too sleepy to comprehend the intelligence
at once.

"How do you know it?"

"John has just brought in several of the headdresses, and they are
entirely unlike the one the chief has."

The utter disregard of the savages for the chief was now explained.

When morning came the Professor turned to the boys, and remarked: "I
have still further information to impart this morning."

"What is it?" was the query of both.

"Last night when I made an examination of the articles John brought in,
I was under the impression that our pursuers were the other tribe that
we first met north of the river. On more carefully looking them over I
find that our late enemies are an entirely different tribe, so that we
must count on three distinct people in our further explorations."




CHAPTER IV

THE ESCAPE. ENCOUNTERING ANOTHER HOSTILE TRIBE


The boys did not know how to receive this news; whether it complicated
the situation or really offered an easier solution. The annoying thing
was that the natives were at war with each other, and, apparently, all
were at war with them.

The Professor commended John for his intuition, or whatever it may be
called, in enabling them to gain this information. In his mute way he
made a place for himself in the hearts of all. His wonderful ability
with the gun, his caution and prudence, and the remarkable calmness and
ease that characterized all his actions in the most trying periods, were
such commendable traits that the boys could not help but show him their
admiration in every way, and he knew and seemed to appreciate this.

Every day some new phase of his character would present itself, and the
Professor, ever alert to note any symptoms, quietly told the boys that
there was every evidence that he was now in the making of a dual self.

"What do you mean by that?"

"It is a term applied to one who has lost memory of his past, and in
that condition has begun life anew and gone on for years in the new or
dual existence, and perhaps ended his life in the dual personality. In
many cases, however, returning consciousness, which came just as
suddenly as they were deprived of it, caused them to forget all that had
taken place during the first period."

"Under those conditions which is the real man or individual, the memory
he first started out with or the memory he got afterwards?"

"You have asked a strong, leading question, George, and it may never be
answered satisfactorily. Supposing a man should live a period of thirty
years, and then have memory entirely obliterated, and should exist the
residue of thirty years more as another person, there would be as much
reason in calling one as normal as the other; but on the other hand, if,
during the latter period, memory should return, and he would be
rehabilitated into his former self, I am of the opinion that the first
period would be the normal one."

"You seem to think that is what makes the person?"

"What else is there to man but memory? Is it the flesh, or blood and
bones? Animals have those also. Memory is the greatest faculty in man,
and it has been argued that what is called the divine spirit is merely
the ability to recollect."

"But animals recollect, and would you call them divine for that reason?"

"No; for the reason that the lower orders of living creatures, as we
term them, do not remember all things, but only certain features of
events, and do not, except within a very limited range, reason from one
phase to another. Man is called divine by his own kind because he has
done things so far above what the brute has accomplished that it is
regarded as a divine attribute. But he has done these things because he
was endowed with a memory which enabled him to retain a consciousness of
things, and to follow up the stored knowledge, or the accumulated
essences of events which materialized in his remarkable works. Would it
make any difference if the being which does these wonderful things
should be in the form of a dog or a horse? If Red Angel could remember
all that is told him, and could thereby do the next day what he had
learned the day before, he would compare favorably with many human
beings who possess our forms, and are called human beings."

No attack was made that night, and the next morning all were relieved at
the rest afforded them. The savages had too much respect to venture near
the camp, and a consultation was held as to a wise course to follow. The
captive was of no use to them, but it would have been inhuman to turn
him adrift, so that he should fall into the hands of the besieging
party. Eventually he might be of service to them.

The main river to the west of them was fully two hundred feet broad, and
the stream which bounded the other side of their position was, at its
mouth, over a hundred and fifty feet in width, and it appeared to be
entirely too deep to attempt fording.

No doubt the savages knew this, and counted on an easy capture when
their provisions should give out. Thus the second day neared its close,
and near evening there was an evident addition to the besieging force. A
close watch was kept during the night, but no attempt made to force the
situation.

This inaction became most monotonous. It was exceedingly trying, and the
condition after the third day was now made plain; that they intended to
starve them into submission.

During the early part of the evening, the Professor, realizing that
something must be done, decided on a novel plan to relieve them of the
savages. If, by any possibility, they could get some logs, sufficient to
build a raft to help sustain the wagon, he believed the yaks would be
able to swim the river and thus take the rafted wagon with them.

The boys, when the idea was broached, were heartily in favor of the
scheme. Harry looked at John. "I only wish we could make our desires
known to him."

The Professor took John by the hand, and led him to the brink of the
river, and then pointing to the stream and to the wagon, and motioning
in the direction across the river, he seemed to comprehend the meaning.

When they returned to the wagon, the Professor said to Harry: "Do you
think you and John could cross the stream to the north of us, and find
sufficient poles and driftwood for the purpose?"

Harry jumped at the opportunity. The moon was shining, but was
occasionally hidden by clouds. Motioning to John they took their guns
and bolos, and at the instance of the Professor, a quantity of rope.
Some driftwood had caught at the shore to their left, and this was
recovered, and from that a small raft was built sufficient to carry
both across the narrowest stream.

To the north of them, less than a quarter of a mile away, was a quantity
of small timber, and the Professor suggested that it would be advisable
to go a considerable distance so the cutting of the logs would not be
heard by their watchers.

They pushed the raft silently across the water, and drew it up for
safety, and then stole down to the water's edge to make their way beyond
the sight of the savages on the opposite side. All along the shore
advantage was taken of every piece of wood available to serve as a
floating structure, and when the wood was reached a few of convenient
size were selected and cut up into lengths which would enable them to be
readily rolled down to the river.

This work occupied them until midnight, and four large trees were thus
prepared and lashed together, and one, wading in the water along the
beach, using a pole, the other, with the rope, they held it within
poling distance of the shore. In this manner the logs and detached
pieces were floated down to the mouth of the stream, and having tied the
small raft to the stern, it was finally poled across and landed at the
water's edge not far from the wagon.

It was fortunate that the water was shallow and that the beach was
shelving at this point, as it materially aided in effecting the
launching. The moon went down before four o'clock that morning, and the
yaks were yoked up and led to the river.

When Harry returned he was surprised at what he saw in their camp. The
Professor and George had been at work also. Several uprights had been
put up on the side of the wagon facing the besiegers, and over this had
been stretched an old canvas and parts of such goods as could be
dispensed with, so as to imitate the wagon, as nearly as possible.

Their ramie fiber top was of a light yellowish color, which looked
bright in the moonlight. This had been removed and stored in the wagon,
so that when the wagon was driven away the sham arrangement did not
disclose the disappearance of the vehicle.

The wagon was driven into the water nearly hub deep, and two of the
largest logs were then floated in under the axles, and the smaller ones
lashed inside, so that the sustaining power of the combined logs,
together with the wooden portion of the wagon and body, would be
sufficient to sustain their weights.

Harry worked liked a hero, and took personal charge of the handling of
the team, which was his especial delight. His presence near the yaks
always gave them confidence, and on this occasion he took his position
on the pole between them and near the yoke, and thus gently urged them
forward.

For twenty-five feet or more the wheels kept on the ground, but soon
thereafter the wheels were free, and they were delighted to find that
the timbers did not permit the body to go down very low into the water,
and this saved their bedding from becoming soaked.

The yaks performed their work nobly. Some months before they had forded
the South River, at the time the flagpole for Observation Hill was cut,
so they had ample reason to believe that they would be dependable under
these circumstances. It did not require much urging on the part of
Harry, and the opposite bank was soon reached, and the cattle scrambled
up the beach, but were stopped before the wagon emerged from the water
so the logs could be cut adrift.

[Illustration: _Fig. 4. The Wagon Raft._]

The passage was made without a single mishap, and all wondered why this
plan had not been thought of before.

"Let us move on into the interior a short distance, so as to deceive
them as to our direction. It is conceivable that they may have boats of
some kind which they have sent for, and we should, therefore, try to put
them off the track."

All were now tired and needed rest. They had not slept a moment during
the night, and it was not yet daylight. Beyond was an elevation, toward
which the Professor directed them. There the wagon could be concealed,
and from that point they would also have a view of the future movements
of their enemies.

When the sun arose the savages could be seen standing guard over the
sham wagon, at their old camp ground, and the boys enjoyed this bit of
humor in the extreme. "I feel so jolly at the trick that I want to go
down to the river and laugh at them," exclaimed George.

Up to nine o'clock there was no indication that the ruse had been
discovered. The Professor was in his happiest mood at the good
imitation, and John had an unmistakable smile, and, as the boys'
laughter grew more boisterous, he broke into a laugh that actually
startled them.

It was no less amusing to the captive. Beyond question it pleased him,
but whether on account of his own safety or because of the ludicrous
attitude of the besiegers, was beyond their comprehension. In his short
captivity he had taken a fancy to the Professor, on whom he kept his
eyes constantly. It was evident that more than the usual interest was
displayed in watching his movements. From the first there was no
sulkiness in the chief, nor did he exhibit any moroseness, or anything
which indicated a spirit of revenge.

The kind and simple act of binding his wounds and making him comfortable
seemed to amend for everything. Occasionally the Professor would go to
him, and examine the wound, and sometimes pat him on the back--actions
which he seemed to understand. No doubt the Professor had a motive in
all this, as we shall probably see. The boys knew that he understood
human nature in all its aspects, and that in this, as in other things,
they felt he was merely preparing the way to utilize him in the future.

They were now on the western shore of West River, and when they had
their full share of laughter at the deluded enemies, preparations were
made for a start. But where to? Directly to the east were the three
hostile tribes, and that direction was impossible. The Professor
attempted another conversation with the chief. As all were preparing for
the start, he pointed to the north, and at this the chief shook his head
to indicate disapproval. When he motioned toward the south it was even a
more vigorous negative. Here was a dilemma. What did he mean by such
peculiar actions?

The start was delayed to give them an opportunity to discuss the evident
meaning of their captive. While this was going on Harry's attention was
directed to their old camp. Their late enemies had discovered the ruse,
and were now rushing to beat down the pretended wagon.

"See the party on the north side of the river. I suppose that is a
scouting party and they found out our little joke," and George again
burst into laughter at the scene.

The chief was interested now. The party from the north came into view,
and after passing up the river for a quarter of a mile or more, dashed
across, and came back on the same side of the stream that the late
besiegers occupied.

"See, they are fighting each other. What does it all mean?"

"It simply means," answered the Professor, "that the other tribe, or one
of the other tribes on the island, sent for reinforcements, and are now
taking a hand."

The chief was consulted and asked by signs whether the attacking party
from the north side was his own people, and he shook his head in the
negative. This proved, beyond doubt, that at least three different
people inhabited the island to the south and southeast.

"What puzzles me," said the Professor, "is the fact that our chief
opposes our traveling to the north and to the south as well."

"Do you think there are any tribes on this side of the river?"

"That is the only inference I can draw from his actions."

A battle was in progress in the underbrush beyond the river. The
attacking forces were numerically superior, and within an hour had
driven their opponents far to the south, and the successful tribe could
be plainly seen, as they searched the hills to find the bodies of
victims, and to gather the trophies of their victory.

"We might as well go north on our way home, as directly to the east,"
was the final remark of the Professor.

The boys were actually startled at this sudden announcement. But when he
pointed out that their ammunition was very low, owing to the fierce
resistance which they had to make, the wisdom of the course appealed to
them.

"I am glad to go," was Harry's immediate response, "because when we come
back next time we'll have something that will give the whole lot a
better argument than we offered them this time."

[Illustration: _Fig. 5. Savage's Hut._]

The yaks started for the north, and the chief's eyes gave a warning
look, which they did not heed at that time. They afterwards remembered
how portentous that look was. All that day, over broken ground, and a
rough, hilly country, the team laboriously made its way. The best that
could be done over such a country was two and a half miles an hour.

Late in the afternoon the party were startled on coming in sight of
numerous small huts, and a larger hut at one side of the cluster of
smaller ones. The approach was so unexpected that in spite of their
efforts, the team could not be turned around before their approach was
heralded throughout the tribal village.

Here was the first view of the homes of the natives. The huts were very
crude, and were devoid of windows, all of them built round with more or
less pointed or conical tops.

"Those huts don't look like the ones we saw to the south on the day we
had our first fight," was George's opinion.

"You are correct in that, and if you notice, the people look
differently, as well. What is that? I believe they have firearms." The
Professor's brow gathered, as he said this, because now, that the alarm
had been given, the warriors were running to and fro, and among them
were several who carried guns.

The wagon was hurriedly put into a posture of defense, and the cattle
protected as best they could. They approached cautiously, and the
Professor walked forward and held out his hand in token of friendliness.
They withdrew a short distance for consultation. This gave the party an
opportunity to study the new people.

The first thing noticed was the entire difference in the clothing worn.
The other tribes had nothing but the breech clout, but these had other
garments, and their skin was darker in color.

"I am afraid we shall have trouble in a fight with these people, because
their guns are first-class make," said Harry.

"You need have no fear of their guns," answered the Professor.

The boys looked at him wonderingly, as he continued: "They may have had
ammunition in the past, but it is evident that they have none now. See
how the fellows who have the guns carry them. They use them like
spears."

They finally turned from their conference, and without a word or sign
opened hostilities with a volley of arrows. The gage of battle had been
thrown down. It was fortunate that the warriors were few in comparison
with their last enemies. Not more than twenty were counted as they were
waiting for the result of the consultation.

This challenge could not well be misunderstood, and the Professor gave
the word to fire. Every shot took effect, and the result was a startling
one for the savages. Without waiting for the second round they broke and
fled, rushing down past the large hut and through the village,
gathering, as they went, the women and children which had previously
grouped together to witness the fight. This was too much for the boys,
who rushed down after them, followed by John and the Professor, until
the large hut was reached.




CHAPTER V

THE RESCUE OF THE CAPTIVE BOYS


The boys were chattering and whooping as they ran, to the immense
amusement of the Professor. They had converted themselves into regular
American Indians for the occasion, and tried to imitate the yells of the
savages who had attacked them the previous day.

Passing the large hut which stood in the foreground, the boys imagined
they heard a cry from within. Possibly it was a lure, and the Professor
advised them not to be too rash.

"Here we are; inside the hut; hurrah for the United States." The boys
looked at each other in amazement. The Professor, too, was puzzled.
Cautiously approaching the opening, the Professor called out: "Who is
there!"

Instantly came the cry from two voices: "We are American boys who were
captured by the savages." Nothing more was needed for the impetuosity of
George and Harry. With the bolos the enclosure was soon cut away, and
they rushed in, but the Professor and John remained outside.

In one corner, and tied to stanchions which had been driven in the
ground, were two boys, badly emaciated, and covered with filth and rags.
When the ropes that bound them were cut away and assisted to rise they
were too weak to stand without support.

"We are so hungry."

"How long have you been here?" asked Harry, excitedly.

"We don't know, but more than two weeks. We were captured by another
tribe and in the last fight were taken from the ones who first captured
us."

"Come out into the light," and Harry and George each put his arms around
one of the boys, and as they came out looked at the Professor and John
in astonishment too strong for words.

In the excitement they broke down and wept, and well they might. Our
boys were touched beyond description, and John went up to them and put
his arms around them, and this act so affected Harry and George that
they too joined the boys in tears that could not be kept back.

The Professor was moved, as he turned away to hide his feelings, but he
recovered, and with a great show of unconcern, exclaimed: "Back to the
wagon, as quickly as possible." This brought them to a realization of
their position, and Harry and George almost carried the boys toward the
wagon, while John and the Professor lingered behind.

He had anticipated the return of the savages, and surmising that a still
larger force might be within calling distance, did not consider it
prudent to tarry long at that spot. It was well that they did not
remain, as the rescued boys informed the Professor that the main body
was beyond the ridge, and not more than several miles away unless they
were on the warpath.

[Illustration: "'_Come out into the light,' and Harry and George each
put his arms around one of the boys_" [See p. 62]]

There was no time for many words. When the poor boys reached the wagon
another surprise was in store for them, as they gazed on the wounded
chief, who was bound in the wagon.

The savages did not go far beyond the village, and this was observed by
the Professor, and was the moving cause of his sharp order when the boys
were brought out. While Harry and John were engaged in turning the team
around, George hurriedly set food before the famished boys, and they
were cautioned against taking too much. They were really almost starved,
and their appearance plainly showed the treatment they had received.

The Professor called out: "They are coming; have all the guns ready."
Before they had fully taken all of the food the boys begged to be
allowed to assist in the defense, and George was thoughtful enough to
recognize the fact that the guns they had were not like the
breech-loaders, and without wasting time told the boys how they were
manipulated.

"Where did you get these funny-looking guns?" asked one of the boys.

"We made them," was the reply, and the boys looked at each other and
gasped in surprise.

Beyond, the savages were gathering, and moving forwardly, evidently with
a view of attacking. The Professor turned to the boys and asked them
whether the natives had guns, and they answered that when they were
captured they saw a half dozen old weapons, but had never used them, as,
apparently, there was no ammunition. Where the savages obtained them
was a mystery. They believed the weapons were used as charms, to aid
them against their enemies, and that belief gained ground from the fact
that thus far the tribes, in whose territory they now were, had been
victorious in every battle that had been fought for the past year.

This was indeed interesting news, and probably the actions of the
wounded chief, in appearing to discourage the trip to the north, had
some relation to this belief.

The gathering warriors could be seen plainly, coming over the hill,
beyond the village, and gathered in a mass near the hut from which the
boys had been taken. A conference was in progress, which did not appear
to be harmonious, but eventually the party moved forward and divided
into three sections, with the view of enveloping the position of the
Professor and his party.

"They will attempt to surround us, and we shall now have to attack them
by assaulting one party at a time. As suggested in our previous
encounters, the five guns must always be kept as a reserve for the last
emergency. Fire and then reload, and we should attack one of the parties
at a time, so the greatest execution at any one point will be most
likely to cause the greatest effect. Fire with the utmost care and
deliberation. Three will fire at a time, and then, after an interval,
three more can fire, first at one party and then at the next. Such a
course will be most likely to throw them into confusion. Furthermore,
care should be taken that all do not fire at the same individual. The
one on my left should aim at the one in the party to the left, and the
one firing on my right should select some one in the group to the right
of the center, while the center of our firing squad will aim at the
center of their band."

These precautions were necessary with the new recruits. The two firing
squads were arranged in this order: The Professor, with George and one
of the boys at his sides, and John with Harry and the other boy
assisting him.

The position of the wagon was a strong one, as it was flanked near both
ends by large trees, and it was fortunate that no large trees grew near
them, the position having been selected with the object of defense in
view; but they were liable to attack from all sides, which made the
position more difficult.

The two flanking parties made their way carefully around, and at a
signal, a rush was made. The Professor ordered the first volley, and
three fell. This immediately checked the attacking party on that side,
but the other did not stop, and after deliberately holding their fire
until they came up much nearer, a fair target was obtained, and the
order to fire was repeated.

The Professor had anticipated a rush from the center party, but the
terrible effect of the two rounds had demoralized them. The reserve guns
were ready had it been necessary, and without waiting for the renewal of
an attack the guns were reloaded, and Harry and George took it upon
themselves to load the boys' guns during the interim.

The besieged played a waiting game. With ten shots at their command they
felt sure of being able to withstand anything but a rush, and even in
that case, they had the bolos and the spears all within reach. It was an
extremely hazardous, but not the most dangerous, position, since six
fighting men, in a safe position, could not be easily overcome, as the
Professor explained, and this gave all the boys the greatest confidence.

The flanking parties withdrew, and joined the others, taking with them
the wounded. Two hours of quiet reigned. The night, which was now
approaching, was the most dangerous period, and they appreciated the
insecurity of the position to withstand a night attack.

The river was to their right, and not more than two miles away, and the
boys saw the Professor frequently look in that direction. "I believe,"
he finally said, "we can better afford to take the risk of a daylight
trip to the river, than to remain here another minute. The lesson we
gave is rankling within them, and they will attack us with different
tactics the next time."

The yokes were still on the yaks, and it was the work of moments only to
bring them to the pole and when the ring had been slipped on Harry had
them in motion down the hill. The Professor and John dismounted, and
stood guard, and Harry was told to move directly toward the river and
pass to the right of a hill, which appeared to have a precipitous side,
which was not more than a half mile away.

The parting injunction of the Professor was: "Go on without stopping
until you reach the clump of trees before you and just beyond the little
stream in your path. That will give you a good view of every approach."

The wagon went down the hill at a rapid pace. The Professor and John
kept a vigilant watch on their enemies, and it was not long before the
disappearance of the wagon was noted, and then the utmost excitement
prevailed. It was evident that there was no concerted movement among
them. There was an aimless running to and fro, but the two stood there,
guns in hand, and that no doubt disconcerted the natives, who evidently
believed that the wagon had been removed to a more advantageous
position.

The inaction did not continue long, for it was now noticed that parties
of two and three stole out from the shelter of the huts, some going to
the north and others to the south, with a view of surrounding and spying
the new position. The wagon was beyond the sight of their position on
the hill, and after John had looked inquiringly at the Professor several
times, both began a forward movement after the wagon, and by proceeding
at a rapid pace discerned it in the distance.

After crossing the little stream referred to by the Professor, both
halted, in order to scour the country behind them. John clutched the
Professor by the sleeve and pointed to several moving figures to their
left, cautiously moving up the hill to the position previously occupied
by the wagon.

This was a great relief, as it was evident the savages had no idea that
the wagon was in full retreat toward the river. Moving cautiously from
tree to tree the Professor and John traveled as rapidly as possible in
the direction of the wagon, and the boys were commended for their
forethought in keeping the wagon in a hidden position while awaiting
their arrival.

"It looks as though we had outwitted them, at any rate for the time
being, and it will keep them back long enough to enable us to get a good
start, so hurry on as fast as possible. Make for the side of the hill
which I pointed out before. If they discover our absence, and can gather
their forces we may be able to use the precipitous side of the hill as a
protection. But remember, the river is our objective point."

No urging was needed. On the way the second stream or running brook was
crossed. Harry called to one of the boys: "Get some of the copper
kettles from the wagon and get some water. If we are held up at the hill
the yaks will need it, as well as ourselves." George and the boys
recognized the importance of it, and weak as the two rescued boys were,
they dragged the filled kettles to the wagon, and George fastened the
wooden covers on them.

Within ten minutes more the hill was reached. It was not high nor
difficult to mount, and at one point it seemed to spring up into a peak,
the southern side of the point presenting a steep outline. The boys saw
that on the side facing the river, which was less than a mile away, the
precipitous portion was formed by a wall of peculiar brownish-gray
rock.

Behind this rocky fortress the wagon was driven, and the first care of
Harry was to water the animals, as they had not been allowed to quench
their thirst on the way. They waited an hour or more for the appearance
of the Professor and John. George went out on a quest back over the
trail which they had just made, and almost reached the stream before he
caught sight of them lurking through the trees and shrubbery.

They were relieved to know that the wagon was in safety, and after the
stream was crossed the three delayed no longer, but hurried rapidly
forward and soon reached the wagon, to the great relief of Harry and the
boys.

"Let us haste to the river," was the Professor's hurried order, as he
came up, and the yaks were at once urged forward, but as he passed the
rocky wall, he cried out: "Wait, let us examine this first."

The boys knew that if, in such an emergency, he could call a halt, the
appearance of the rock would reveal something that might be of value.
The action of the Professor attracted the attention of John at once, and
he turned to the wall and glanced along its face in an inquiring manner,
and as he did so wandered along the rocky outline in a curious manner.

While the Professor was engaged in examining the formation John came
back hurriedly into sight, in considerable agitation, and running up to
Harry, grasped him by the arm and led him back. Harry followed,
intensely interested, and the other boys also noted the movement and
rushed over to the narrow trail which they had taken.

As they rounded a corner John and Harry had disappeared, and George was
astounded. In a moment more Harry ran back and cried out: "Tell the
Professor to come, quickly."

He appeared, as the unusual sight of the boys running after John had
already attracted his attention, and when the boys reached the second
turn and saw the Professor coming up, the latter was curious to know
what the commotion meant.

"It means," answered Harry, "that we have found another cave."

The entrance was to the left, and was so hidden by shrubbery that only
the utmost scrutiny enabled them to distinguish it.

They gazed at each other in astonishment. George was the first to speak:
"Why wouldn't this be a good place to hide?"

There was no answer, but John heard, and immediately shook his head, and
the Professor, not noticing this motion of John during his intent
examination of the entrance, turned around and said: "We must leave this
place as quickly as possible."

This startled all of them into activity at once, and they made a rush
for the team, with John in the lead. Without a moment's loss of time,
the way was made down the hill, and the Professor and John took up their
positions as rear guards.

"Drive directly to the open space at the bank to the left, and unhitch
the team."

The boys heard and started forward, urging them along as fast as the
condition of the ground would permit, and within fifteen minutes had the
team ranged behind the wagon in a manner similar to their previous
training for the purposes of defense.

"I think one of you boys and George had better go back and assist in
case they are pursuing," and Ralph, the stronger of the two,
volunteered, and after taking a new supply of ammunition, followed back
in time to see a number of lurking savages on the hill beyond the last
stream.

The escape had been discovered, and the savages collecting their forces
were in full pursuit. In an incredibly short space of time the shelving
path along the rocky wall, adjacent the cave, was filled with warriors,
who could now plainly see the wagon at the brink of the river, and the
Professor and John soon appeared and urged haste back to the wagon.

Ralph ventured the opinion that while there might be fifty or more in
the party, he was sure that a still greater number were available, and
when Tom, the other boy, was appealed to, replied that there must be
considerably more than one hundred, if not a hundred and fifty in the
tribe who might be mustered to attack them.

When the wagon was reached all were cautioned not to waste any
ammunition, as they had but little to spare. The savages came up and
took position far beyond the range of the guns, and the open space
afforded them a much better protection than would have been available,
even at the hill.

It was evident, however, to George and Harry, that John and the
Professor had some other reason for urging the sudden departure from the
mouth of the cave. Neither could have seen the savages approaching from
that point, and they noticed the two looking at each other when the
savages made their appearance in front of the cave.

There was no time for questionings now. Would they attempt an attack? It
was past midday, and hunger had been forgotten. While both of the
rescued boys had kept within the wagon as much as possible during their
flight from the hills, they were very weak, and had been given food in
small quantities, so as to accustom their contracted stomachs to the
stimulating action of the nutriment.

Within an hour new parties approached from the rear. Reinforcements were
coming, and they probably intended to delay the attack until the entire
force was available. This looked very serious indeed, but through all
the Professor was grave and dignified, and showed no evidences of being
unduly disturbed at the gathering clans.

"What we need fear more than anything else now is a night attack," was
the Professor's comment, as he watched their movements.

Ralph stepped up to the Professor, and said: "I do not think they will
venture to do so, because I do not remember that they have ever
attempted to do so at night. The tribe that captured us always made
night sorties, but these people never did, and for that reason I do not
believe they will attempt it now."

The Professor thanked Ralph for the information.




CHAPTER VI

THE TALE OF THE RESCUED BOYS


Night set in without a sign of attack. The heavens were filled with
stars, but there was no moon, and this afforded a cover for both
parties.

And now, when they were at last quiet for the first time since the
release of the boys from their loathsome captivity, all were eager to
hear their history.

Harry and John had both learned during the snatches of conversation that
they were able to take advantage of, that Ralph and Tom were companions
on the ill-fated _Investigator_, when she went down. They were not
remembered at the hut, and neither of the boys recalled the others,
because the emaciated condition of the two was such as to make
recognition impossible, and Ralph and Tom were too much excited to know
or care who had delivered them, but they recognized the Professor before
it dawned on them that the two boys were their former companions.

But let us listen to the tale as Ralph told it: "We were on the after
part of the ship at the time the explosion took place. It was between
nine and ten at night. The explosion seemed to break the ship in two,
and an officer, a seaman, and three of my companions, including Tom
here, launched one of the boats, and when it was apparent that the
vessel was sinking, the officer ordered the boat away. We saw two of
the lifeboats, and made for the nearest one, when the wave from the
sinking ship nearly overturned us. Soon after a heavy fog covered
everything, and when that disappeared a high wind arose, and the sea
became choppy and the froth was blown over us so that all became
drenched."

"All that tallies exactly with our experience," remarked George.

"Instead of decreasing the wind grew more furious during the following
day, and Tom and myself became very ill and helpless. When I recovered
consciousness there was only Tom and another companion in sight, and
neither of them knew what happened, or how the others disappeared. We
were lashed to the boat, and just before I became unconscious I
remembered that the seaman gave me some biscuits and canned meat, as
well as a flask of water, and those I found beside me when I awoke.
During the night Tom also awoke and began to rave, and I tried to quiet
him, and after making a number of trials found the locker and gave him
some stimulating medicines, which you will remember were put up and in
the use of which we were instructed. Our other companion died of
exposure the fourth day."

"Weren't the others lashed to the boat?"

"I don't remember. How many days we were washed by the sea I do not
know, but it must have been fully a week, and we were both entirely
exhausted, when something happened to our boat, and everything appeared
motionless, but still I could hear a terrific roaring sound. When I
regained my senses, I recognized Tom bending over me, and the first
words I remember were: 'I thought you would never come to again.' I
learned that we had been cast ashore the night before, and we could see
the wrecked parts of our lifeboat strewn all about, as the winds had
died down, but the sea was still running high."

Harry looked at him eagerly: "Didn't you save your boat or any part of
it?" And George was almost at the limit of nervous tension as he leaned
forward and waited for the reply.

"No; our boat was crushed beyond all hope of recovery. We did not find
any of the food stored in it, and when we were able to leave the beach
on which we were thrown, we saw that not fifty feet to the left of us
was the first of a series of rocky projections running to the west,
against which we were no doubt landed when carried up by the immense
breaker."

"Have you any idea where you landed--that is, on what part of the
island?" was the Professor's first question.

"I haven't the slightest idea, for reasons which you will now learn."

"But," broke in Tom, "don't forget to relate what we saw the first day,
before we had gotten a half mile from the shore."

"Yes; I was coming to that. We were both hungry, and we wandered first
along the seashore, and then finding nothing that would answer for food,
went inland, and noticed all about us different kinds of vegetables,
none of which we recognized, and finally some berries. We were so
hungry that we ate and ate as fast as we could gather them, and felt
much better for a time; but along in the afternoon, we heard voices, and
soon a number of savages came in sight. We were paralyzed with fear.
They were almost entirely naked, and what gave us the greatest fright
was the appearance of a captive they were dragging along, with his hands
bound behind him."

"Was it a white man?"

"We did not know it at the time, but we afterwards learned, as I will
tell you, that he was a white man, and that he was taken over to the
main camp to be offered up as a sacrifice."

"Did you recognize the particular tribe that had the captive?"

"Not at that time, because we did not know that each tribe had its own
distinctive dress. But later on we learned which tribe it was."

The Professor drew up the mattress and brought out two different
articles of headgear that had been taken four days before. "Do you
recognize either of these?"

The boys started. "Yes; this belongs to the tribe that first captured
us. See that row of shells, and this colored band. That is the principal
distinguishing feature aside from the hair. This hair is a dark brown,
and all of the tribe wear that kind because their bitterest enemies have
that kind of hair, and they seem to take a delight in slaying an enemy
solely for the purpose of getting the hair necessary to make up the head
ornament with."

"I noticed that the hair of the people who are around us now is very
black and curly."

"Yes; this other headdress is made principally from the hair of our
enemies outside. Where did you get it?"

"We captured it," answered the Professor, "in one of the fights we had
several days ago."

"At the time you captured the chief here?"

"Yes. And while we are on the subject, I wish you would see if you
recognize the headdress of the chief we have here."

Ralph looked it over, and to the surprise of all announced that he had
never seen that kind before.

"How many tribes do you think are on the island?" was George's question.

"Probably a half dozen or more. Our means for learning these things were
very limited, although we have had a close acquaintance with them for
the past six months."

"Before you go on with your story I want to ask a question or two," said
the Professor, as he glanced at John. "Did you ever come across a large
river, like this one, and which flowed in a different direction, say, to
the east?"

Neither of the boys remembered such a stream.

"Have you ever been near the range of mountains which we can see to the
east of us?"

"Oh, yes; we were taken way down west of those mountains. After seeing
the captors a safe distance away, we started in an opposite direction,
and found ourselves on a little stream of water, and picked out a
resting place on one shore among the bush where a little overhanging
hill offered some shelter. Before night both of us became very ill, and
had taken to vomiting, and then imagined that the berries had poisoned
us. For two days we lay there, almost too weak to move, and afraid to
venture out, on account of the savages. We found nuts and ate sparingly
at first, as our stomachs were too weak to permit us to take much at a
time. Then we found some things like sweet potatoes, and Tom had a box
of matches which was a great boon to us."

"Well, that is better than we had when we landed," and George laughed at
the reminiscence.

"In our wanderings we lost all trace of time, of distance and of
direction. We knew that the sun came from the east and set in the west,
and we knew that the shadow of the sun was thrown to the north at noon,
but it didn't make much difference to us which way we went."

George couldn't help interrupting: "Why, don't you know we are south of
the equator, and that at noon the sun throws its shadow to the south?"

"In our condition we didn't stop to consider any of those things. We
were mostly hungry, and tired with wandering. We thought the proper
thing would be to go north, and so we traveled in that direction. As it
now turns out we went to the south, and marched right into the heart of
the occupied part of the island. For months we evaded capture. On one
occasion we stumbled on the camp of a lot of savages who were
sacrificing a victim."

"Was he a white man?"

"We did not know, and could not stop to inquire, but it is more than
probable that it was a captive from some other tribe, as that is a
common and universal practice. They never spare a captive. In our own
case, we knew what to expect, and our only salvation was that the time
for these sacrifices took place only at certain periods, or to
commemorate events at which the offering is made to their gods at
special seasons of the year. Of course we did not know when that
particular period would come in our case, but we knew what captivity
meant, and we often wished to be put out of our suspense."

The Professor here interrupted: "The matter of commemorating certain
events or circumstances is something which comes down through the
history of all peoples from the most ancient periods. In the case of the
Israelites, it is said that they brought out the brazen serpent, which
Moses commanded to be kept in the ark for a memory, and offered before
it. Dixon, in his 'History of the Church of England,' states that it was
the universal custom in the early period of the church to demand
memories to be celebrated, and Spenser's tales refer to the
commemorations by

     'Their memories, their singing and their gifts.'

But proceed, Ralph."

"After several months of hunted life we became expert at eluding our
enemies, but we were hungry and starving many a time, and once we were
so much reduced to the starvation point that we boldly but stealthily
entered a village in order to capture food, and escaped. About two
months ago we were unfortunate enough to wander between two conflicting
forces, and in the attempt to escape, were finally taken by the victors
and conducted to their village in grand style. From our appearance it
was probably difficult to judge whether we were white or black, but as
we had the freedom of a small space adjoining our hut, and were encamped
by the running stream, where water was handy, we had an opportunity to
take a bath, which so changed our appearance that the natives could
hardly believe we were the same captives they had taken two days before.
We since learned that this alteration in our appearance is what caused
them to postpone the sacrifice. They are intensely superstitious, and
could not understand why the transformation had been made. Then the
round silver match box which Tom incautiously exhibited, excited their
curiosity, and its glitter attracted them, so that everything we had was
taken away, particularly the buttons which we had about us."

"That," remarked the Professor, "is also a trait common with all
savages, to regard all articles which have a luster, as a charm. The
Druids, in ancient times, used balls of crystal as part of their
superstitious worship, and even in the present day, in our own civilized
country, we have plenty of people who have an idea that hypnotism can be
brought about by gazing at a brightly polished sphere. It can be seen
how much these articles are prized by a low order of people, because of
the varied colors which are formed at the different parts of the
globular surface. It is for the same reason that the eye becomes the
most attractive part of the human form, and why some are actually
overcome by a piercing glance, or subdued by the genial beams of a
kindly eye."

"But I have little more to add to the tale. We were kindly treated by
those people, and given a greater share of liberty as time wore on, and
when the watchfulness was not so keen we took the first opportunity
offered, to escape, and after wandering about from place to place, often
without food, we were almost ready to return and throw ourselves on
their mercy. For fully a month we kept out of their way, and when we saw
them coming, and knew what a struggle we would have to elude them
without food, we boldly marched into the midst of the warriors, only to
find that we had been hiding from an entirely different tribe of
savages. The knowledge of this made us desperate, but we were hungry,
and we had read of instances where men had acted boldly when in great
danger from enemies; so that we concealed our fears, and demanded
something to eat. Catching sight of a roast fowl we took it from the
spit on which it was hanging, and began to eat it without asking leave,
and with an air of superiority that simply stunned them. The chief came
forward; dangling from a chain on his neck was a watch. Tom went toward
him, looked at it and quietly took it in his hand, without a protest. As
he pressed the stem the case flew open, and the chief started back in
wonder and surprise. This performance so new and startling to him was a
fortunate occurrence for us. Tom saw the effect of his action, and then
wound the watch. When he put the timepiece to the ear of the chief, he
became frightened and tore the chain from his neck in terror. The
ticking timepiece was then carried around to the assembled warriors, who
exhibited the same fear at its 'talking.' An ample supply of food was
then instantly set before us, and Tom went up to the chief, and tried to
tell him what the instrument was for, and turned the hands to midday to
show how it would tell the time of day. He finally put the chain around
the savage's neck, which the latter permitted."

"Did the watch have any mark by which it could be identified?"

"Nothing but the initials 'J L V' on the inside of the case."

"J L V," cried Harry and George in unison, as they looked at John. Ralph
and Tom in turn stared at the boys in amazement.

"Do you know whose watch it is?" asked Tom.

"Not positively; but we believe it belongs to John here," said Harry, as
he delved down in his pocket and brought out the silver match safe he
had found after the attack at the river.

When he held it up Ralph glanced at it, and declared that the monogram
was a perfect copy of the one on the watch.

This was, indeed, getting interesting to the Professor, as he motioned
to Ralph to proceed.

"We were with this tribe nearly two weeks, and were treated like
brothers. Bows and arrows were given us, and we became a part of their
fighting force, but, unfortunately, they were a small and weak tribe,
and when several weeks ago the devils around us pounced down upon us,
half of them were killed and we were made prisoners. The others who were
captured with us were sacrificed last week, and our turn would
undoubtedly have been the next, as we had been captured fighting against
them."

This narrative greatly impressed the boys, and it showed what suffering
they had undergone, and they could not help but contrast their lot with
that of their unfortunate companions.

The story made clear another thing: That there must have been another
boatload of their wrecked ship on the island.




CHAPTER VII

THE ESCAPE IN THE NIGHT


The waiting savages showed no disposition to attack under cover of
darkness. Everything was quiet, and with reinforcements no doubt would
resume the aggressive in the morning. It was approaching midnight and no
one had retired. All were too busy listening and retailing stories to
think of sleep.

But they now had to consider the important things connected with their
immediate security. Various plans were suggested, but none seemed to
meet the conditions, and the Professor suggested that it might be well
to make a careful reconnoiter of the enemy before deciding on a course.
Harry and the Professor took up the guns, and John, divining the object,
grasped one of the guns and held back both. He disappeared from the
wagon on the side facing the river, and then slowly worked his way
around toward the encircling band.

When he had gone less than a hundred feet toward a point directly
abreast of the wagon, so that he was moving at right angles to the shore
line, he disappeared, and they could readily understand how his
crouching attitude would enable him to approach closely without being
recognized.

He was absent more than a half hour, and although the watchers in the
wagon kept up a vigilant guard in every direction, John reappeared, and
was almost at the wagon before he was noticed. He had returned by way of
the north bank of the stream, and entered the wagon on the same side
from which he had left.

As stated previously, the extreme height of the wagon bed enabled them
to make a small closet-like enclosure, which would not expose any light,
and to this place the Professor drew John, and lighting the lamp the
latter showed by signs that no savages were in the immediate vicinity.

The Professor by signs motioned that they should take up their flight
along the bed of the stream, and to this John gave his immediate
approval. The boys were informed of the decision, and all consented. It
would certainly take them nearer home, and delay would mean only waste
of ammunition, and if a fight was necessary they were as well able to
defend themselves by night as by day.

As silently as possible the yaks were put in marching order, and John,
without a word, started off ahead, keeping well to the left, and at a
considerable distance from the river bed, and thus acted as a scout for
the party.

To their astonishment their progress was not opposed, and for more than
an hour the quiet movement was kept up. Before them was a mass of
undergrowth, which seemed to come nearer the river than at any other
place on their route, and John approached the wagon and signaled a halt.

The Professor went forward, and without a word John started for the
underbrush, the Professor following. They passed entirely through
without any signs of the savages, and as they returned and emerged from
the other side, John tried to give the Professor some advice, but the
darkness prevented him from grasping his ideas. As a last resort John
went up to a small tree and made the motions of cutting it down, and it
at once dawned on him that a raft should be built, and this so impressed
the Professor as a wise course that they hurriedly returned to the
wagon.

"Boys, get the bolos at once, and drive the wagon forward until I tell
you to stop. Harry and George follow John, and cut poles for a raft. We
must cross the stream. While you are doing this I will examine the river
bank and find the best place to launch our raft."

"What," exclaimed Ralph, "are you going to make a raft large enough to
float the wagon on?"

"No," said Harry, "but we intend to make the wagon a part of the raft,"
and he hurriedly told them how they had forded the stream before.

Before they had an opportunity to cut many of the poles the Professor
appeared with the welcome information that he had found an immense pile
of driftwood not far below, and this was communicated to John as best
they could and the Professor took him by the arm and led him to the
river bank and sent Harry up to bring down the team.

The accumulated mass was a fortune to them, as the wood was
comparatively dry, and singling out the most available pieces, the
material was ready within a half hour, and the shallowest shelving part
of the beach selected for the launching.

It was singular that during all these proceedings not the least sign was
heard of their pursuers. It could not be possible that they had given up
the chase, but it seemed so. The party now consisted of six, and Harry
had doubts of the sufficiency of the floating timbers to sustain them,
but this fear was dispelled as the noble yaks slowly drew the wagon
forward, and it was found that it floated.

By repeated urging the stream was soon crossed, and when the wagon had
been denuded of the logs, they were in as good condition as before to go
on. As on the previous occasion, they pushed out from the river, as fast
as the darkness would permit, and soon came to gently ascending land,
and finally the underbrush appeared, when the Professor called a halt.

"This will take us far enough from the view of the savages, and we must
make camp and get some rest for the morrow may be a trying day."

As nearly as could be determined it was two o'clock in the morning and
the watches were appointed so that two would be on guard, for an hour at
each watch. The morning came too soon for all of them. It had been a
strenuous time for all and a particularly joyous one for the two boys.

An early start was not necessary. They were about a quarter of a mile
from the river, and as the light broke were surprised to find that the
camp was selected at a peculiarly secluded spot. Their first subject of
conversation was concerning the natives. They were nowhere in sight,
but shortly afterwards John pointed to the right, and there plainly seen
were the entire tribe waiting along the shore of a tributary which
flowed into the stream from the west.

[Illustration: _Fig. 6._]

"It is now plain to me why they were fooled," and the Professor laughed
at the situation. They evidently knew that sooner or later the wagon
must make its appearance and attempt to ford the stream, and that would
be their opportunity.

"They are certainly smart in some things, and particularly with regard
to the character of the streams. That tributary is very deep and they
counted on that giving us trouble."

"Why do you know it is a deep and not a shallow stream?"

"The conformation of the shores indicate that. It can generally be
determined in this way: If the sides of the ground near the shore are
steep, it is pretty sure to make a contracted channel, and that means
depth. On the other hand, if the beach is sloping the stream may be
wide, but is always shallow at that point. See the steep sides running
close down to the mouth?"

[Illustration: _Fig. 7. Shallow Stream._]

The savages did not wait long for the supposed appearance of the wagon,
but the scouting parties cautiously spread out and moved up the stream.
They passed through the thick undergrowth where John and the Professor
had passed the night before and were, apparently, nonplussed at the
disappearance.

This recalled the former experience farther up the river, and all had a
merry laugh at the discomfiture. They saw the tracks of the wagon, and
it ceased at the undergrowth, and this was the puzzling feature to them,
but in time the tracks were followed up leading to the river bank, and
the evidences of the driftwood all about was sufficient information to
them to stop all further pursuit.

"What should we do if they attempt to cross?" was George's inquiry.

"That would be our chance to go for them," responded Harry.

They remained on the bank for two hours, constantly looking across for
signs of the retreating wagon, and then slowly filtered back through the
woods beyond.

"Isn't this the place we saw the lights during our first trip to the
river?" asked Harry.

"No," answered the Professor; "we were fully six or eight miles north of
this point, but it might be some tribes are found that far down the
river."

Breakfast had been forgotten in the interesting watching of their
enemies, and when they had fully disappeared from view the party had an
opportunity for the first time in a whole week to get a sample of cooked
food.

"I am sorry to say," said George, "that we haven't any fresh meat, and
the best we can do is coffee and corned beef."

Harry and John had their guns in an instant, and started out on the
quest for food.

"Where did you get the coffee and corned beef?" asked Ralph.

"We put up the beef ourselves, and there is plenty of this kind of
coffee on the island."

"But you have sugar, too."

"Yes; we made that and also have plenty of honey."

This was surprising information for the boys.

"But how did you make the guns? Where did you get the iron?"

"We dug it out of the ground and put up our own foundry, and have a
water wheel and a machine shop."

All this was said with a show of pardonable pride; and he continued:
"Wait until you see where we live and how we have things fixed up."

The shots which were plainly heard indicated something good to eat, and
before the hunters arrived the stove was removed from the wagon, and
George had a good fire started.

A woodchuck and two pheasants were the trophies. What a feast they made.
The chief was now inclined to be more communicative. The neat trick of
crossing the river was a most enjoyable spectacle for him, and he tried
to exhibit his delight. Ralph and Tom didn't have much use for him; as
they were no doubt thinking of the miseries that the islanders had given
them, and the Professor smiled as he appreciated their feelings.

The disposition of the warrior was a leading subject of discussion, and
some favored letting him go, but he was not in a condition to travel,
and they were now fully ten miles or more from the point where he was
captured. Humanity prompted them to take him with them rather than set
him adrift in his condition, which might mean exposure to his enemies,
and as a result the subject was dropped.

Red Angel was a source of wonder to the boys. He had so many attractive
ways, and it was the first time that either had been thrown into close
association with such an animal, and besides Angel was not an ordinary
orang. He had been educated, and it amused the boys to see how much
intelligence he exhibited when he was told to do certain things.

After the meal the march was taken up, and Harry, ever solicitous for
his team, as he called them, was anxious to get water for them. He was
assured that during the day they would without doubt cross some of the
streams which they had previously found in that section of the country.

While thus moving along Ralph and Tom were inexpressively happy at their
liberty. Weak as they were they frequently got out of the wagon,
trudging along, running races with Angel, and jolly as boys out of
school.

And this gives the first opportunity to describe them. Ralph was tall,
and strongly built, but his emaciated frame did not show his full
strength. Tom, on the other hand, was shorter and bulkier, so that the
two boys were really the counterparts physically, of Harry and George,
respectively. Both were educated fully up to their years like the
average youths who had graduated from the high school.

Tom was the most observant of the two, and in that respect resembled
George, and as they moved through the forest and over the table land, he
would frequently stop and look around, and finally went to the Professor
and said: "This part of the island looks very familiar to me." Then
calling to Tom, he continued: "Isn't this the place we traveled through
after we were wrecked?"

Tom looked about him, and finally answered: "It does look familiar like.
We came from that direction." And he pointed to the north.

"If that is the case you landed on the island fifty miles west of our
position, and it is a remarkable thing that we never ran across your
tracks," answered the Professor.

The wagon was driven forward slowly, because there was now no need for
haste. The part of the country through which they were passing was free
from savages, so there was no anxiety from that source, and the
Professor, as well as the boys, took delight in examining the country
through which they passed, and in trying to discover new vegetables and
fruit, as well as learning all about the mineral resources of the
different sections.

Before night they came to a small stream, which was an admirable camping
spot, and the yaks fairly reveled in the sweet, fresh water. There was
no hesitancy in building a fire for the evening meal, and the hunting
bags showed a good supply of game. That evening sitting under the great
southern dome, with its glittering stars, the Professor had a most
attentive audience when the various questions were brought up for
discussion.

To those who are fairly observant, the heavens in southern latitudes
cannot fail to attract attention because of the different arrangement of
the stars. People living in the northern hemisphere have never seen the
southern cross, nor the great fixed stars, Canopus or Achernar; and
those below the equator have never viewed the polar star, and do not
know the beauty of the brilliant star Vega.

The most intent listener, on all occasions of this kind, was George.
"Tell us, Professor, how the mariner knows the direction of the south
pole when there is no south polar star to show him?"

"Practically the same method is used as in the northern hemisphere. The
north polar star does not in itself indicate which is north, but it is
one of the points used in connection with another star which points out
the direction.

"In the northern hemisphere there is a star called Alpheratz and another
called Zaph, which are in direct line with the polar star. The two first
stars named are exactly on what is called the equinoctial line. But the
southern hemisphere of the heavens does not have a polar star to
indicate the south, so that if you will now look directly above us you
will notice two very bright stars. One of them is the fixed star Sirius,
the most brilliant in the heavens; the other is Canopus, and a line
along these two stars would go around the celestial sphere and point to
the poles."

"But suppose we should be on the sea, and would not have anything else
to guide us, what would there be to show which way is north and which
direction south?"

"Sirius is easily distinguished, because it is, apparently, the largest
of all the fixed stars. It cannot be mistaken. By taking that as a
starting point, and following with the eye along past Canopus, you will
be looking to the south pole."

"Isn't Sirius called the Dog Star? And hasn't it some connection with
the dog days?"

"Yes; in the remote ages of the world, when every man was his own
astronomer, the rising and setting of this star was watched with deep
solicitude. The astronomers of Egypt determined the length of the year
by the number of its risings. It foretold to them the rising of the
Nile, which they called Siris, and admonished them when to sow. At that
season of the year Sirius rises with the sun, and owing to its intense
brilliancy, the ancients supposed that it blended its heat with the sun
and thus was the cause of the intense heat; hence during that time were
called dog days. At present what are so designated are the days between
the 3d of July to the 11th of August."




CHAPTER VIII

THE CATARACT AND ITS MARVELS


The tramp through the forest was a leisurely one, as constant stops were
made to examine the country. The rescued boys were wonderfully
recuperated by the influence of two days of good food and the peace of
mind and contentment that had come into their lives after a stormy and
hazardous fourteen months' struggle.

Ralph brought in several specimens of fruit and vegetables, of the kind
they had seen the natives use, and one specimen which had a long,
tapering root. "Here is something they always had on hand," he remarked
as he handed it to the Professor.

"That would be a valuable addition to our vegetable diet. It is a
species of Salsify, or vegetable oyster, and by some called Goat's
beard, on account of the peculiar top."

"I should like to know what this is. It seems to me that we saw plants
of the same kind down near the South River." George produced a plant
with beautiful large leaves at the end of each stem, which grew in
clusters.

The Professor smiled. "You have at last found the real rubber tree. This
was taken from one of the small trees, but they grow to considerable
height, and many of the trees yield about eight gallons of milk, when
first cut, which produces two pounds of rubber.

"But," continued the Professor, "I have something here that is more of a
curiosity than anything else." He drew forth a stem with a number of
leaves, and peculiarly marked. "Do you notice anything odd about this?"

[Illustration: _Fig. 8. Salsify._]

All of them examined it intently, and finally Tom remarked: "Why don't
you remember, Ralph, we saw these branches in the savage huts
frequently, but I have no idea what they used them for."

"This is the carricature plant. If you will look closely the outline of
human faces can be seen. Look at this leaf, the resemblance is plain.
Among the savages these leaves are plucked as charms, and the more
distinctly they are marked the more potent they consider them. It is
something like the ideas of many people about the four-leaved clovers.
So civilized people are not so very far above the savages, after all."

[Illustration: _Fig. 9. Rubber._]

In the afternoon of the third day they approached the vicinity of the
Cataract, and Harry and George were wild to make their way forward, so
the yaks were constantly urged to go on, and it frequently made
traveling difficult for those who were walking. Ralph and Tom were kept
in the wagon, but insisted that the Professor and John should take their
places there, and would not listen to their protestations.

About three o'clock Observation Hill was sighted, and there, proudly
floating, was the flag. When the attention of the boys was called to it
they almost wept for joy at the sight.

"Oh, how good it feels to see that old flag again," was Tom's comment,
as he tried to brush away something that looked like a tear. "How far
are we away now?"

"Not more than two miles from home, but the hill is three-quarters of a
mile farther."

[Illustration: _Fig. 10. Carricature Plant._]

Angel was in his element now, as the home was sighted, and he danced and
capered, just as George did. The Professor and John were in the wagon,
and Harry asked the Professor to take the reins, and before any of them
knew what he was about was out of the wagon and on a run down the hill,
followed by George and Angel.

Ralph and Tom followed suit, and they made a procession that gave great
pleasure to the Professor, as he saw their joyous spirits exhibiting
themselves.

John's eyes lighted up, and the Professor noted the look of pleasure on
his face. It was so good to see the steady increase in the developing
intelligence. When they left two weeks before John was listless, and
often entirely without any indications of what was going on all about
him. The only characteristics were shown at intervals, where he would,
probably, recall something, or instinctively be brought into contact
with a former phase of his life; but now those periods seemed to be
vanishing, and he became a more normal being at all times, without
showing the marked eccentricities.

The boys reached the home, and Harry opened the door, and stood ready to
receive and welcome their new companions.

When the wagon came up John and the Professor marched up, and the latter
approached with the deference of a courtier, and John, noting the
attitude of the Professor, made a like obeisance, and this act, so
gracefully performed, was such a wonderful and startling thing that the
boys were completely stunned. After making a show of welcome to the
Professor, they walked over to John and offered him a welcome that was
most touching to him.

The Professor and the boys now felt that they could not, in their future
conversations, make any allusion to him, as there was an evident dawning
of his intellect, and nothing must be said to attract his attention to
it by discussing his condition.

Angel was in the rafters for a moment only, and then down and darted
into the kitchen. Not for a moment did he rest content at any spot until
he had investigated every corner. Wasn't that a boyish trait? When the
whole house had been exhausted, he was over at the water wheel, and the
boys followed, but they did not take in every arm and blade of the
wheel, as he did. Then to the shop, and always leading the boys, who
were after him with shouts of merriment.

"Oh, isn't this wonderful!" exclaimed Tom. "What a glorious time you
must have had in building these things? And just to think of it, we were
so near you, and in misery all the time;" and he said it in such a
regretful manner that it drew forth the sympathy of all.

Nothing in the world could have hindered John and the Professor from
following up and witnessing the scene. Angel didn't try to run the
sawmill, or to turn the lathe, but he did the next best thing, he jumped
on the grindstone and sent it spinning while running over the top, a
trick he had learned and which was one of the ways he had to help out
George and Harry when at work.

If you should argue from now until you get to the end of this book that
Angel did not know what he was doing during these exhibitions, and that
it was only the act of an animal, it would not have convinced the boys.
From the shop they visited the laboratory, and here the boys got their
first real shock, as they saw the skeletons which had been taken from
the cave.

It was all so remarkable to them that they did not know what to say or
think. Here was intelligence directed from the first. How different had
they utilized the intervening time. It was a momentous lesson, they were
smart enough to appreciate what they saw and learned.

"I am so happy to know that we have been permitted to become a member of
your family," said Ralph, as he grasped the Professor's hand. "All this
around here is certainly worth seeing, and it makes me long to take a
hand and help, and I know that Tom feels that way, too."

Before the Professor could reply George stepped up and put his arm
around the Professor. "If you boys only knew how beautiful he has been,
and how patiently he has urged us to carry out this work, you would
almost wish, as has been our desire many times, never to leave this
place; but--of course, we--we want to see home--and," and the tears
came, and Ralph and Harry and Tom broke down and wept, and they turned
away from each other to hide their emotions.

When they turned and tried to be very brave again, the Professor, who
was not ashamed of the tears which fell, smiled through them, and his
voice rang out with a cheer that made every face bright, as he said:
"The most satisfying thing in life is appreciation. My boys have been
heroes. I have done nothing; it is their work. I have felt ashamed,
sometimes, to know how little has been the work of my hands.
Occasionally they have been directed, but it is because they wanted to
know so many things and the reasons for everything they started out to
do. You can see, therefore, that if they had not possessed the spirit to
accomplish these things, the little that I have tried to impart to them
would have been of no use. I merely allude to this to show you that it
is not knowledge or information that makes the world move or induces men
to progress, but it is the spirit which takes hold of and utilizes the
intelligence."

The new additions to the family now necessitated an entire rearrangement
of their quarters. The house, which had been built up in sections, so to
speak, contained three rooms, one, the original portion, being now the
store room, to which was added a living room and a kitchen.

Commenting on this, and with all together, to get some understanding of
the plans, the Professor outlined his views: "We have been putting up
our structures here in the way usually followed in all rural
communities, where there is plenty of room, by first erecting a little
shanty, and then adding another room to that, and a little lean-to on
the other side, and as the family grows, enclosing the lean-to to make
another room, and then adding to that, and so on, until the whole mass
makes a more or less picturesque structure, and a fine thing for artists
to rave over. But the interior comfort is quite another thing. We should
change that in this civilized community, and put up a building that will
be not only comfortable and adapted for our necessities, but also
artistic, and it will cost us no more than to do it in a slovenly,
inartistic way. I imagine we can make good terms with the carpenter and
the bricklayer and the decorator so as to reduce the cost as much as
possible;" and all enjoyed the Professor's little joke.

It was Harry's turn to offer a few suggestions: "We have about
everything we need now, except food. The barley is all gone--"

"What, all that we left in the bin?" asked George.

"Something has gotten into it and carried it all away."

"We shall have to investigate that the first thing," suggested the
Professor. "Fortunately we haven't threshed out one of the stacks, and
that will give us plenty of exercise for a day."

"What, have you a stack of barley here?" was Tom's eager question.

"Oh, yes," replied George, "and we make the finest kind of bread. I am
sorry we can't offer any to-day."

It was so long since they had tasted bread that its name was almost
forgotten.

All returned to the house. The Chief was still there, and he looked at
the group in a curious way. Everything in sight attracted his curiosity,
and the Professor tried to make him feel at home in his new
surroundings. His wounds were progressing favorably, and he was now able
to stand on one leg without much pain. At the suggestion of the
Professor, Harry made a pair of crutches, which were brought in early
the next morning, and he took them and imitated the act of walking with
one of his legs raised up. This was a novel proceeding for the savage,
and after they had been offered to him several times the Professor urged
him to try them.

Comprehending what was wanted he struggled to his feet and reached for
them. When they were adjusted he leaned forward for the first step, and
a look of surprise came over him. It was a revelation to his poor
untutored mind. It lighted up into an expression he had never exhibited
before, and he thus received the first lesson on the route to
civilization.

It was amusing to see him make one attempt after the other, and before
night he could travel about fairly well. What must have been his
thoughts as he saw the busy workshops and the surroundings of the home
to which he had been so unwillingly brought? At every opportunity the
Professor cultivated his acquaintance. As time wore on he became
communicative in his way, but it was difficult to bring things to his
mind and comprehend the language used.

He was first taught to name certain things, such as the different foods;
and it did not take long to learn what "Yes" and "No" meant, and when
handed anything particularly appetizing it was finally associated in his
mind with "good." Thus step by step he acquired a small vocabulary of
words.

The first task in the morning was the threshing out of barley. Chief, as
he was called, witnessed the task, and picked up and fondled one of the
flails, like a child caressing a new toy, but he did not have the
remotest idea what the threshing of the barley meant until the beaten
straw had been removed and the golden grain was winnowed out.

And there was another thing that interested him immensely, and that was
the grist mill, composed of the two stones, and when the water wheel was
set in motion and the upper stone began to whirr, he stood with mouth
and eyes open, and watched the meal running from the spout like one
entranced. Usually these people are too stolid to pay attention to such
things, but his intense interest was so pronounced that it attracted all
who witnessed it.

He followed every step in the preparation of the flour and in the making
of the bread, and when the loaves were finally deposited on the table,
it was some time before he could gain sufficient composure to taste it.
When he did so eventually the amount he ate was enough commendation of
its quality to satisfy the most egotistic baker.

Tom became the constant companion of Harry in the workshop, as he was a
lover of the mechanical arts. Ralph had the spirit of adventure, and was
the counterpart of George, who liked to investigate. These two became
the animated question marks of the party. On every subject they took a
leading part.

The second evening George brought out his home-made violin. This was the
occasion for another surprise. Red Angel was at the feet of George in an
instant. Tom could not keep his hands still, as he had also learned to
play the instrument, and ventured to suggest that he would like to
assist in building a bass viol, and not to be outdone Ralph offered to
construct a flute.

The violin that evening was another link in the chain which was to
eventually convert a savage into an instrument of untold value to the
people of that island. At first Chief could not understand it. He tried
to see where the wailing noise came from and pressed closer and closer
to George as he played. When George played another tune in quick time he
became animated, and slow, plaintive music seemed to subdue him.

"Do you know," said the Professor, "that what we call music does not
appear as such to savages. Noise and sound are not distinguished by
them. The beating of their crude tom toms is the only thing that appeals
to their ears. That is simply noise. Rhythm and time are recognized,
principally because all their music is associated by some act of
dancing."

"I have often wondered why it is that dancing is such a universal
custom?" ventured Tom.

"Among all ancient peoples it formed the integral part of religious
ceremonies, and is even to-day practiced by many of the eastern
Christians in that manner. It was the custom of the Jews from their
first historical account, as shown in the account given in Exodus, where
Miriam the prophetess, sister of Moses, took a timbrel in her hand and
went out with the other women with timbrels and dances. The Hebrews had
a regular chorus in the Temple, with dancing performers of women; and
the dance was adopted as a fitting close to the feast of the
Tabernacle, when the rulers of the synagogues, the doctors of the
schools, and even the members of the Sanhedrin, accompanied the sacred
music with their voices, and leaped and danced with torches in their
hands until morning."

"Do you think the savages even in these western islands use the dance as
a religious ceremony?"

"All tribes in the Island of the Pacific, and I might say, over the
entire world, associate these dances with religion, with war, and with
some festive commemoration of events. I dare say that you boys have
witnessed some of those rites."

Ralph responded to this: "We saw that happen on the occasion the victims
were sacrificed by the savages who captured us, as I related in my story
the other day. The other tribe also had a dance, but it was so entirely
different that we both noticed it at the time."

"Your observation was correct. As in clothing, and in the matter of
decorations, so different peoples show their dancing characteristics by
different traits. This is true of all civilized people as well. Of
these, the best known, which I might mention, are the tarantella of the
Neapolitans, the bolero and fandango of the Spaniards, the mazurka and
cracovienna of Poland, the cosack of Russia, the redowa of Bohemia, the
quadrille and cotillion of France, the waltz, polka and gallopade of
Germany, the reel and sword dance of Scotland, the minuet and hornpipe
of England, the jig of Ireland, and the last to capture America is the
tango."




CHAPTER IX

THE WORK AT THE CATARACT. MAKING WEAPONS


The directing hand of the Professor, assisted by John, who was present
everywhere when work was to be done, was manifested when the hour for
retiring came. There was an abundance of clean, sweet straw, and the
boys temporarily took up their quarters in the shop, while the
Professor, John and Chief occupied the living room.

All this had been arranged for by John, so that when they went to bed
that night happy and contented, it was to take a rest that was free from
troubles and worries, and it was a welcome relief after two weeks of
wandering, coupled with the most exciting adventures.

The boys had hardly quieted themselves for the night, when a peculiar
scratching and scraping noise appeared at their door. They intently
listened for a while, and George quietly slipped to the door. He heard a
familiar sound from without. Red Angel was there, and next morning the
Professor laughingly said that it is likely he did not relish the
company in the house, as he came down to the door after the boys left,
and by his peculiar style of talk said he wanted to get out.

In the morning the Professor called the working force together, and
suggested that as good living was a necessity, and could also be made a
pleasure, they should so divide the different occupations as to make
each feel that he had some special responsibility.

He pointed out four things which were essential to their welfare. First
to replenish their store of vegetables; second, to secure game or meat
of some kind; third, the cultivation of the garden; and fourth, the
manufacture of clothing, of which all stood in need.

When John came to their home he was supplied with practically all of the
surplus goods on hand, and a new stock of ramie fiber had not been
prepared since that. The boys' clothing had been supplemented by the
goods taken from the wagon top, and while heavy garments were not
required, it was noticed that the articles first made from the ramie
were growing threadbare.

Footwear was really of more immediate necessity than clothing. Ralph and
Tom had no shoes whatever, as the only ones they had were taken away
when first captured. It is singular how hard the feet can become when
deprived of protection. Throughout Africa, where the natives never wear
them from the cradle to the grave, the soles of the feet become hard and
bony, and thus enable them to travel over any kind of surface without
injury.

It was fortunate that they had three tanned hides, and when John looked
at the denuded feet of the boys, and at his own condition, the sight of
the hides was enough to set him to work. The first thing that engaged
his attention was the making of a set of lasts, and then the ramie fiber
was twisted for threads; after which he sought out the lumber pile to
make pegs, and selected some of the dried shellbark hickory for this
purpose. Thus he imposed one very needed duty on himself.

At George's suggestion a new stock of the ramie fiber ought to be
supplied, and he, with Ralph, took the yaks, and their guns, in order to
do double duty, to bring in a new quantity, and at the same time supply
the table with game. As they were leaving the Professor called out: "If
you go near the ledge of iron ore bring in a few hundred pounds, and
also some clay. You ought to take the picks and shovels along."

Harry and Tom went across the river to visit the garden, which was now
overrun with weeds, and the entire day was spent in putting that in
order, as they hoped within a few weeks more to commence gathering
supplies from that source. The garden had been started before they
sailed away on the voyage which ended so disastrously to their vessel.

While all this was going on it must not be thought that the
determination to again visit the enemy's country had been relaxed.
Before going on another trip preparations must be made, and they did not
intend to run short of ammunition the second time.

With that object in view, the moment the present need for food and
clothing was provided for it was agreed that all efforts should be made
in the direction of preparing weapons and ammunition. There was still a
good supply of copper at hand, as well as lead, which had been
previously extracted.

[Illustration: _Fig. 11. Angel, his new suit, and the Gun._]

Thus the party put in several days of ardent work in the directions
indicated. One morning, while the garment-making was in progress, Angel
appeared wearing one of George's discarded jackets. He strutted around
in the most comical way, admiring himself, and, apparently, enjoying
the sensation of being clad. It was amusing to see him hunch his
shoulders as he looked at the jacket.

George laughed, and so did Angel. "Well, we must make you a suit sure."
Everyone, even to the Professor, took a part in the proceeding, but John
couldn't see a way to fit him with a pair of shoes.

As usual, whenever opportunity offered, the Professor was out
prospecting in the hills. When he returned several samples of new
minerals were deposited in the laboratory, and when the party gathered
there that evening Ralph was the first to notice a reddish ore which had
been found during the day.

"What is that, Professor?"

"It is a very fine sample of Cinnabar."

"I never heard of it before. What is it used for?"

"It is the ore from which quicksilver, or mercury, is extracted."

"Wouldn't it be fun to make a looking glass?"

"It is used for that purpose, but we have use for it in making a
thermometer, as well as a barometer," answered the Professor.

"Will it be much trouble to take the quicksilver out of the ore?"

"No, it is a very simple process. Metallic mercury is easily
volatilized, and separated from the gangue, at temperatures far below
redness. Our closed retort would be admirable for the purpose."

"Do you mean by volatilizing that it is put into a steam?"

"Volatilizing means to convert it into a gas, and this gas, on coming
into contact with a cooling surface, is converted into a mercury, which
we have in a liquid state, and is called the metallic mercury."

"Are there other kinds besides metallic mercury?"

"Oh, yes; it may be in the form of a nitrate, a sulphate, a chloride or
an iodide. The chloride is very poisonous, and is known as corrosive
sublimate. It would be just the thing to rid the stable of the rodents
that took the barley."

One morning the Professor called the boys together and informed them
that it had been the custom to take a certain day each week for hunting
or other recreation, and suggested that they continue the practice.

"I should like to go over to Observation Hill and see the flag you
made," said Ralph. All agreed to this heartily, and the merry party set
out, after being fully equipped, as was always the custom. Red Angel
formed one of the party, of course, and in lieu of a gun, George had
made a stick in imitation of one. He was immensely proud of this
acquisition, and actually hugged it when it was presented to him. From
that time forward it was his constant companion.

When the Hill was reached, Angel made for the pole, and with his gun in
hand, scrambled to the top, giving out his peculiar chuckling noise,
which indicated delight.

"Why the gun doesn't seem to make any difference in his climbing,"
exclaimed Tom.

They scanned the broad sea, and who shall say what their thoughts were
as they silently stood there. For some reason when they started to go
down the hill they were not so jolly as when going up. Their course was
directed to the east, but just why no one knew. It seemed as though they
were simply drifting, each with his own thoughts; but Harry soon
banished their reveries.

"Let us follow the beach down to South River," he suddenly exclaimed,
and all were glad that something had been said or suggested. It was so
easy to turn them from gravity to cheerfulness, and probably Harry was
trying some of the Professor's medicine on the boys.

At every step of the way, and in every action, the boys now realized
that the work of the Professor had been imprinted on them. Tom and Ralph
went along glancing superficially at the various objects, but it was
entirely different with Harry and George. Every depression, and each
succeeding elevation, or clump of trees, or any object beyond the
ordinary, was closely scrutinized by them.

This course soon became noticeable to the boys, and called forth a
comment from Tom. "Yes, we are always hunting for something. That was a
trait which the dear old Professor taught us, and it would surprise you
to know how many things we found out by that quality. We have always
since found it a pleasure in doing so."

Ralph reflected a moment, and he replied: "I can now see where we made
many mistakes during the past year by not adopting that plan."

They passed to the east around the bend, and then followed the small
bay which indented the shore, and finally moved out along the peninsula,
which terminated in a cape east of the mouth of South River.

"I have often thought," observed Harry, "since we have lived here that
it would be a good plan to name the different capes and bays, just as we
did with the rivers and streams."

"Good idea," answered Tom; "but I think we ought to make a survey of the
place. Have you never done that?"

"No; but we talked of it several times. Let us get the Professor to help
us with that on our next holiday trip."

From the cape where they now stood an unobstructed view was had to the
south. To the southwest were the mountains, beyond which Ralph and Tom
had their bitter experiences. An explanation was made of the course of
South River, the mouth of which was plainly visible; the story was told
of their trip up the stream with the first boat which had been built by
them; how, after they left it at the foot of the high Falls, ten miles
inland, it had disappeared when they went for it; the recovery of the
boat at the beach to their left, some months afterwards, when it
contained strange oars and ropes; their second trip to the Falls, and
the finding of the _Investigator's_ lifeboat; and their hunting
experience in the forest below the river, and the discovery of the huts.

All this made a wonderful impression on the boys. The story of the
lifeboat was the most remarkable to their minds, because it brought up
the first recollections of some inklings which they had heard about
other castaways.

"Don't you remember, Tom, when the second tribe got us, we saw some
trinkets, and a few pocket knives, and when we tried to find out about
them they removed them?"

"Yes, and Illoga, the Chief, I am now sure, tried to tell me about them,
because in the effort he held up four fingers, which we couldn't make
out. Don't you remember? I think they took the knives away, because they
were afraid we would take them. Didn't you ever notice how jealous they
always were of their own property?"

The party now went inland, and devoted the rest of the day to hunting,
and brought home a splendid lot of game.

That evening the foregoing conversation was related to the Professor,
who remarked: "If there is one thing savages and all low orders of
people are noted for, it is the tenacity in retaining their property. Of
course, that is not an uncommon trait with all people, but it is
particularly well developed in the savage. One phase of this came to my
attention some years ago, when a merchant told me that the poor people
of India bought more locks than all the rest of the world combined. He
further stated that in the principal cities there immense stores could
be found which handled nothing but locks. Those statements were so
remarkable to me that I inquired the reason, and learned that every
native, although he may have trinkets worth less than a dollar, would
invariably have a lock, worth half as much or more, to keep it
securely."

"We have been thinking over the plan of surveying this part of the
island and giving names to the main points; what do you think of the
idea?" asked George.

"The plan has my hearty approval."

"It occurred to us that on our next holiday we could devote the day to
that purpose."

The Professor burst into a fit of laughter, to the surprise of all. That
didn't seem to be very comical to them, and they looked inquiringly, as
they joined in the laughter.

"So you are going to do work on your holidays hereafter." And he laughed
again.

"Well, that wouldn't be work; it would be fun;" and, after reflecting a
moment, Tom continued: "Probably it wouldn't be fun to do it every day,
right along."

"I think you have struck the keynote of the whole subject of recreation.
The word comes from re-create. It means the refreshment of the strength
and spirits by some diversion. The great difficulty with most people is
that the recreation they take is really a burden to them; when,
therefore, you can take a holiday, where you accomplish something, and
make fun out of that, you have solved the greatest problem of civilized
life."

"Well if we are to survey the island we ought to have an instrument for
the purpose."

"That is not necessary. It would be much better to have a theodolite,
but it will take some time and very careful work to turn out such an
instrument."

"In what way is the instrument so much more useful than without, and how
can we do surveying without it?"

"It does two very important things: First, the telescope, which is a
part of it, enables the observer to see much farther and with greater
accuracy; and, secondly, it has a graduated scale in degrees which shows
the angles. Without these two important qualities we should be compelled
to run our lines for short distances only at each sighting, and at each
observation it would be necessary to provide a means to get the exact
angle with reference to the last line projected. Those features,
together with the compass, make the instrument an important requisite
for correct surveying."

The boat house was one of the places last to visit, because there was so
much to do in the various directions that they had little time to devote
to the marine end of their various enterprises. Harry suggested that
sailing would be a most desirable outing at different periods, and all
consented to the task of rigging out the lifeboat.

The Chief was now so interested in everything he saw that he indicated a
desire to take a hand. The Professor was delighted at this beyond
measure. He was gradually acquiring the language, as a child would, and
his troublesome leg was healing rapidly. The one fear was that, as they
had no means of confining him, he might take the first opportunity to
leave them, and this was an occasion of more than one talk; but all
agreed that no serious consequences would result from his desertion,
since it was the belief that he would not attempt to bring his tribe
against them.

The only possible danger from his returning was the likelihood that
sooner or later his captivity and the knowledge of their location on the
island would find its way from tribe to tribe, and in that way at least
two of the tribes with which they had come into contact might seek
revenge.

Chief went to the boat sheds for the first time, after the events above
related, and the one thing which caught his eye was the lifeboat. He
started at first, and then made his way toward it, and looked at the
Professor, whose eye was quick to note the movement. He was asked if he
knew anything about it, and answered affirmatively, but when he was
questioned whether his tribe had possession of it at any time, no
intelligent response was made, as he evidently misunderstood what was
asked.

One of the first weapons which they constructed, after iron had been
recovered from the ore, was a bolo, and a number were subsequently
manufactured. To this they added several spears. All weapons were kept
out of Chief's reach, and the boys were cautioned against permitting him
to learn the mechanism and use of the guns. He always looked longingly
at the bolos, from the time he had witnessed their dextrous use.

On this occasion the Professor handed him one of the spears, and he was
not only pleased but appeared to be extremely gratified at the act. He
balanced it in his hand, and held it up in the attitude of throwing it.
When they were returning to the shop, Chief balanced the spear, and
without the slightest effort threw it fully fifty feet against a tree,
striking a light portion of the bark which he had evidently aimed for.
This was the signal for applause and clapping of hands.

[Illustration: _Fig. 12. Poising the Spear._]

Harry ran for the spear and returned it to Chief, and all ranged up
alongside to witness his performances. The boys secured spears, also,
and made the attempt to throw them, but they fell far short. When Harry
attempted to make the trial, Chief seized it, and took his hand, and
showed how to hold it to make an effective throw.

The trick consisted in grasping the stem tightly between the thumb and
edge of the palm, with the little finger below the stem. The boys
watched the proceedings with interest, but could not understand why that
method of doing it was most effective.

The Professor came to the rescue. "The throwing of the javelin, the
proper term for all weapons of this character, was an interesting thing
from the earliest times. The lighter weapons are thrown by grasping
them between the thumb and the two first fingers; but the heavy ones
like this need a firmer grasp, and on account of their weight are not so
easily kept in a horizontal position when in the act of impelling it
forwardly. When, however, the spear is grasped in the manner shown you,
the little finger, and the next finger to it, both act to guide the
stem, and by practice they can be thrown with great accuracy."

This javelin-throwing match was the means of bringing the Chief and the
boys nearer together than anything else that had transpired, and it
began to make them take an interest in him, which was not the case
theretofore. What really affected Chief more than anything else was the
confidence imposed in him some days after, when Harry gave him one of
the bolos. It was almost touching to see the joy he expressed. The
Professor thought it would be a stroke of policy to have the present
come from the boys.

Although he was still limping and unable to move around with any
celerity he was out using the bolo at every opportunity. Here was an
opportunity, as the Professor explained, to show how intelligent
direction would not only be serviceable to the Chief himself, but that
its possession would turn its use into channels that would be of value
to him.

The gift made him particularly grateful, and so several days afterwards
Harry and Tom, by a concerted arrangement, took the yaks, and the truck
which had been previously made to haul in the flagpole, and, motioning
to Chief, set off for the woods. A fair-sized tree was selected, and
the boys, without a word to indicate that they wanted him to assist,
began to cut down the tree.

He looked on wistfully for a time, and then edged his way over and made
a motion to take Harry's place, to which he assented. It was now
impossible for Harry to regain his place at the tree, and when it fell
he acted and looked like a conqueror, and Harry patted him on the back
as a token of his good work. A section of the butt of the tree was cut
off, and loaded on the truck, and dragged to the sawmill. The end had to
be squared off, and Chief insisted on doing this, the use of the
exceedingly novel tool being the greatest pleasure, evidently, that he
had ever enjoyed.

The fixing of it to the reciprocating saw frame was a marvel to him, and
when he saw the boards cut off his joy knew no bounds. The proceedings
at the sawmill delighted the Professor. "I have always contended, as
heretofore expressed, that the same motive which prompts us to do things
with pleasure is to know that we are doing things which produce
results."

And then Harry did another graceful thing. He turned up a number of
brass balls which he gave to Chief. If there is one thing a savage loves
better than another, it is something round. That is why beads are so
attractive, and buttons, and small trinkets of that kind. They are like
children in this respect. Put a cube and a ball, both of the same
material, before a child, and he will usually select the ball. It is a
psychological phase which has never been explained; and the same test
has been made with monkeys.




CHAPTER X

UNAWARES IN THE ENEMY'S COUNTRY


During the evening, while engaged in their usual discussions the
surveying implement was brought up, and it was understood that a crude
instrument should be made, so that it would be ready within the next
week.

While speaking on the subject of laying off the segments into degrees,
the former matter of observing the heavens was alluded to, and Ralph
inquired why all calculations of the heavens were made by degrees.

"Because degrees mean angles and not measurements. Positions or
distances are determined by angles and by measurements in miles."

"But in looking at the stars how can mariners tell where they are,
simply by getting the angles?"

"That is a matter which can be calculated with such accuracy on the high
seas that the distance can be determined with absolute certainty to
within three or four miles. Furthermore, when the moon is shining, a
mariner, even without an instrument, will be able to make a pretty
accurate determination, if the moon is in sight."

"This is interesting information, and I would like to know how it is
done."

"Simply by noting how far the moon is from some fixed star. It is
difficult to explain this without making a drawing of the heavens or
drawing a map which shows the positions of the fixed stars, and the two
sketches (Figs. 13 and 14) that I have drawn out will, I hope, make it
clear to you. The first figure (13) is a map of the sky for the northern
hemisphere, and the second drawing (Fig. 14) of the southern hemisphere,
where we are.

[Illustration: _Northern Hemisphere. Fig. 13._]

"On the maps I have shown the fixed stars and named them, those of the
first magnitude being the largest, those of the second magnitude a
little smaller, and so on, but I have not by any means indicated all of
the second and third magnitude owing to their great number."

[Illustration: _Southern Hemisphere. Fig. 14._]

There had always been a secret grief in the hearts of Harry and George
at the loss of the boat at the mouth of South River, and the Professor
joined in their wish to recover it at the first opportunity. Harry again
alluded to it on this occasion, and it was decided that such a trip
would be a welcome change.

The trip could be made in the wagon, and by consent the four agreed to
undertake the journey and bring it back.

"I have often thought it might be done by taking the lifeboat," was
George's idea, "and we could fix it up there and sail it back."

"It does not seem to me that would be practical, because it is too much
damaged to repair in such a way as to make it safe for such a journey,
and if that plan should be adopted all of us should go, and we cannot
leave for the length of time necessary to repair it."

"Then we had better take the team. Do you think, Professor, we could
haul it back?"

"If you can load it there will be no difficulty in that particular."

It was decided to start the following morning, and a supply of
provisions was stored in the wagon, and before starting the Professor
made the following suggestions:

"When you get there the top must be removed--that is the bows and
covering----"

"Why, we haven't any covering to it now. We had to use it up for
clothing."

"I had forgotten all about that. I supposed the top had been taken off
when we took it out to haul in the supplies. That being the case the
boat, when it is loaded in, upside down, will make a splendid top for
you for camping purposes."

"How long will it take to make the trip?" inquired Tom.

"Not to exceed five or six days, because we know every step of the way,
and we can push along pretty lively."

The start was not made until about ten o'clock, and Angel was on hand
with his inevitable gun. They did not forget the usual accompaniments of
such trips, namely, guns and ammunition, together with the spears and
bolos.

"This is certainly a jolly lark," sang out Ralph, as they neared the
forest. He and Tom had fully recovered from their weakened condition,
and were able to take their part in any of the work which was necessary.

"Which way shall we take?" asked George.

"The road directly through the forest, for the reason it is much better
than the route near the sea."

The four young spirits made wonderful progress toward the goal, as they
had a light load, and every minute seemed to be precious. What hunting
was done was on the route itself, and they had mutually agreed that
there should not be any wandering on the part of either.

The first night the camp was made on the banks of the Cataract, well
within the woods, and not far from the scene of their first exploits
with the two bears.

"I wish we could come across more of the same kinds of bears that we met
in these woods," said George.

"But the forests south of South River are the places for the animals.
Didn't George tell you about our hunting there?"

"No," answered Ralph; "but I want to go there when we get back."

During the first night Angel was restless, as usual in the woods at the
merest sound, and George tried to find out the cause of the uneasiness.

"Wasn't it near here that the wildcat attacked us?" asked George.

"I believe you are right. Possibly he has scented another one."

"Suppose we take a peep out," Ralph whispered; and taking their guns,
they stole down from the wagon.

They silently stood by the wagon, peering around in the darkness.

"They will be up in the trees," said Harry. "Wait--I see something; look
up to the right, a little to the left of the opening through to the
sky."

"Two balls of fire could be distinctly noticed.

"That is one of them, if it isn't something larger. What shall we do?"

"Ralph, you and I will aim and fire at it, and if it makes a dive for us
George and Tom can take the next shot. Get in the wagon quietly, and
prepare."

"Now, ready, aim, fire!" Something came down from the tree faster than
an ordinary descent.

"Get into the wagon, quickly," and suiting the action to the word, they
leaped up quickly.

"Don't shoot, George, until you see something definite to shoot at."

Something went crashing through the underbrush, and Angel, who was their
monitor, increased his alarm.

"I believe it is making for us."

The boys who had shot were now prepared with the newly loaded guns and
awaited the attack, but beyond the plain movement of the leaves, and
what appeared to be breaking twigs, nothing could be discerned, until
George almost screamed, as he saw the object above them, high in the
branches.

"Here is a chance for a shot?" And Harry and Ralph both aimed and fired
at the same moment, and the animal came down with a crash and landed
near the wagon, but was up in an instant, and appeared to spring out
through the forest.

Angel quieted down, and this gave George assurance that they were rid of
the animal.

The second day was not filled with stirring events, and they went along
with considerable speed, and judging from their former estimates the
distance traveled during the two days must have brought them fully forty
or fifty miles from home, so they counted on being able to reach the
location of the boat some time during the following day.

Before noon of the day they sighted the West River, but they reached it
at an unfamiliar point.

George and Harry looked at each other in surprise. "It does seem to me,"
said Harry, "that we must have made some miscalculation in coming from
the woods. If I am not mistaken we are miles south of the place we ought
to have aimed for."

Beyond question the direction was to the north, and the team was headed
for that direction, their route being near the river, as the ground was
much smoother, and speed was thus made.

"What is this?" asked Ralph in consternation. "Here are tracks."

The trails were examined, and Harry solved the question by the assertion
that it was the tracks made by their own wagon when they escaped from
the savages on the other side of the river.

"What idiots we have been to expose ourselves to the savages."

"We must leave the river bed now, or we may be discovered," was George's
answer, and the yaks were guided to a higher elevation, and urged
forward at a higher speed.

Selecting a secluded spot the noonday halt was made, and a hurried
luncheon provided, but before they were ready for a start, Angel, who
was in the branches of a tree, began his chatter, which caused George to
spring toward the direction of the tree.

"Come down, Angel; come down!" This was always heeded by the animal, and
it was plain that the direction of the approaching danger was from the
north.

Springing to a small, low-branching tree, he crawled up, and Angel
followed and looked to the north, and the sight that greeted him was
sufficient to cause a hasty descent, and he ran toward the wagon and met
the boys, who were coming toward him.

"What is it?" asked all in excitement.

"Savages."

"And if I am not mistaken, they are the same tribe that had Ralph and
Tom."

The two boys almost paled at the words. Ralph made his way back to the
wagon on a run. "If they attempt to take me again, I will never
surrender."

"Are they coming this way?"

"Yes; and they are not a quarter of a mile away."

The yaks were unyoked, and had not been hitched up, so they were led
behind the wagon, following out the plan previously adopted, as it would
have been useless to attempt to avoid them.

"Shall we attack them the moment they approach?"

"I believe," answered Ralph "that is our only hope."

"How many could you see in the party?"

"About a dozen."

The wagon had been camped behind a clump of shrubbery, not over twenty
feet from the small rivulet, and to the north of them the stream made a
slight turn, so that the party appeared in view to the watchers as soon
as they reached the wagon, and Ralph was the first to recognize their
late enemies.

To the surprise of the boys, the savages stopped, not a thousand feet
away, but on the opposite side of the stream, and built a fire
preparatory to cooking some game which had fallen into their hands.

"Well, this is interesting. They are going to have some luncheon, too.
Wouldn't this be a good time to slip away?"

"I am afraid," answered Tom, "that it would be a dangerous business. The
creaking of that rear wheel would put them on our track at once.
Couldn't we grease the wheel?" Tom was very much in earnest now.

As quietly as possible the wheel was removed, and some very good butter,
the only thing available, was used to ease it up, and the wheel was
gotten back in quick time.

Unfortunately the wagon tongue pointed toward the river, the very
direction which they dared not go, for fear of exposing their presence,
so they had to push the wagon back, by their combined energy, and as
noiselessly as it could be done the team was yoked on and slowly moved
south, and after traveling a quarter of a mile or more, directed toward
the river, and then northwardly, thus making a wide circle in the effort
to avoid their camp.

"I'd much rather shoot them than to run away," was Tom's opinion of the
situation. "The dirty rascals; they are known to be the meanest set on
the island, and we oughtn't show them any mercy."

By this time the boys were worked up into a fighting fever.

"I think we can lick the whole lot of them, and for my part, I am
willing to wait here and take a shot at them; what do you say?" Ralph
was really mad at the demons, as he called them.

The boys looked at each other. Harry was the only one who seemed to have
the situation well in hand from a true hunter's standpoint. "If we stay
here you will certainly get an opportunity, or I am very much mistaken."

"Why do you say so?" asked Tom.

"For the plain and simple reason that they will cross our tracks in all
probability, and that will mean an easy trail."

"But how will they know which way to go after us? They may go down to
the river."

"Well, they wouldn't be such idiots as to go in the opposite direction
that the footprints of the yaks plainly show."

The boys had not thought of that.

"And then there is another thing, that just occurred to me. If they
follow our tracks from the camping spot they will know we have made the
detour in order to avoid them, and that will make them only the more
anxious to make our closer acquaintance."

Harry had hardly stopped speaking before the voices of their enemies
were discernible.




CHAPTER XI

THE RUSE TO ESCAPE THEIR PURSUERS


The wagon was now driven behind the densest chapparal of trees, unyoked,
and tethered behind the wagon, and two of the boys took up a concealed
position with a pair of extra guns, at each side.

Harry, who had, by common consent, assumed the command, now made the
following observations as to their course: "Remember the Professor's
instructions, to keep cool and not to fire until you are perfectly sure
the shot will count. And by all means don't use the reserve guns, except
as a last extremity. The moment you fire, retire out of sight, and
reload, and we should try and fire in separate volleys. Two shots at a
time, unless they attempt a rush, will, probably, be more effective,
than if all fire at the same time."

In a short time the band appeared, and it was well that they had no idea
of the distance the boys had traveled, as they came along rapidly,
following the plainly made tracks of the wagon.

"Now, ready boys; Tom and I will give them the first shot, and you may
fire the moment I give the command. Ready, Tom; fire."

Both shots took effect, and the astonishment of the savages, was
exhilarating to the boys. George and Ralph could hardly restrain
themselves. The warriors were in the open, and had little brush to serve
as a shield. For a moment they were entirely at a loss to know which
way to go.

"Give them a shot," whispered Harry, and as the two guns spoke, two more
fell, both wounded. Without waiting for another shot the rest of them
broke for the rear, and the boys appeared in the opening.

This was not necessary, as the depletion of the fighting force was a
sufficient argument for them to retreat.

"Hitch up the team as quickly as possible," and George and Ralph did not
wait to witness the flight. Harry and Tom remained on guard.

"Move the wagon to the north, and stop at every good place of
concealment, and we will remain as a rear guard. We have no assurance
that they will not follow up the attack."

After the wagon had gone on some distance, the two boys slowly effected
a retreat in the trail of the wagon. Only eight savages had been left
after the two fires.

During one of the temporary stops Harry observed: "When they retreated
we saw eight of them, and there are now only six following. What do you
suppose that means?"

"Those people are regular devils, and it is my opinion that there is
another force of them near, and the others have gone to bring
reinforcements."

"Run to the wagon quickly and tell them to force the yaks forwardly as
fast as possible. Wait just a moment." And Harry looked to the north and
continued: "Do you see the two large trees in the distance, a little to
the left? Tell them to drive for that with the utmost speed, and await
our coming."

Tom was off, and imparted the information, and Harry kept on retreating,
while the scouting party approached very cautiously, the apparent object
being to keep within sight of the trail.

When Tom returned Harry said: "I suppose we had better give them another
shot, to hold them off as far as possible. At the next place of
concealment, let us wait for them, until they are near enough."

The savages were now very wary, and did not attempt to come within
gunshot distance of the place of concealment for some time, but when
they had approached sufficiently near both fired, only one being
wounded.

Without waiting to determine the results of the last volley, the boys
made a rush for the next available place of concealment, and as the
wagon was now in sight they selected another object far beyond the
present position of the wagon, and Tom was off to inform the boys at the
wagon.

Thus, by a succession of marches, the wagon was placed fully a mile
beyond the pursuers, and when the last stretch was made Harry made the
following suggestion:

"As we have now kept up our course for fully three miles in this
direction, tell the boys to turn abruptly to the east, and, if possible,
take the wagon over a trail which they cannot follow. Select some object
beyond so we will know where the line of retreat is, and I will keep
them at bay. In this way we may be able to throw them off the track."

The team had made the last stop at the crossing of one of the little
streams, and he had the ingenuity, after Tom imparted the last
information to him, to drive the team to the west, for a distance, and
then turn it abruptly to the east, and by making his way over the most
rugged surfaces he could find, so effaced the tracks that it was hoped
they could not find the traces.

When Tom returned, Harry had another ruse: "They are not following the
wagon trail now, as they are after us. Now let us direct our course to
the west, so that we will not go on the trail which the wagon had made,
and occasionally show ourselves, so they will follow, and when we have
taken them sufficiently far from the course of the wagon we must depend
on our own tricks to evade them."

This plan was put into immediate execution, and by the time the two had
gone a quarter of a mile beyond the turn which the wagon had made, they
turned eastwardly, in the direction of the wagon, keeping well out of
sight, and it was a relief to see them finally pass along the trail far
beyond the turning point which they had made, and this was evidence that
they had been outwitted.

Harry and Tom now sprinted for the direction of the wagon, and a course
was laid for the northeast, as they did not want to go too far from the
mouth of the river where the boat lay.

They calculated the distance to travel at about eight miles before
reaching the river. The only fear now was, would their pursuers keep up
the hunt until the sea came in sight? If they did it meant another
fight, or a retreat, with the only hope of securing the boat gone.

"We have a ticklish task before us. We must cross the river before we
get to the location of the boat, and if they are anywhere in the
neighborhood, our tracks will surely be seen," and Harry was at a loss
what suggestion to make in such an emergency.

"It seems to me," ventured George, "that one should take the rear, as a
guard, the one front keeping within supporting distance of the wagon at
all times. In this way we will not run into the party, and we shall then
know whether they are still trailing us."

This seemed the proper thing to do, and it was followed at once, Harry
taking the rear guard and Ralph acting as advance scout.

Fully three miles was covered, before the sun admonished them that a
camp must be made for the night. The selection of a suitable place was a
matter of great concern, as may be imagined.

They went on and on, ever in the search for a suitable place, and it was
beginning to grow dusk before their minds could agree as to a safe
place. Probably they passed a dozen spots more suitable than the one
finally selected, but it was that much nearer the river, and that was
some satisfaction.

The utmost care was taken to put the wagon and the yaks in a protected
position, and all that night two were on duty. Angel, during the entire
time, was quiet, and did not scent the approach of an enemy.

Early in the morning a hurried meal was prepared, and while the
preliminary steps were taken for a departure Harry and Tom made a
scouting tour to the southwest for nearly a half mile, and returned
satisfied that they had temporarily, at least, thrown them off the
track.

It was a surprise to find the river within a half mile of their last
camping place. If they had known this they would have pushed on and
attempted the crossing during the night. But there was no help for it
now.

"How far do you think we are from the mouth of the river, Harry?"

"This part is unfamiliar to me, but it is no doubt south of the point
where we crossed it on our way home."

"Do you think we ought to cross here or go down still farther?"

Ralph and Tom both urged an immediate crossing, for the reason that as
the savages were not in sight, they might as well take advantage of the
situation, whereas if they continued down the river, they might again
come across the tribe, and which would by this time be materially
reinforced.

This seemed the part of wisdom, and the work of getting out the raft
timbers was vigorously proceeded with, and within an hour the yaks were
driven into the water, and the wagon floated.

The wagon had hardly left the shore before Ralph cried out: "See the
devils coming. They reached the clearing, but out of gunshot, and the
boys smiled at their discomfiture, and when the opposite bank was
reached the boys halted the wagon, removed the logs, and sat down to
witness the chagrin of the natives.

"I wonder what they think of themselves by this time," said Ralph as he
heartily laughed.

The savages had been reinforced, as was apparent, for more than thirty
were plainly visible, and their tactics in following up the wagon was
now apparent.

"Let us give them another little shock." All eyes were now on Harry, as
he continued: "I suggest that we get into the wagon and move into the
interior, hiding the wagon in a safe place beyond, and then return to
this mass of brush here, where we will be entirely concealed. As this is
not more than thirty feet from shore we will be in good position to
watch the crossing and attack them if they attempt to venture across."

The plan was adopted with alacrity, and seating themselves in the
vehicle, they waved a salute to the party and started off as fast as the
team could be urged on.

Instantly there was commotion in the ranks of their enemies. They rushed
down to the bank, and engaged in an animated conversation.

The boys carefully crawled back to the brush, and witnessed the evident
attempt to decide on a course to pursue.

"Do you think they will cross?"

"I wish they would try it," answered Ralph. "Oh, wouldn't that give us a
chance at them!"

"I do believe they are going to try it."

Two of the warriors started for the water, and plunged in, and the boys
looked at each other in surprise.

"Ralph, do you think all of those fellows will try it?"

"No, indeed; those fellows don't like water, and if our experience in
crossing the river, when they took us back with them, is any indication,
they have very few who can swim."

"But the difficulty is that they can raft across."

"That is just the reason why I thought a little surprise of this kind
might make them think better of it, and not try it."

"You must remember," answered Tom, "they live on this side of the river,
and they are bound to get across some time."

"I know that, but their rafts are no doubt miles up the river."

It was now plain why they determined to follow up our party. Their own
territory had been invaded, and this came to all of the boys with a
shock. The getting of the boat was now a most hazardous operation.

They saw the two savages swim from the shore, and remained quiet until
they came within thirty feet of the shore.

"Now," said Harry, "the moment they start to wade, let us make a rush
for the bank, and we will have them at our mercy."

Each of the warriors carried a spear, but no other weapon, but those on
the opposite shore had bows, as well.

The surprise and consternation on the faces of the savages, when the
party appeared, was too remarkable to describe. Their first action was
to turn, but Ralph cried out: "Hola, hola," and Tom laughed as he now
remembered the savage word for "stop."

They did "hola," but for a moment only, and then diving down in the
water, attempted to make their escape.

The boys were now on the brink of the stream, and not more than twenty
feet away from the struggling men. "Hola, hola," shrieked Ralph and Tom
in concert, as they aimed their guns at them.

"That devil in front is the fellow we want to get. He is the meanest of
the entire outfit. Oh, yes, you remember me, don't you?" Ralph
continued, talking to the savage. "I have a notion to bore a hole
through you."

The savage raised himself, and evidently believing his hour had come,
did, as all savages do, poised his spear, as he raised himself out of
the water, and attempted to throw it. But before he could execute the
movement, a shot from Harry threw him back into the water and his spear
disappeared.

During this commotion the other savage dived, and he must have been an
expert, because the boys shot three times before he showed any evidence
of being hit, and then it was only a wound.

The boys ran back to their place of concealment to get the reserve guns,
and during that period the wounded one floated out into the stream and
the boys made no further effort to reach him.

The chief, as Ralph called him, was undoubtedly struck in a vital spot,
as he disappeared and reappeared, while slowly floating down with the
current.

The boys retreated behind their shelter, and sat down to rest and
recover from the excitement of the last fifteen minutes.

Meanwhile, what were the savages beyond doing? Consternation seemed to
seize them. They ran back and forth, and shouted to their companions in
peril, and Ralph and Tom both tried to make out the meaning of the
warning cries, but were not sufficiently versed in their jargon to
comprehend.

"Well, boys, we have kicked up a pretty serious muss, and we might as
well give up the boat."

Tom, who seemed to have some very good ideas, suggested a plan that had
considerable merit, and they were now considering it.

"My scheme is this: Let us now make a show of retreating into the
interior to the west, covering our tracks as best we can. Then turn to
the north, for a mile or two, and go back to the river and cross, and
then make for home as fast as we can travel."

"That is a first-class plan," was Harry's reply; "but I think two of us
should remain here in order to keep up a show. We can exhibit ourselves
at intervals, while the wagon is proceeding on its way, and the moment
the wagon reaches the river, those with it can get the floats ready, so
that when the scouts reach the wagon it will be ready to cross."

Ralph and Harry volunteered to act as the rear guard, and the wagon went
forward, making a wide detour to the north and finally veered around to
the east, reaching the river fully a mile below. Fortunately, a lot of
driftwood was in convenient reach, and the spot was hidden by a bend in
the stream, so that it was not at all likely the savages would see them
from their low position at the river bank.

The wagon was on the brink of the stream, and the logs ready, still the
boys in the rear did not appear.

"Don't you think I had better go back and let the boys know we are
ready?"

"Yes, Tom, and tell them to hurry."

The fact was that the providential pile of driftwood made the task an
easy one for the boys, and Ralph and Harry were only too much relieved
at the news to wait a moment longer than was necessary.

The savages were still on the opposite bank. Was it likely they were
inactive? Harry did not think so, as they noted parties disappear at
various times, and again others came up, thus indicating there was some
movement on foot.

"Before we start now, it would be a capital idea for all of us to show
ourselves, and then make a cautious break for the wagon."

Without exposing themselves too ostentatiously, the start was made
directly to the rear, and then, as they left the river in the rear, and
beyond the sight of their pursuers, turned to the north, and relieved
George of the great tension of single-handed guarding the wagon.

Without waiting for any explanations the yaks were driven in, and the
opposite shore reached. Quickly denuding the wagon of the raft timbers,
the trail was taken up for home but they were too hungry for words.

"We can't stop to set up the stove and arrange our kitchen now. Let us
take such things as we can find, and eat on the way."

Harry's advice was followed. And now they recognized the country through
which they were going. It was almost the same trail over which they had
traveled twice before, and it went through the roughest part of the
island, and when they made the first trip with the team they had to go
south to get into a part of the country which was better suited for easy
traveling.

"The trouble is we cannot safely go south now, as it will bring us too
close to the savages, and we shall have to bear up with this bad ground
until to-morrow noon, at least."

By night fully fifteen miles had been covered, but it was a terrible
strain on the poor animals, and not any the less wearing on the wagon.
The ground was broken up into little hillocks, and studded with
vegetable growth in such dense tufts, that constant detours had to be
made to get around them.

When evening approached it was with a feeling of the greatest relief,
and they certainly craved the rest. A careful watch was kept up during
the entire night. They had, of course, no means of knowing whether the
savages had discovered the ruse, but there could be no question about
the determination to revenge the death of their chief and of the others
who had fallen during the day.

As soon as it was light enough to see, and without waiting for the
preparation of a breakfast, in the usual way, the trip was continued,
and the western edge of the forest did not come near until near evening.
They had eluded their pursuers, and felt happy, and Ralph could not help
expressing his satisfaction over and over, at finishing the chief who
had treated them so vilely while in captivity.

Shortly after noon of the following day they reached home, and related
their adventures.

The Professor was not surprised at their failure to bring the boat back.
He was a little disappointed, but they were certainly in a better
position to build a boat now than when the old one was undertaken.




CHAPTER XII

THE PROBLEM ABOUT THE CAVE


That evening they all had a jolly time in the living room, with music
and stories, and it was a great contrast to the strenuous times of the
past six days of absence.

"We got lost once," said George, "when we struck the river at least
eight or nine miles too far south. I tried to make out the direction by
the two stars you spoke about, but I am afraid there will be several
more lessons necessary before I can get it in my mind."

"Couldn't you see the moon?" asked the Professor.

"Yes, but that didn't help me any."

"Get the map we drew the other night, and we'll try and make it plainer.
Now, if you can imagine the moon making a silver streak along the
heavens, it would pass along such a route that the following fixed stars
would be in its path. Note them carefully, as follows: Hamel, Aldebaran,
Pollux, Regulus, Spica, Antares, Arkat, Fomelhaut, and Markab."

"But how can we distinguish one of the fixed stars from the others? That
is a matter which has always puzzled me."

"Because of the company it keeps. Isn't that like we judge people?"

"I don't understand what you mean."

"Each fixed star is set in the heavens with certain others stars
arranged about it in such a way that it cannot be mistaken."

Angel's antics now attracted the attention of the company. He had been
on the floor while the music was being performed, but disappeared
shortly afterwards. He had his gun, and dodged from one chair to the
next, and sighted his gun, and bounded away, as though attacking and
running from an imaginary enemy.

This exhibition was a perfect mimicry of the boys' attitude during the
previous week. The comical manner in which he fought and eluded the
enemy brought out roars of laughter, but this did not affect him in the
least; he sprang to the rafters, and began to chatter in imitation of
the way he had warned the boys, and then sprang down and hid behind a
chair.

But the acme of his exhibition was reached when he mounted the table and
simulated the rocking motion of the wagon crossing the stream. George
simply hugged him, and Angel joined in the laughter.

But the boys wanted to know about John and Chief. John was there to
welcome their return, and Chief came up soon after, and held out a
welcoming hand, as he had seen the others do. Of course, he had no idea
what the party went away for, nor did he comprehend the failure to bring
the boat back. His education had not yet advanced to such a state as
would have made an explanation of that kind understandable.

But John seemed to realize the story, and his eyes often glistened as
they had not done before. On all these occasions the Professor was ever
on the alert to notice his symptoms.

During the following day, in conversation with the boys, he said: "There
is every indication that John is beginning to make an individuality
entirely apart from his former surroundings."

"But if he does not recall any of his former life, how is it that he
goes ahead and does things which he must have learned before he reached
his present condition?"

"That is plainly a manual act. For instance, I remember when the saw was
put into his hand, the manner of holding it, and his act in starting the
saw at the edge of the board, was a physical recollection of the former
manner of doing certain things. It was so in the handling of the gun,
and the adroit manner in which he stalked the savages, all go to show
that certain things which are associated with purely physical acts are
just as aptly done now as when in his other state."

"How is Chief getting along?"

"He is often an enigma to me. Each day he learns something new, and
really seems to seek the information. Most of the time he has been
helping John, but he always looks suspiciously at him. I can account for
it in one way only. He has never seen John talk, and this may be a
puzzle to him, and accounts for the strange looks he always gives him."

From the day that Chief saw the tree turned into lumber the mysteries of
the workshop charmed him. This penchant was taken advantage of by the
Professor, and when the day following the departure of the boys, the
Professor started up the grindstone and ground one of the tools he edged
up to it at once, and when the Professor reached for his bolo and put
its edge on the stone, and finally showed him the result, he was as much
excited as though he had discovered a lurking enemy.

He used the grindstone day after day in the same manner, and when it was
noticed how he delighted in it, the Professor took one of the tools
which had been ground and used it on a fine stone, to show how much
keener the edge was made.

The saw was a marvel, and he tried it until he learned its use, and a
line was drawn across the board, and when he failed to guide it the
Professor smilingly corrected him, and he could not be induced to lay it
aside until he had mastered the art of sawing along the line.

In the evening George again brought out the maps of the heavens and
asked why he had made the band which was traced in curves on the two
hemispheres.

"They show the course of the moon through the heavens, and in order to
get the position, the mariner measures the degrees between the moon and
the nearest fixed star."

"But if he hasn't any instrument to measure degrees, how can he tell how
to make the calculation?"

"In that case he simply takes the yardstick of the heavens out of its
box, and uses that as a measure."

"I never heard of such a thing before. Where is the box?"

"In the constellation Orion, which contains the most beautiful cluster
of stars in the heavens, and is visible all over the inhabitable world,
are four stars which form a parallelogram. See them on the map?
Betelguese and Rigel, at the extreme opposite corners, are of the first
magnitude, and the others that form the other corners are Bellatrix of
the second and Saiph of the third magnitude. Two of the stars are in the
northern and two in the southern hemisphere. Within the parallelogram
thus formed, you will note three very bright stars in a line. These are
exactly one degree apart, and is the yardstick the heavens are measured
with."

Harry announced one morning that they had a new calf, and there was a
rush of the boys down to the cattle range to welcome the newcomer. They
had a fine herd, and seemed to be domesticated. From the time they
acquired the first, of these animals there was always an abundance of
milk, and that meant butter, a thing which was very welcome to Ralph and
Tom.

Chief also enjoyed the luxury, but it was a remarkable thing that the
savages had not anywhere in their observations utilized the herds which
ranged to the north of them, and undoubtedly existed in the southern
portions of the island. There was always plenty of beef on hand, and
plenty of game was available whenever they had occasion to go for it,
and their larder was well supplied with the wild vegetables, although
they had to go considerable distances for them at times; but now that
the garden was coming in they did not apprehend so much trouble in that
direction.

There was one thing which none of them could understand in Chief. He
would be seen frequently going over toward the forest, in the direction
of the clay banks. He never tried to do this by stealth, but the
Professor was anxious to ascertain the reason for it.

One day while he was on his way to the same quarter, Harry took his gun,
as though on a little hunting trip, and followed him cautiously. Chief
made his way directly to the clay bank, and Harry, on the opposite bank,
sat down to watch him.

It will be remembered that in making their first experiments a
considerable amount of clay had been dug out, for use in making the
brick and the retorts required for the metallurgical processes. Chief
took out a considerable quantity, and after selecting the amount which
suited his fancy, sat down and ate it. Harry was almost disgusted at the
sight, and made his way back hurriedly.

The Professor and the others were waiting.

"What do you suppose he was after? Clay! And he ate it!"

This remarkable proceeding could hardly be credited by the boys.

"Ate it!" exclaimed George. "I think you must be mistaken."

Ralph looked at Tom, and immediately answered: "That is just what they
did with that stuff we saw that the first savages had; don't you
remember, Tom?"

"I never stopped to inquire; but I know they had something that looked
like clay mud. I wonder if that was eaten by them?"

"That is not so remarkable," observed the Professor. "It is a custom in
many parts of the world."

"Where?"

"In Eastern Asia, in Java, in the Himalaya Mountains, in northern
Europe, particularly the remote regions of Sweden, in Finland, as well
as in many parts of South America, particularly in Brazil, Peru and
Bolivia, and many instances are known of this habit among the savages of
the Pacific islands."

"Can they live on the clay for any length of time?"

"Humboldt, the great geologist, relates cases of tribes in South America
which live for at least three months at a time on this substance,
without any apparent ill effect, but from all the analyses made there
does not seem to be anything nutritious in it. I am not surprised that
Chief should have a knowledge of it."

Chief returned after an hour, apparently well satisfied with himself.

Since their return Harry and George had many times thought and talked
about the cave. They debated whether or not to advise the boys of its
existence, but could not satisfy themselves of the proper course to
pursue. They were not selfishly considering the entire possession of the
treasure. In fact they were too generous for that, but the boys would
know sooner or later, and it was a question whether to disclose it now
or later on. In this dilemma they called on the Professor.

"I know just how you feel about it," was the Professor's comment, "and I
am not competent to advise you. It is your own property, and you may
dispose of it as you wish."

"But it isn't our property. Without you it would never have been
discovered, and we shall refuse to take it unless you share with us"
exclaimed George.

"No, Professor, I can never consent to that disposition of it," was
Harry's determined expression, "and for my part nothing shall be done in
the matter without you agree with us on the course to follow."

The Professor reflected a while, and then answered: "As for myself I
have very little need for it, and there is no one near or dear to me
that I would willingly leave it to." With his head bowed, he became
silent, and then continued, in a most eager manner: "I had entirely
forgotten. I have some who are near and dear to me; I ought to remember
them, after all, and as you insist on it, you will pardon me, I know, if
I consent to take a portion of it, at least."

"It must be divided into thirds. I am sure there is enough there to make
a great many people happy."

"Weren't you boys happy before you acquired this treasure?"

"Yes; as happy as we could be in our condition."

"Do you think the treasure in the cave would make you any happier than
you have been?"

"Well, if we ever get out of here we can use it to good advantage."

"That is the whole secret of happiness with wealth--the knowledge of how
to use it."

When they left the Professor the boys wondered why at first he declared
that he had no one that he cared to leave the money to, and then
suddenly remembered that he did have some whom he cared for. The
Professor was as much a mystery to them as many of the things which had
come to them during their sojourn on the island. This was, in fact, the
only information that they had ever gleaned from him concerning his
home, his family, or his friends, and that was very meager at the most.

The boys were anxious to revisit the cave, and the Professor was pleased
at their determination, but advised them to make the visit themselves,
and to endeavor to find out the full extent of the subterranean
windings, and also suggested that they should try to make a working
chart of it for their own information.

It was a little difficult now, since the close association had grown up
between Harry and Tom, on the one hand, and George and Ralph on the
other, to find a suitable excuse for the absence of Harry and George,
but the Professor arranged this without creating suspicion on their
part.

"I think Ralph is a mighty fine fellow, and we get along splendidly, and
I don't think I ever met a pair of more unselfish boys," said George, as
they walked up the hill.

"That is my opinion, too. Tom is a most wholesouled fellow, and we find
so much that is likeable in each other, that I tell you I do not feel
like being so niggardly as to keep the knowledge of the cave and the
treasure away from them; and I feel the more about it that way when I
think of the terrible suffering they have gone through."

"Just my idea, exactly. How much do you really think there is in the
cave? I mean, what do you think it is worth in money?"

"I am sure the Professor knows. It would be awfully interesting to know.
Isn't it funny the Professor never said anything about the worth of it?"

"Yes, he did. Don't you remember, just before we left on the big trip he
wanted to know whether we cared to take the risks among the savages,
when we had so much treasure in sight?"

"Yes, but that didn't indicate whether there was a thousand or a million
there."

When they reached the entrance to the cave, they sat down and talked
over the matter again. The lamps were left unlighted, and they made no
effort to enter it.

"I have half a notion to go back and talk to the Professor, and bring
the boys over." George looked at Harry inquiringly.

"Do you really mean it?" asked Harry.

"I do."

"Look over there; see who is coming," said George, with a laugh.

Red Angel was on the way with his gun. "You little rascal! How did you
find out we were over here?" He didn't answer, but he went up to George
and looked up into his face, as though he didn't quite understand that
kind of a greeting.

The boys picked up the lamps and went back to the house, and the
Professor was surprised at the early return, but he did not make any
mention of it to either of the boys, and nothing more was said about it
during that day or evening.




CHAPTER XIII

THE ACCIDENT TO JOHN AND THE RESTORATION OF MEMORY


The island yielded an abundance of nuts of various descriptions, the
most prolific being the Brazil nut, which grows in the form of a large
sphere, from three to four inches in diameter, the shell being very
hard, like the cocoanut, and when broken open is found to be filled with
the segmentally formed nuts which we all know.

This was gathered in large quantities, and was the principal source of
oil which was used for the lamps, as they had no other means of
illumination. To people in the habit of using the lighter mineral oils,
and electricity, this was certainly primitive enough. The difficulty,
however, with the gathering of the nuts was this: Unless gathered at a
certain time it is almost impossible to express the oil, and if kept for
any length of time, particularly in an unripe state, they would become
very rancid.

George pondered over this for some time, and asked the Professor the
cause of it. In response, he said: "Nature has a very peculiar way of
protecting her products. It is the same with nuts, as it is with
potatoes and fruit. Have you ever noticed how unripe fruit withers, when
taken from the tree, and that potatoes shrivel up when they are dug up
before fully matured?"

"That is the trouble with the whole batch of potatoes we now have."

"Unripe fruit and vegetables have an exterior coating which is porous
and pervious to water when it is unripe. But when it fully ripens this
coating is chemically changed into a thin, impervious coating of a
cork-like structure, through which water cannot pass, and as a result
potatoes, and fruit, will keep through an entire winter and become
mellower and better as time goes on."

The colony was dependent for its supply of eggs on the numerous flocks
of prairie chickens which were found in the abounding fields of grain,
particularly barley. It was no trick to bag a half dozen of these birds
at a shot, on account of their numbers, and, as before related, while
Angel never ate any of them, he was the most persistent gatherer because
the beautiful oval eggs attracted him, and George's cakes always
appealed to his fancy.

The difficulty with Angel was he did not discriminate between the good
and the bad eggs, and George was desirous of knowing how to distinguish
between the fresh and spoilt ones.

As usual, the Professor was appealed to and he gave a standard rule for
determining this: "As Angel brings in the eggs put them in a pail of
water, and select only those which fall to the bottom and rest on the
side. An egg several weeks old will remain at the bottom, but the large
end will be much higher than the small end. If it is several months old
the large end will be uppermost, with the small end pointing down; and
if it is thoroughly rotten it will float at the top of the water, with
the pointed side down."

"That is a very curious way of finding it out. I would like to know why
the egg acts in that manner?"

"After an egg is laid, a chemical change begins to take place, and more
or less gas is formed. This gas finds its way to the large end, and as
the decomposition increases the egg becomes lighter at the heavy end,
and finally enough gas is evolved to bring it to the surface."

[Illustration: _Fig. 15._ TESTING EGGS]

The most important work on hand was the construction of the addition to
their home. After considering the matter in all its details, it was
concluded to put up a building entirely separate from the other
structures, to contain four rooms, one of them to be large and utilized
as a common living room, and the others as sleeping apartments.

The material had been taken out for the building, and the Professor,
John, George and Ralph were engaged at this work, while Harry and Tom
were engaged in the machine shop and were busy in turning out the
barrels for new guns, as well as preparing the ammunition.

The tools in the machine shop were not numerous enough to advantageously
utilize more of them there, and the building was now very important to
them, as the four boys were compelled to sleep in the shop, for want of
room in the house.

The joist had all been laid for the lower floor and the studding now
being put up and the upper joist laid on preparatory to erecting the
rafters. John was an expert in building, and was really the directing
hand at the various steps in the operation. While engaged in the drawing
up of the rafters, one of the floor pieces gave way, and John was
precipitated to the floor below, striking as he fell one of the lower
joist, which cut a terrible gash in his head and rendered him
unconscious.

The Professor rushed over to the fallen man, and the boys were on the
spot to render assistance. Chief, who was also an interested worker, was
the first to grasp him with his powerful arms, and disdaining the
assistance of the others, carried him to the house and gently laid him
down, as the Professor directed.

Without a word he rushed for the jar of water and brought it to the
Professor, who bathed his wounds, but the blow was so severe that he
exhibited no signs of returning consciousness.

Harry and Tom rushed over to the house in consternation, and exhibited
the greatest grief.

"Do you think he has been badly hurt? Do you think it is fatal?"

"It is still too early to determine that. See this wound? It was a
terrible blow. As it is, directly above the ear, it may not be as
serious as if he had been struck forward nearer the temples."

During the entire day John lay there, breathing with some degree of
regularity, but with a greatly accelerated pulse, and the Professor was
constantly watching this phase of the case.

There was little sleep that night. All were too anxious to retire. Chief
was on hand without a moment's intermission. George prepared the meals,
but the native never left the room even for the purpose of taking
refreshment, and it was really pathetic to see this exhibition of
sympathy, which was constantly alluded to by the Professor.

"The Chief has in him the making of a man. The surest indication of a
real human trait is just what he is showing. The lower man is the less
he cares for his fellows."

During the night the fever was close to the danger point, and the
Professor never left his side. As the day advanced the fever abated, and
his breathing became more normal. Before noon there was a marked change.
On the day of the accident, and during the night, John lay there
motionless, and, aside from his regular breathing and a few periods of
spasmodic twitchings, there was nothing to indicate that he was living.

But he now became restless, and occasionally opened his eyes, and all
stood intently watching him. All through this period his face was pale
and drawn, but a color began to come, and he turned his head from side
to side, and the intervals between the openings of the eyelids became
shorter. At first the eyes gave a glassy stare, but now at each
recurring stare the eyeballs would turn and search the room, and
although he would gaze in the faces of the watchers, the look did not
indicate recognition.

Suddenly he opened his eyes wide, and grasping the covers drew himself
forward and upward slowly, turning his head around from side to side.
The Professor held out his hand, as a warning not to disturb him. He sat
up and gazed first at one and then at the other.

What a wonderful difference was exhibited in the eye. It was bright and
lustrous, and every glance betokened a question. Not a word was spoken.
It was so tense that the boys appeared to be hypnotized. When he had
fully taken in his surrounding, he grasped the Professor's hand, and
said: "Where am I? Who are you?" Without another word he sank back on
the pillow exhausted, and the Professor leaned over him and quietly
said: "You are yourself again; and we are your friends."

"Friends; friends," he muttered to himself. "Yes; yes, I remember," and
his eyes closed, his limbs relaxed, and he passed off into a quiet
sleep.

The boys filed out of the room, and the Professor, with a smile, despite
the tears that fell, walked out without saying a word, nor did the boys
ask any more questions. The Chief never moved, but kept his eyes on
John, and he did not even heed Angel, who came down from the rafters
quietly, and passed out the door, and stood beside George, and leaned
his head against him, as the boys began to whisper to each other.

The boys had witnessed a scene which it falls to the lot of few to
experience. The awakening of the faculty of remembrance is one of the
greatest mysteries of human existence.

John slept for three hours, and there was no thought of work or play.
Barring the occasional visits of the Professor to see the patient, they
were together. It was one of the most remarkable events in their lives.

"Isn't it singular," asked George, "that he has never been able to talk
since he has been with us?"

"The medical term applied to the loss of that faculty is called aphasia.
The function of speech seems to have its seat in a portion of the left
side of the brain, and when that portion is diseased or injured, it
affects the speech in many ways. Sometimes the sufferer knows what he
wants to say, but cannot utter the word; at other times he will say the
wrong thing, knowing that he is doing so, but utterly unable to prevent
it; it also shows several other phases where the sentences become
disjointed, or meaningless, not due to lack of intelligence."

"Has no way been discovered whereby the diseased part can be cured?"

"Operations have been performed with remarkable results, but not with
uniform success. In some cases where the speech center is destroyed, a
new brain center has been developed, and the lost power of speech
recovered."

"I cannot understand Chief's intense interest in John," said Tom.

"That is a peculiar thing. The savage, no doubt, considers him demented,
and it is a singular thing that people of low intellectual order among
many people, believe the insane person is exalted, and are sometimes
treated as deities."

Before noon the patient began to move about uneasily, and soon
thereafter awoke. The moment his eyes opened he looked at the Professor,
who said: "You are so much better. Are you hungry?"

In anticipation of this event the Professor had asked the boys to
prepare some delicacies for him the moment he awoke.

As he had eaten nothing since the morning of the day before he replied
affirmatively, and after he had eaten and the wound in his head was
dressed, he began a series of questionings on every conceivable subject.

"We are on an island, and there are a number of tribes here, with
incessant tribal warfares between them, and it appears that the
principal occasion of the wars is due to the possession of the captives
which they take from the toll of the sea. I was one of several
unfortunates shipwrecked here over a year ago, during one of the worst
storms that I ever saw at sea."

"It was undoubtedly the one which we experienced, although we were the
occupants of a ship which had an explosion, and we were left adrift
when this storm was brewing. But I must advise you to remain quiet for
the day, until you regain your strength, and we can then tell our story,
and we shall be glad to learn yours."

It was a joy to all to know that John had recovered his memory, and
Harry was anxious to present the match box, to see whether it was his,
but the Professor advised against exciting him in the least until the
following day.

The Professor had not even asked his name, as he wished all to be
present when the revelations were made. During the most of the day John
slept. It appeared as though nature had exhausted herself in bringing
about the cure. The wound, however, was a most serious one, and the
Professor knew that the utmost care must be taken with a fractured
skull, to prevent the setting in of complications which might
injuriously affect the brain.

"Do not feel any alarm about him now," was the Professor's injunction;
"he is not at this time in a serious condition, and I believe his
remarkable constitution will pull him through without any further
trouble. In the meantime, let us proceed with our work, and give him
ample time to recover without any sort of harassment."

All returned to their duties with more cheerful hearts. It seemed as
though something had been lifted from their minds. The second day after
the event following the restoration of his reason, John would not be
left in quiet any longer.

He sat up in his couch, and looked over the boys, as he greeted them
heartily.

"Do you remember me?" asked Harry, as he held his hand.

"Yes, I remember all of you, but I cannot remember how you came to me,
or how I met you, or where. I know that we went together on a journey,
and I saw some things that made me think of things in the past. I don't
remember ever having been in this place before."

"Don't you remember the shop, and the water wheel, and the building of
the house?" asked the Professor.

He looked around in a bewildered way, before answering: "The shop and
the building? Where--when was that?"

"At the time you fell from the building, four days ago?"

"Fell from the building--what building?"

"What do you remember about the trip we made?" continued the Professor.

"I remember that we had a glorious fight, yes, several of them, and I
remember some brave boys, the noblest fellows I ever saw--and you are
the boys--I can remember you well--I never saw braver men in battle; and
I also remember seeing something which you gave me," and he searched his
pockets, and looked around to try and remember what it was. "Probably,
that was a fancy only--let me see," and he stroked his forehead, as if
trying to recall it.

Harry reached down in his pocket and drew forth the match safe and held
it before him. "Is this what you mean?"

He grasped it, and eagerly exclaimed: "Yes; that is what I mean."

"Are those the initials of your name, and is your first name John?"

"Yes; John Lewis Varney. But who are you, and how did you come here?"

"My name is Harry Crandall, and this is the Professor who was with us on
the schoolship _Investigator_ when she went to the bottom of the sea,
following an explosion."

"The _Investigator_ that was to have sailed from New York in
September"--and he looked around, "September, last year?" he asked
inquiringly.

"Yes," answered the Professor; "and this is George Mayfield, and here
are Ralph Wharton and Tom Chambers. Do you remember we rescued them on
the trip?"

He looked to the floor for a moment, and then slowly said: "I recall
that also, but I do not remember how we got away from the savages."

At that moment his eyes fell on Chief, who had witnessed this remarkable
scene, and he started up and leaned forward, and spoke to the Chief in
his own language. This effect on the savage was electrical, who rushed
up to the couch and clutched John's hand. Then turning to the others,
John continued: "Uraso knows me, but I doubt whether he recognized me in
this bearded appearance, because when our acquaintance began my face was
smoothly shaven, and I had an entirely different attire from what I
acquired later on."

"We are all intensely interested in knowing your history, and how you
came here; but first tell us what you knew about the _Investigator_. You
seemed to know about the sailing date."

"I was booked to sail in her as one of the instructors, but a serious
illness, contracted in Africa, from the previous visit there, prevented
me from accepting the berth, and she sailed without me."

"Isn't that a singular coincidence," exclaimed Ralph. "My uncle told me
that one of his tutors at college, by the name of Varney, would be on
the ship, and that is one of the reasons he so strongly urged me to sign
for the trip."

"Your name--what was his name?"

"Stratton; James Stratton?"

"Jim Stratton, the big, healthy, jolly boy! Everybody liked him. And you
are his nephew?"

Then turning to Chief the Professor asked: "Do you remember when and how
we captured him?" John looked and tried to recall the incident. "No, I
do not now think of anything which is familiar, nor do I remember seeing
him until a moment ago."

"But if you are not too much exhausted, we would be interested in the
history."

"I do not suppose that my history, previous to reaching the island,
would be very interesting, but as you have asked it I will briefly
relate it."




CHAPTER XIV

JOHN'S WONDERFUL STORY


"I was born on the Atlantic seacoast in a small New England town. My
parents were the richest people in the community, and it was their
ambition, as it was mine, to finish my education at one of the great
universities there; but shortly after my entrance as a student the
entire fortune of my parents was swept away, and I was compelled to seek
employment.

"I was provided with a place in a commercial house in which my guardian
was interested, and the only consideration shown me during the six
months I remained there was the amount of work they could get out of me.
Like many other boys I ran away, and took a position on a sailing
vessel. This was the turning point in my career.

"I was fortunate enough to fall into the hands of a captain who was,
undoubtedly, an exception to his class, but he had in early years been a
pedagogue, and seeing the disposition on my part to make a constant use
of his library, of which he had a most wonderful store, he took me from
the drudgery, which was my early lot, and made me his assistant.

"I was a good penman, and before long I was entrusted with the position
of recording and entry clerk for the ship, and I took charge of the
log, and did things of that kind under his supervision during the long
trip to Chinese waters.

"The trip among the western islands occupied two years, and I became an
expert skipper as time went on, and many, many hours he and I sat up
together and perused the wonderful books he had, and discussed a wide
range of subjects which the readings suggested. It was a feast for me,
and it was such a pleasure to him, which I know was real and unaffected.

"Three years after my sudden disappearance from New Bedford the ship
sailed into the harbor, and the first one to greet us was a beautiful
girl, the daughter of the captain, and the first most graceful act of
his was to bring her over to me, and I was presented to her.

"I do not know how I ever passed the days of the following two weeks.
Everything was a dream to me after I saw her, and I often imagined that
the captain knew what my symptoms were. One day he called me to the
cabin and said: 'John, how do you feel about signing for another term of
three years?' My heart was so full that I answered: 'Why for three
years? Make it for as long as I live.' The captain smiled and stroked
his beard for a while, and then his countenance changed, and he said,
'John, you know I am blunt and open in all my dealings, and you haven't
been treating me in that way.'

"That was the only time in the entire three years he had ever upbraided
me, or found any fault, and I was so dumbfounded that I did not know how
to answer, and when I recovered and inquired in what manner I had
offended him, he replied, 'I did not say you had offended me. But you
love Harriet, and I know you do, and you have been trying to hide it
from me.'

"How had he learned that she and I loved each other from the moment we
first met, and that we saw each other at every opportunity, and made
mutual confessions of love? I started to apologize, but he began to
smile again, and I knew it was not so serious. 'Yes,' he continued, 'I
have charged Harriet with it, and she confessed, so it will not be
necessary for you to defend yourself.'

"We were in port for three months, and Harriet told her father that she
could not bear to have us both go away, and before the ship sailed we
were married, a fine suite of rooms was set aside for our use, and I
became the first mate of the ship, as well as the first mate of the most
beautiful woman in the world.

"Thus I passed a year of the happiest days that it was ever given man to
enjoy. Together we gleaned the library for our recreation, and with
music and song, it was one continual revel of bliss. But one day we
steamed into a plague-infected port, where quarantine regulations in
those days were not the best, and before we could take the proper
precautions the captain and my wife were stricken.

"The terrible story that followed, the days of ravings, and finally the
death of my wife, are too tragic to repeat in detail. The captain
recovered, and, singularly, I escaped, and as soon as he had partially
recovered I ordered the ship to sail away from that accursed place.

"When the captain recovered he was a changed man. His daughter was the
only thing to him in the world, and her happiness had been the greatest
delight and pleasure. But now he rarely appeared at meals, and the
handling of the ship devolved on me. I could not rouse him sufficiently
to learn what course to take or what disposition to make of much of the
cargo.

"Two months after the sad event he called me to his cabin, and he was
lying down, weak and emaciated. 'I have asked you to come because there
are some things I want to place in your hands. I have no further use for
them, as the effect of the plague has never left me, and I am glad of
it.

"'You may break the seal of this when I am dead.' This was most
heartrending, coming from a man I loved better than any one in the world
excepting my wife. He died that night, in silence, and without a soul
near him.

"We were then on the broad sea, west of Australia, and before the
funeral services were to take place I opened the sealed package, and I
learned that the ship and cargo, together with all securities and funds
in the hands of his bankers, were willed to me, and I was enjoined to
commit his body to the sea.

"I changed the course of the ship to the nearest port, and sought the
United States Consul, in order to register the papers, and to establish,
by the record there, the new ownership of the vessel.

"When I returned to the ship something seemed to prevent me from going
aboard. It was such a weird and ghastly feeling that I did not rebel
against the warning. Indeed, I was relieved that the indescribable
something, which men sometimes in that condition feel, turned me away.
The only thing that remained close to my heart were the things that my
loved one wore, and those things she treasured, and the store of books.

"All those I had removed, but I could never go aboard that ship again. I
advertised the ship for sale, and it soon found a purchaser, and I was a
wanderer on the face of the earth. My parents were both dead, and I had
no brothers or sisters living.

"Where should I go, or what pursuit should I follow? I went through
India, listlessly, and from a Mediterranean port sailed for
England--anywhere. But we landed at Gibraltar. There I saw a troop of
smart English on the way to Africa. I was imbued with the spirit of
adventure, and I offered to join, but was refused, as I was not a
subject of the Queen. But later I knew how to correct that, and I sailed
with the next detachment to the south, and for two years I took part in
the Matabela campaign, where the fighting was more bitter and relentless
than in any colonial contest England had ever engaged in. I was severely
wounded, and sent to England at the close of my term of service and
received an honorable discharge. In the meantime I learned that all the
funds from the proceeds of the ship had been swallowed up in a bank
disaster, where they had been deposited, and I was left with nothing but
the little I had saved.

"My discharge finally served the purpose of securing me a position as a
tutor to a young lord, and through him I later on obtained a berth as
instructor in a well-known institution. But this was too tame for me. I
went to Greece and entered the army, and fought through two campaigns
against the Turks, and when the war ended I took the first ship and
sailed for New York.

"Within a day after landing in that city I joined the army and was sent
west, where, within six months, it landed me in a campaign under General
Crook against the Apaches of the Southwest, and was present at the
capture of Geronimo, the most bloodthirsty devil that was ever permitted
to live. From there we went to the north, and we had a repetition of the
experiences against the most skilled warriors on the American continent,
the Siouxs and the Arapahoes.

"When my enlistment expired I had earned a lieutenancy, but I had tired
of the turmoil of the past six years, and returned east and then
accepted a position as Professor of Philosophy in the college where Jim
Stratton was a student.

"I was always fond of tools, and the machine shop on board our vessel
was a constant source of enjoyment, and before I sold it I had become so
proficient in the use of tools that I could make anything in wood or
iron.

"I enjoyed teaching, but the life was not free enough for me, and after
five years of that drudging life I sailed for Europe, and again visited
India, going to all the great ruins; then to the scenes of the vast
exploring fields of the Archeological Societies, in Arabia, on the
plains of Babylon, and in Syria. From there I turned to Egypt, the land
of the greatest mysteries on earth. I went up the Nile far beyond
Khartoum, and tried to interest myself in some of the interesting things
that men are constantly bringing to light, and which go to show the
great antiquity of men. I joined a caravan to traverse the White and the
Blue Nile, and to go over the trails made by Baker and Livingstone and
Stanley.

"Here, at last, seemed to be my work. It had enough of the charm in it
on account of the hazard which accompanied us on every step, and this
for the first time put me on my mettle to learn to dig out the hidden
secrets, which caused it to be called the 'Dark Continent.'

"Am I tiring you? Well, then, in company with another adventurous spirit
we traversed the most remote parts of that vast interior and met with
adventures which may some time interest you. Thus four years were spent,
without seeing civilization, and in a region where men hunted men for
the pleasure of it.

"I was hunting them, too, but it was not living men, but those who had
died thousands and thousands of years ago. But that terrible sickness,
the jungle fever, took hold of us, and when we emerged from the forests,
and found our way to the nearest settlement my companion died, and I was
again thrown back on the world.

"As soon as I could travel I sailed for New York, and the first man I
met was dear Jim Stratton, who insisted that I must take a position as
archeologist in the college with which I was formerly connected, but
this I declined, and seeing me in an emaciated condition suggested that
the position of professor of philosophy in the ship training school
would be the very place to give me the benefit of sea air and
employment--the latter, particularly, because he knew how I had always
been a fiend for work, and that I must be busy at something.

"I accepted, but a month before the ship sailed I was taken down with
another serious attack, with complications of diseases, and recovered a
week after the _Investigator_ sailed. I took the train for the west,
expecting to take advantage of the mild climate of California during the
winter, and when I reached San Francisco I was greeted at the hotel by
an old acquaintance who invited me to his room for a talk on a very
important matter.

"It turned out that he and a friend, who had considerable money, were
about to purchase either a good, strong sailing vessel, or a small
steamer, which was to go in quest of buried treasure which the chart had
indicated, this treasure being the freights of many of the Castilian
ships of the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries, and in certain places
the hoards of the buccaneers that infested the western seas.

"Here was an opportunity to recuperate, and it had plenty of action in
it to suit me, and I joined. We sailed from the port in the latter part
of December, about the time you were passing through the Straits of
Magellan.

"We had a fast sailer and a staunch boat, but my friend was unwise in
the choice of the sailing master, but this did not hamper us much during
the ordinary course of sailing, but in a short time he with several
others of the crew attacked us and attempted to capture the ship. In the
battle which followed my friend was killed, and his friend dangerously
wounded. This was the condition of affairs when the terrible monsoon
struck the vessel.

"That terrible sea and the danger to the ship settled all difficulties.
The master was too full of drink to take charge of the ship, and the
mate was not much better. I took command, and for four days we
maneuvered the ship to keep it from foundering; at the end of that time
the master recovered momentarily, and, securing possession of a
revolver, cleared the deck and prevented us from handling it.

"He resisted every effort to capture him, and as a last resort I was
compelled to shoot him. This was a signal, notwithstanding our perilous
condition, for the intimate associates of the master to range themselves
against us, for we now had only four men against the seven who were in
league.

"I did not want to take human life, and I refrained from this last step,
and as the ship was bare of sails and we were in position to control the
tiller we passed two days and a night, with only a few crackers for
food, and almost exhausted from the strain.

"Night was approaching, and with not a star in sight, and in no
condition to take any reckonings, we made up our minds that we must
somehow fight our way through one more night before giving up. The
mainmast was a wreck; the shrouds on the port side having been torn from
the gunwale the second day of the storm, and the entire deck was one
mass of debris and wreckage.

"It was a dangerous thing to move along from one part of the deck to the
other, as this loose accumulation of material, at each successive lurch,
would be tossed first one way and then the other. This was one thing
that kept the villains at bay, but it prevented us as well as themselves
from getting any food.

"In desperation I took my revolver, and, at the risk of my life, at
every step, forced my way to the pantry and found some food. Before I
reached the bridge the roar of the breakers fell upon me, but the
darkness was now too intense to enable me to see anything, and I knew
that our next great catastrophe would be the rocks.

"I never reached the bridge again, for the vessel struck, and with a
terrific grating sound it moved toward land, and then a giant hand
seemed to lift it upwardly, and I knew no more. When I awoke, which must
have been along noon of the following day, I saw one of the sailors
dead, not fifty feet away, and the master of the ship was close beside
me, with an indescribable mass of wreckage all about.

"When I had recovered sufficiently to judge of my surrounding, I went
over to the master and to the sailor, and saw that their pockets had
been rifled, and I instinctively put my hand to my pockets, to find that
everything, my watch, this match box, which was a present from my wife,
my knife and everything in my pockets were gone.

"From this I knew that such of my companions as had been saved had gone
off, without making any attempt to ascertain whether I was alive or not,
and had taken my things besides.

"I had my clothing, which was still wet, but I was glad to be alive.
That seems singular, doesn't it, when I had thrown myself time and again
right into the jaws of death! I saw a barren shore, but found plenty to
eat as I advanced into the interior. I went to the south and southeast
for the first day, and soon saw the first signs of human habitations.

"Then I came across a tribe of savages who were sacrificing some human
victims. It dawned on me that it might have been some of my companions,
and a spirit of revenge possessed me. But I had no weapons, but relying
on my experience in eluding savages, I crawled up to the village, during
the height of the orgy, and slew one of the warriors, and took his
weapons, as well as his headdress.

"But I was discovered and brought the entire tribe down on me. I avoided
them, doubled on my tracks, and ran into another branch of what proved
to be the same tribe, as the headdress plainly showed me. I again
avoided capture, and in going through the hills discovered a cave, in
which I took refuge.

"To my surprise the cave was tenanted by a certain class of savages, and
I had reason to believe that it was the abode of the medicine men of
the tribe, or the Hoodoos, because the warriors avoided it as they would
a pestilence. I found some wonderful things in that cave, in which I
secluded myself as best I could to avoid detection from those within.

"But I needed food, and one night stole out, only to learn that they had
known of my entrance into the cave, and was driven back again, and
making my way into the interior, how far I do not know, lay down
exhausted, and, on awakening, not knowing which way to go, heard the
voices of the savages, and in going in the opposite direction was
surprised to see a streak of light ahead.

"Approaching near the entrance, waiting there for hours, and not seeing
or hearing them, cautiously crept out, and found that the sun had risen
several hours before, but that the opening was to the western side of
the hill and I had entered it on the eastern side."

"Won't you tell us, John, how you knew it was to the west, and that it
was morning?" The boys looked at George a little queerly, and so did the
Professor, and he quickly divined the reason, and continued: "Pardon me,
Mr. Varney, but we have been in habit of calling you John so long that I
forgot myself."

"You have been calling me John? How did you find out my name?"

"We simply took that as the most convenient name; but please go on and
forgive me for interrupting."

"No apology is necessary. I hope you will know me as John only. But you
asked me a question. I examined the moss, which in the southern
hemisphere grows more abundantly on the south side of the tree; just as
in the north it grows only on the north side. As to the sun, if it had
been afternoon it would have been to the west of the hill and not to
east of it.

"Having emerged from the cave in the vicinity of the last village
another flight was necessary, and I turned to the south, reaching a
large stream in my wanderings, and, in order to avoid capture, swam it
in the night. I still had the bows and a dozen arrows, together with a
crude hatchet, which was taken from the warrior.

"The flight was continued to the south, and thus I lived from day to day
for over three months, occasionally seeing the various tribes. Then for
a period of two months more I was hunted over the entire southern
portion of the island, and finally driven into the mountain. Between six
and seven months after the shipwreck, in a moment of carelessness, I was
taken by a tribe in the south, and held in confinement for over a month,
when I was to be offered up as a sacrifice.

"On the day appointed there was a terrible uproar in camp, and I could
see that a neighboring tribe had attacked, and escaped, only to be
captured by the successful invaders. This was the tribe that Osaga,
here, was a member of. Again escaping I secured one of their spears and
a bow with some arrows, and fought my first captors with such
determination that Osaga's people became my friends and I was given
limited liberty, and began to learn the language.

"Before long the two most powerful tribes united and attacked us, and
defeated Osaga's people, and I escaped to the mountains. This was fully
eleven or twelve months after being cast ashore, and on the last day
they were in sight I can remember going down a steep precipice. The only
recollection of my former self came day before yesterday when I awoke
from a refreshing sleep."




CHAPTER XV

CHIEF AND THE POISON PLANT


John was visibly exhausted from the effort he had made, and soon passed
off into a quiet sleep. During the evening the Professor suggested that
they might retire to the shop, so that he would not be disturbed, but
John insisted that it was so good to hear their voices again, and would
like to have them all present.

Harry and George kept them interested a great portion of the time with
stories of their adventures. They told about the bear fight for the
possession of the honey; the shooting of the wild animals in South
Forest, the making of the flag, the capture of the yaks, the flagpole
incident, the fight between the bulls, and the amusing affair connected
with the removal of the yaks to their new home.

This latter occurrence is what amused John the most, and suggested that
probably if they had adopted some of the hitches which sailors used the
yaks could have been controlled more easily. This interested George.

"Won't you please tell us something about the hitches and knots which
the sailors make?"

"They have a great many forms, each designed for some particular
purpose, and if you get a rope I will try and give you some of the
principal ones. Get a piece long enough so that the knots and hitches
can be kept for future reference."

[Illustration: _Fig. 16. Slip knot._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 17. Overhand knot._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 18. Flemish Loo._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 19. Fig. 8 knot._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 20. Stevedore knot._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 21. Bowline knot._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 22. Double knot._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 23. Weaver's knot._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 24. Carrick bend._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 25. Reef bend._]

He then proceeded to make the knots, and continued: "The seven knots
(Figs. 16 to 22, inclusive) are made at the ends of the rope, as you
will notice, and are the forms used to attach the rope to an object. In
the next three forms two ropes are attached to each other, and are
usually called 'bends' (Figs. 23, 24, 25).

"Then, in addition to that, the sailor has several ways of attaching the
rope by a hitch around a standard, or other object. Look at these two
forms (Figs. 26, 27). Look at the boat knot, where the hitch is made in
the rope itself; and the sheet bend toggle, where the ends of two ropes
are attached together to a standard or cleat. And now I am making what
are called hitches, and the three forms (Figs. 28, 29, 30) are the best
examples."

[Illustration: _Fig. 26. Boat Knot._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 27. Sheet bend and Toggle._]

[Illustration: _Clove Hitch Fig. 28._]

[Illustration: _Half Hitch Fig. 29._]

[Illustration: _Timber Hitch Fig. 30._]

Thus the conversation drifted from one subject to another, covering a
variety of interesting topics. George reminded the Professor that he had
not yet explained to them what the spectroscope was, and its uses. He
laughingly responded:

"That instrument is one of the most wonderful in all the ranges of human
discoveries. By its means the elements of substances are determined, and
the composition of the heavenly bodies are ascertained."

"In what way is it done?"

"Simply by using light as the agency."

"Is it like a telescope?"

[Illustration: _Fig. 31. The color Spectrum._]

"No; entirely different. It depends wholly on one thing, and that is the
breaking up or dividing the light that comes from an object. Let me make
this a little plainer. If a ray of sunlight is allowed to pass through
an orifice into a darkened room, and in the transit through the opening
it goes through a prism, or three-sided piece of glass, the light
produced on the opposite wall will show the seven colors of which
sunlight is composed. The drawing (Fig. 31) shows how this is arranged.
Now iron shows these colors differently arranged, aluminum in another
way, and so on with all different substances, and the light projected
from each is called its spectrum, its particular analysis."

John's recital during the day had produced a powerful impression on
all, as well it might. It shows what wonderful trials men can endure.
Ralph and Tom were frequently affected by it, and at times could not
prevent tears from coming. They recalled their own sufferings.

The Professor thanked John that evening for his story, and said: "We
must not tax the patient with any more talk to-night. We have learned a
lesson of perseverance and trials. The history of man is always
profitable, and we are thankful for the news it gives us of the people
here but you must be patient and wait a more opportune time to hear our
story, and then we can advise with each other as to our future course."

The boys were early in conference with each other after they left John,
because there were some interesting things to them in John's story,
which needed clearing up.

"Did you hear what he said about that cave?" was Ralph's first question.

"Yes; and I think I know where that cave is?" answered Harry.

"Where?" asked Tom and George in a breath.

"Right at the camp where we found you."

"Oh, you mean that cave we found at the hillside after we started for
the river?"

"Don't you recall that John took me around to the mouth of the cave, and
when we said that we might use that to hide in, he shook his head, and
moved away?"

"I thought the Professor acted queerly about it, too, because he urged
us away from the place."

All remembered the circumstance, and they also recalled that the
Professor gave a vague reply when they asked him the reason why.

George cast a scrutinizing glance at Harry, who waited for him to speak.
"Harry, do you think he found any treasure in that cave?"

Ralph and Tom now opened their eyes in wonder. Was that what he meant
when he said there was something wonderful there? Harry looked at the
boys for a moment, in the intensity of the situation, and said: "And we
have also found a cave." But the eyes of George caught Harry, who
suddenly stopped, because he recalled their agreement not to divulge it
to the boys until the matter was mentioned to him.

"Where is it?" exclaimed Tom, eagerly.

"Not far from here."

"Will it be much trouble to visit it?"

"No; and we shall probably do so some day."

An island full of bitter and vindictive savages, and a handful of men to
meet them. It looked, indeed, like a hopeless task. John's story left
many things unsaid; many things that they longed to know. Who were
Wright and Walters, whose names were in the note found in the
_Investigator's_ lifeboat, and who was Will, the writer of the note?

The Professor was just as anxious as the boys to have those matters
cleared up, but he knew it would be unwise to tax his strength with a
further recital, and the inevitable questions which would be propounded,
and it was well that his injunctions were followed, because he was not
yet well by any means, and the further news which they awaited was
postponed.

In the evening Ralph had the flute, but the bass viol was not yet ready,
so that the two instruments gave a little diversion to the day of
excitement and wonder.

John's illness did not now interfere with the work on the house. It was
pushed forward with the greatest energy, the roof and sides enclosed,
and they were now nearly ready for occupying it, by the time John was
again able to be about.

Shortly after they had made the first samples of glass, some months
before, the trip to the west had postponed the work in that direction,
and the Professor, with the aid of George, turned out the first samples
of glass, which they intended to use in the new building.

"Why can't we have a looking-glass? It would be such fun to set up
several of them."

"I think we have sufficient mercury for the purpose," answered the
Professor; so calling in Ralph they set to work, under the Professor's
direction, to make some mirrors.

"The principal thing in mirrors is to get a white reflecting surface.
Silver and mercury are metals which lend themselves to that use. If you
polish anything bright enough it will serve as a mirror, but the whiter
the surface is the better."

"Then why wouldn't white paper be the best?"

"It would if you could get a fine polish on its surface, but the finest
surface on the densest paper is not as smooth as the polished surface of
the metals."

"What is the best way to make the mirror?"

"The most available plan for us to follow is to make an amalgam of tin
and mercury."

"But what do you mean by an amalgam?"

"It means the combination of mercury, or quicksilver, with any other
metal."

"Will it be difficult to combine tin and mercury, so as to make an
amalgam?"

"That is one of the simplest things in the arts. Tin and mercury unite
by merely rubbing them together; see how easily they combine to form
just such a surface as you want."

"Isn't that fine? But as that shines so nicely, what is the need of
putting a glass over it?"

"Simply to protect the amalgamated surface."

The largest piece of glass thus far made was sixteen by twenty-four
inches, and the boys selected the most perfect pane, and in a short time
a very good mirror had been turned out.

"It has occurred to me that it would be good policy to make a number of
small mirrors, say six inches square. They would be a valuable asset to
us in our next expedition."

This opened the eyes of the boys to the commercial utility of the work
they were engaged in for the first time. George rushed over and brought
Tom and Harry to the laboratory, and exhibited the mirrors, and
explained that they intended to make a number of small ones to take with
them.

"That is a capital idea. Won't the natives go wild over them?"

They were at work at once, first cutting up some of the glass the
requisite size, and before the afternoon closed they had several small
ones in addition to the large one.

The large one was carried over to the living room, and when it was
brought in and hung against the wall John's face lighted up, when they
told him of the work required to turn out the glass, and to make the
amalgam.

"What a glorious opportunity you boys are having. How anxious I am to
get up and help you. What a splendid mirror that is. You surprise me
with the character of your work."

"We are going to have real windows in the new house."

At this instant Chief appeared at the door, and as he moved forward in
front of the glass he started back in fright as his own image appeared
to him. All of them laughed, and as he was now at one side of the mirror
he could not see himself. But Harry mischievously turned it, and then it
dawned on the Chief that it was simply a perfect representation of
himself.

All savages know of the glistening qualities of surfaces, but few of
them, as was the case with Chief, had ever seen any made with the white
amalgam, which, of course, made a perfect counterfeit resemblance.

But Harry delighted him beyond measure when he presented one of the
small mirrors, and George took a piece of the ramie cloth and folded it
around the mirror, a proceeding Chief could not understand until John
showed him it was for the purpose of preserving it.

[Illustration: "_He started back in fright as his own image appeared to
him_" [See p. 194]]

He kept it in the cover religiously from that day forward, except at
such times as he was employed in examining it.

[Illustration: _Fig. 32. Amarylla. Chief's Poison Vegetable._]

When Chief appeared it was not noticed that he carried a curious looking
bulb, and when he sat down to experiment the mirror several of them fell
from the pouch or pocket which was put in the garment which had been
provided for him.

The Professor saw the bulbs and picked up one of them and glanced about
the room, and then looked at John in a questioning way. The boys noted
this. Nothing was said at the time, but as the Professor passed out
George followed him.

"What was that bulb you picked up?"

"It is the root of the plant called Amarylla, and it is in the juice of
this plant that certain savages dip their arrow-heads for poisoning
them."

This information was not a little startling and disquieting to George,
who rushed back and quietly called out the boys. "Do you know what Chief
has been doing? Did you see the peculiar bulbs he had? The Professor
picked up one of them, and what do you suppose it is? It is the root
from which they make the poisons for arrow-heads."

Harry could not believe that the savage had any designs on them. "I
suppose he will bear watching, so let us see what he intends to do with
them!"

When Chief had admired himself sufficiently he took the bulbs to the
kitchen and placed them in the oven, as the boys called it, and when
George came in he was smiling, as he thought, in a very peculiar way.
George did not disturb the bulbs, and when the meal was brought in Chief
was on hand and went to the kitchen. He soon returned with the roasted
bulbs and deposited them at the table.

The boys looked at the Professor, and he and John exchanged smiling
glances, and both of them took the bulbs and began the meal with them in
the most nonchalant manner. The boys could not understand the
Professor's defiant manner in eating a poisonous bulb, and George cried
out: "Didn't you say that the bulb was poisonous?"

"Yes, it is, for some things."

"Well, how can it be poisonous for some things and not for others. Don't
the savages use the poisons of the arrows to kill people with?"

"Certainly; but it is used in that case as a blood poison. A blood
poison is not necessarily a stomach poison. In truth, there are few
poisons that are fatal to both the blood and stomach."

Chief had been slyly preparing this treat for them, as savages like the
root, and all regarded it a welcome change, and it was that peculiar
look which George wrongly interpreted. How often the motives of people
are misjudged in the same manner, and without a more pronounced reason
than Chief had!

When the meal was announced Angel, as usual, was the first to appear,
and when he caught sight of his reflection in the mirror he thought one
of his friends had come to visit him. It did not seem to startle him in
the least, but like all children tried to look behind it.

The wall prevented that, so when George handed him one of the small
ones, and he put his hand behind the mirror, the vacancy there is what
alarmed him. When he did finally comprehend what it was, it so attracted
him that he could not partake of the meal, but sat entranced before it.

After the meal he took the mirror to the rafters, and found a hiding
place for it, and they would often notice him with it, but from that
time forward he never brought it down into the room.




CHAPTER XVI

A SURPRISING TRIP TO THE CAVE


The house was completed and partly furnished. New bedding was prepared
for the bedrooms, the Chief installed in one, and the other two reserved
for John and the Professor. The new living room, which was commodious,
served as a dining room, and a door was cut through from the old kitchen
to the new dining parlor.

The other rooms in the original building were reserved for the boys.
John was now fully recovered, and felt like beginning his task anew,
although he did not recall any of the previous work which he was engaged
in. Chief was progressing well in his education, and the constant source
of wonder to all was that he did not take the advantage his liberty gave
him to leave them.

One day John had a long conversation with him on the subject, and
afterwards the boys were curious to know the result of the interview;
but the result of the talk was not, apparently, satisfactory to John,
and the subject was not pressed. He was entirely well, and took a keen
interest in everything around him, and participated in the work. Each
new phase had some special attraction, and as the days passed less
anxiety was felt on this score.

In one of the evening conferences it was finally decided to make the
preparations for a trip to the portion of the island where the savages
had their homes. This meant a good supply of weapons and ammunition.

The following circumstances determined them on this course:

The Professor, addressing John, on this occasion, said: "We were
intensely interested in the review of your experiences on the island;
but there are several things which we are anxious to know about, and in
some particulars you may be able to supply the missing links. We have
not yet shown you the message which we found in the _Investigator's_
lifeboat, so that if you will get it, Harry, you may be able to tell us
something about it."

This was the little slip of paper which had on it the following
inscription: "We cannot hold out much longer. Wright and Walters were
captured yesterday. Will."

Harry handed it to him, and he looked at it for some time. "I do not
know who Wright and Will are, but Walters was one of the crew of the
sailing vessel that we took from San Francisco."

"Had you any knowledge of any of the boats of the _Investigator_ being
on the west side of the mountains during the time you were in that
neighborhood?"

"No; during my stay with the tribe to which Chief belonged I tried in
every way to ascertain something about the fate of my companions. Only
once during that time did I get any sort of knowledge on that point.
When I tried to describe the men, all denied any knowledge of them; but
pointed to the youths of the village, and I could not understand what
they meant. That is now made plain to me, as, undoubtedly, they meant
the ones referred to were boys."

"And, now, there is another thing I want to know from Ralph and Tom. Did
either of you have a photograph of some of the boys on the ship?"

George found the photograph which they had taken from one of the
warriors in the second day's fight.

Ralph and Tom both declared that it was the first time they had ever
seen the photograph, and on closer examination it was seen that while
Harry and George were shown on the picture, neither of the other boys'
features were there.

"Did either of you boys know of any of those mentioned in the message?"

"I knew a Will, but I do not remember his last name. I do not think
Wright was the name of anyone on shipboard. I am sure he was not one of
the boys," was Ralph's answer.

This information pointed to two things clearly: That there were other
boys, belonging to their ship, castaway on the island, and that at least
one of the crew of John's vessel might be found. It also assured them of
the certain knowledge that there were others, either wandering about, or
sharing the captivity mentioned in the message.

"I should state here," continued John, "I was informed by one of the
chiefs that their disposition to the shipwrecked mariners had been, in
the past, a friendly one, but that some time previously, how far back I
do not know, a crew had been saved, and instead of rewarding them for
the service, had murdered one of the chiefs and committed such excesses,
that in self-protection they slaughtered them, and, thereafter, took
prisoners only in order to use them for their sacrifices."

The plans for the forthcoming expedition were now fully discussed in
every detail. The first proposal was to build a vessel of sufficient
size to accommodate the party, but to this John offered the same
objection which they had theretofore found so potent when the last trip
was undertaken. It would take too long, and when they reached the
savages it would be necessary to make a trip or trips inland.

The situation now was entirely different. There was no longer a question
in their minds as to the existence of savages, and, furthermore, they
knew the location, and the knowledge of John was positive on another
point: They were not located near the sea, and the most powerful tribes
were far inland.

All these facts compelled them to undertake the journey overland. The
wagon was the only means to transport their supplies, and as all except
the Professor, were vigorous, they would be far better able to cope with
the savages in that way than by the sea route.

Now let us see what was necessary for the purposes of defense. They had
a force of six men, as Chief was not considered one of the force,
notwithstanding his friendly attitude. They had ten guns, and Ralph and
Tom had been engaged for weeks in turning out additional gun barrels,
for which the stocks had not yet been prepared.

John suggested that twenty-five of the guns would be ample for almost
any force that might be brought against them, and that provision should
be made so that while in defense, each could carry two guns, by having
one of them strapped on the back.

Ammunition was of more importance, really, than guns. They had learned
this at the last encounter, and it was lack of this that eventually
forced them to retreat.

On that basis, namely, of twenty-five guns, ten rounds would mean two
hundred and fifty shells, and it was then considered that the most
important thing would be to utilize the time of two for the purpose of
making the shells. This was the most laborious process, as every step
had to be done by hand, the dies being in the form of separate punches,
held and driven by hand, as they had no such thing as a press for
manipulating the dies.

One morning Harry said: "I know it isn't the proper thing to suggest it
while we are all so busy making the preparations for the expedition, but
I think we ought to make a trip to the cave before we start."

Neither of them objected to the proposal, and George went to the
Professor, and told him that he and Harry had conferred on the subject
of the cave, and with his permission they would take the boys there.

The Professor's assent was given with a smile of pleasure, and several
lamps were put into condition for the event. All was excitement now with
the young spirits, and the Professor assisted them in the preparations.

It did not take long to reach the mouth of the cavern, and lighting the
lamps, descended slowly. Neither George nor Harry had informed the boys
of the treasure within the cave, nor of the skeletons which were
discovered, although, when the boys had asked the source of the
skeletons in the laboratory enough of an evasive answer was given to
make them suspect the source, and this was confirmed when Harry told
them, days before, that they had also discovered a cave.

They descended the steps, and made their way along the passage leading
to the first recess. As the chamber came into view the boys were
entranced at the sight. It was a novelty to them. It was the first time
they had ever witnessed such a thing.

To Harry and George it was no longer a thing to marvel at. They were
veterans in the exploring field.

"This makes a fellow feel queer in here," exclaimed Tom, as he glanced
around at the magnificent stalactites.

"Did we tell you," replied George, "about the mysterious thing that
happened to us the second time we came in?"

"No; what was it?"

"We entered from the other opening by the sea."

"Another opening? Do you mean that this cave has two openings just like
the one John spoke about?"

"Yes; but this is a mighty long one, and it had a lot of water in it
twice when we visited it, but I don't think we shall find any here now."

"Why not?"

"Because we have not had much rain for the past month."

"But you forgot about the mystery."

"That's so; we went in from the other end and had gone up nearly to
where the water began, when we put one of the lights on a ledge, and
went forward with the other, and when we had gone about a hundred feet,
it disappeared, and we have never found it to this day."

"That does seem odd. Do you think it was taken by some one?"

"Well, we could not possibly account for it in any other way but that it
fell off the ledge by some accident. How that could be possible I don't
know, as George declared he had placed it in a secure position."

By this time they had reached the recess, and George suggested that the
entire cave should be examined, and Ralph was somewhat in the lead.
Everywhere was the universal whiteness of the calcareous deposit. As
they reached the vicinity of the chests, where the copper vessels were,
they formed a striking contrast to the whiteness all around.

"What are those things there?" asked Tom, stepping back in surprise,
pointing to the vessels.

Ralph peered forward, to get a better view. "It looks like kettles of
some kind."

Harry passed the boys and walking up to one of the kettles, overturned
it, and as a shower of the coins slid out, and rolled about, they were
amazed beyond all description.

Ralph was the first to recover, and he picked up some of the coins:
"Didn't you know about these? I believe they are gold; look, Tom. Did
you ever see anything like this?"

Tom was stupefied. "I don't wonder that men will risk their lives to get
treasure like this. Here we didn't hunt for it and we found it."

"Yes, but Harry and George knew all about it; didn't you?"

And the boys laughed an assent.

"Why don't you take it out of here?"

"Well, it seems to be pretty safe in this place; and if we should have
been attacked by the natives, we should have a place of retreat and have
our treasure with us."

After putting the coins carefully back, Harry said: "Probably we may be
able to discover something else." And he moved forwardly to the right,
with Tom following close, and the boys pressing up to see what else
might be found. There, at the place where the Professor had deposited
them in a row were the five skeletons, and they presented such a ghastly
sight that they shrank back in horror.

"We found these in a little different position when we first arrived."

"In what way?"

"They were in all sorts of positions in front of the recess, and some of
them had the knives still sticking in their ribs, and one or two, one of
which the Professor has, had a big bullet in the skull, which we took
out and can show you."

"Where did you find these?"

"Right in front of the place where the treasure was found."

"Well, did they have a fight, do you think, for the possession of the
treasure?"

"Undoubtedly."

"Now, let us go around to the other side of the cave."

It will be remembered that in the other portion of the cave the
skeletons and the treasure, as well as the weapons, were left just as
they were found by the boys, because they had never informed the
Professor of their secret visit to the cave, when they discovered the
chained captives and the skeletons about them.

The party passed around the first projecting wall which separated the
two large chambers, and as they were moving along something sounded in
the second chamber ahead. The boys stopped suddenly. In a moment more
the same peculiar dull and ominous sound was continued, and it seemed to
be very near.

The boys looked at each other in amazement. During all of the previous
visits there had never been the slightest sound within the cavern.

"Possibly," said Harry, "it may be running water."

"It doesn't sound like water to me. I will--" but Harry did not have an
opportunity to say anything more, as a terrific roar, like a cannon
shot, rang out, and the boys were simply petrified.

"What do you think that was?" whispered George. They drew close
together, and spoke in whispers.

"This will never do," declared Harry. "If there is anything in this
place we might as well know it now as later. Will you join me in the
hunt?"

And the boys responded with one assent. "Let us go to the second
chamber. Come on, boys." And they bravely stalked down the corridor.

When the chamber was reached a hollow laugh greeted them, followed by
two hearty laughs. The Professor and John had entered the opening at the
sea end, and hurriedly made their way to the second chamber, where they
awaited the coming of the boys.

The boys were intensely relieved, and the Professor was so happy to see
the determined and resolute spirit they manifested, that he complimented
them highly.

John was no less profuse in his commendations. "I want to say, that men
can be brave when they know what they have to fight, and who their
enemies are; but it takes the stoutest heart to go forth and defend
yourself, or assume the offensive against an unseen and an unknown
enemy."




CHAPTER XVII

THE WONDERFUL PORTABLE FORT


On the return of the party to their home that evening the events of the
day were discussed to the exclusion of everything else, and now was the
opportunity for the boys to learn something about the other cave, of
which John had given a meager account.

"Would you object to telling us what the wonderful things were which you
saw in the cave at the western part of the island?" was Tom's inquiry.

"Not in the least. The ship on which we sailed from San Francisco
contained the charts of several caves, one of which was that of the cave
I referred to. I saw the treasure there with my own eyes, and I can
direct you to it, because, notwithstanding the stress of my
surroundings, I took the bearings, on the following day, and it will not
be difficult to locate it."

"Did you remember the circumstances of the visit to the place where we
were being pursued by the savages?"

John looked at the Professor, and then at the boys. "I do not remember
such an occurrence," he answered.

"But I would like to ask the Professor a question," exclaimed George.
"What was it that made you give us that quick advice to leave the mouth
of the cave when we wanted it as a hiding place?"

"I saw from the carefully hidden, but trodden, path, that some one must
have used it as a place of refuge, and concluded that as it was so near
the village it might have been some of the clans of the tribe, either as
a place of concealment from their enemies, in case of attack, or by some
of the so-called religious communities which many of the tribes have."

"In what way did you discover that this cave had been charted?"

"First by the peculiarity, that it had two entrances, on opposite sides
of a hill, and secondly, by the singular internal arrangement, which
stated that within the corridors and the chambers constituted a cross,
and the treasures were to be found at the extremities of the cross
limbs, within the two large chambers."

"Then you knew of the existence of this island, before you sailed?"

"No; the chart merely described the characteristics of the caverns, but
stated they were located on islands in the South Seas."

"Do you think our cave here is one of them?"

"I do not think so, as I do not recall any description which would fit
this cave, except the two entrances, and that is not uncommon."

"The chart stated that there was another cave fifteen leagues to the
southeast of that cave, which also contained treasure, and that was the
principal reason why I traveled in that direction, and thus found myself
in the savage-inhabited part of the island."

"Fifteen leagues? How far would that be?"

"Forty-five miles."

Nothing more was needed as a stimulus for the boys. They had truly been
thrown on an island of wonder.

"Why is it," asked Ralph, "that so much of the treasure of the world was
hidden in these out-of-the-way places by the pirates?"

"I imagine," replied John, "that they didn't have much confidence in the
rest of the world. The manner in which they got most of the money was by
acts of piracy on the high seas, and it was necessary to hide the
proceeds of the robberies as fast as acquired, because if they should be
captured, its possession would at once seal their doom. These hidden
treasures are distributed over every part of the world. As to the other
part of your question, the vast hoards of gold and silver so
distributed, formed a very small part of the wealth of the old world. It
is not known how vast a sum Pizarro took from the Inca in Peru, but it
is estimated variously at from twelve to twenty tons."

The boys opened their eyes in astonishment.

"How much would that be worth in money?"

"Counting it at the present value of gold, every pennyweight would be
worth a dollar."

"Let me see; twenty pennyweights in an ounce, and twelve ounces in a
pound; that would be two hundred and forty dollars in a pound."

"That is right."

"And then twenty tons would be 40,000 pounds. And multiplying that by
240 would make $9,600,000. My, what a lot of money!"

"Cortez, at about the same time, conquered Mexico, and secured a much
greater amount. All over the western hemisphere, from northern Mexico
down to Peru, untold millions of gold and silver were looted by the
Spanish and Portuguese navigators, and taken to Europe, and it is
estimated that as much more was disposed of in these hidden recesses,
and those who deposited them were swept off the seas, and all knowledge
of the caches were lost."

"During what times was most of this money deposited?"

"The pirates which infested the coasts of Spanish America and the West
Indies, flourished in the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries.
Originally the French and English during the wars against Spain used the
expedition against her ships, as acts of war, but later on, after peace
was established in Europe, the buccaneers continued in their
depredations, and it was made unlawful by all the great nations."

From that day there was no cessation on the part of the entire working
force to prepare the necessary ammunition required for a campaign
against the savages. It should be stated that by this time Chief had
learned many things, and John took particular pains to teach him daily,
until he could pronounce many words very distinctly, and understood the
meaning of them.

It was surprising to see how quickly his mind grasped the association of
a verb with some name, and the simplest and most common verbs of action
were taught. In this way it became apparent that all should be cautious
about talking of the proposed expedition in his presence. Nevertheless
all were anxious to enlist him in the enterprise.

He never inquired about the gun barrels, and curiously enough seemed to
take no interest in any of the weapons but the spears and arrows. He was
a fine archer. This was demonstrated on several occasions, the only
difficulty being that the bows which the boys had were too small.

Chief selected his own branches, for the bows, and showed the boys how
to hold the arrows, and the distance he could propel them was marvelous.
They were not by any manner of means a match, by comparison, with the
guns, but they would be dangerous missiles if attacked in the open, and
of this fact the boys had learned several lessons.

The wagon, which was constructed before the first trip across the
island, had been through some tough places, and the wheels and axles
were in bad condition. These needed replacing, and that was a task which
would occupy some time.

One day, at the evening meal, the boys asked about Chief. He had not
been noticed by anyone since noon.

He was usually at work with Harry, who was asked concerning him.

"The last I saw of him was right after lunch, and he was going in the
direction of the clay bank. As he was in the habit of going there quite
frequently I paid no attention to him."

"Did he have anything with him, that you noticed?"

"Nothing but the bolo and the bow and arrows that he always took."

"Possibly he is on some mission," replied the Professor. "It does not
seem likely that he has determined to desert us; but it may be he has
grown tired of this existence. It is a curious phase of these matters,
however, which, I believe, will apply in his case, that when he goes
back he will find his old life a very disquieting one to him, and I
predict he will be here again within a month."

"By that time we will be on our way toward his section, and I hope we
shall have the opportunity of meeting him," responded John.

What required more attention than any part of the equipment, aside from
the ammunition, was the structure of the wagon. This had to be a fort
for them, and so arranged that it could be put up to meet an attack from
any quarter.

But this, unfortunately, left the yaks exposed to the assaults of the
spears and arrows, and John suggested a novel addition to the wagon
equipment.

"My idea is this: As we are all pretty strong, excepting the Professor,
to stand the march on foot, I would convert our wagon into a vehicle
which would carry the fort with us, and this fort, whenever we camped,
could be set up so that the yaks would be inside, and thus protected as
well as ourselves.

"To effect this the more readily, my plan would be to make three
sections of boards, in the form of a fence, each section to be six feet
high and ten feet long. These should be either folded together in the
middle lengthwise, so they could be nested together and swung below the
axles between the wheels, and set up to form a square at one side of the
wagon.

"One side of the wagon body could be made to be let down, so as to form
a protection below the body of the wagon. Within that enclosure the yaks
could be stationed, if we should be attacked, and for the purpose of
defense, four of us would be within the enclosure and two in the wagon
to protect it from that side.

[Illustration: _Fig. 33. The Portable Fort._]

"The sketch which I have made shows these features, in which you will
see (Fig. 33), the side boards (A) hinged along the middle line, as at
B. These would be held at the outer corners by posts C. In the sketch
the side board of the wagon body has been let down, so access can be
had to the wagon."

The plan, so ingeniously contrived, pleased the fancy of the boys.

"I imagine," said Harry, "this will be the first time people ever
carried their fort with them. It will be fun to meet the savages with
that kind of an outfit."

"You must not think, however," continued John, "that this is all we
shall need. We must take in the wagon sufficient food for the yaks to
withstand a siege, so that with our own provisions, guns and ammunition,
we shall have a pretty good load."

"How heavy will the three sections of fence weigh?"

"I estimate that, as we shall want the boards made of good wood, the
weight will be thirty pounds per cubic foot, and as all the boards will
take fourteen cubic feet of lumber, the total weight, including the
posts, can be brought within 450 pounds, and I do not think our other
material will weigh much over 500 more."

"That would not be a hard load," observed the Professor, "as we have
often hauled a ton, but it would be well to make a new set of wheels,
and we can then take with us an extra wheel for the front and rear."

"I think we should take tools along also," said Tom, "because we can
always make our own repairs, in that event."

"I am glad you referred to that. It is certainly a suggestion in the
right direction. Are there any more observations from any of the other
army engineers?"

"I may be wrong," answered Harry, "but it seems to me that one of the
folding fences should be put on each side of the wagon body, and the
third under the wagon."

"What is your reason for that?" asked Tom.

"Because we may want to put up the fort in a big hurry some time, and by
having them at the three places, and have it understood who are to take
out each section, it would be the work of a few moments only to set it
up, because each set of workers could handle his section without
interference from the others."

"That is really a stroke of genius. Certainly, that is the sensible
way," responded John.

"It is simply another illustration," added the Professor, "how men,
looking at things from different standpoints, will see the defects in
each other's work. That is the story of every great invention."

These conferences were of the greatest value to the boys. It pointed out
how men, through force of circumstances, were compelled to devise things
for their need.

George had been an intent listener during these discussions. "It does
seem that the old statement, 'that necessity is the mother of
invention,' is true."

The Professor turned to him smilingly, as he replied: "That may be so in
very many eases, it is true, but I imagine that in the vast majority of
instances the necessity was in the mind of the inventor to get some
money. The thought of that requirement was a more vivid thing to him
than the real need of the article as an economic necessity."

"Do you really think that is the case?"

"If my memory is not at fault, the people of England howled with
derision when the first locomotive was built; the men who put out the
first sewing machine had their stores broken into and the machines
smashed; and the telephone when first installed was considered simply as
a plaything and curiosity, and not as a useful improvement. It has been
the history of every age and of most of the great inventions. After the
inventions were completed, and their value shown, the merchant and the
manufacturer created the demand, and then the articles became a
necessity, and not before. For this reason I think the proverb should be
amended to say that 'the necessity of the inventor is the mother of
invention.'"

Before starting on the trip the matter of clothing had to be attended
to. A quantity of ramie had been cut, and put in water, for the purpose
of rotting the woody fiber, and this was taken out of the water as fast
as it was ready, and cleaned and combed, and at times worked up into
threads, which were placed in the loom, and a coarse cloth thus woven.

This was, necessarily, a slow process, and consumed considerable time.
This, together with the making of the percussion caps, was the tedious
part of all the preparations. Every energy was put forth to get the
different things required. Harry and Tom had made up the fort, and John
suggested the idea of having a drill exercise in setting it up, so that
the work could be performed without interference.

During the day, when the posts and the fastenings were all ready, the
wagon was brought out and the yaks yoked up. The elements of the fort
were attached to the wagon, in the manner that they were to be
transported. As there were three sections of the fort, one on each side
of the wagon body and one below the axles, it was provided that the six
should form three divisions; the Professor and Ralph, John and Tom, and
Harry and George the couples for setting up the fort.

As Harry and George were the most familiar with the animals, and knew
better than the others how to handle them, it was made a part of their
duty, when the signal was given, to unyoke and turn the yaks to the
proper place at the side of the wagon.

While this was being done, the Professor and Ralph were to detach the
section on the side of the wagon where the fort was to be set up, and
carry it out at right angles and at the forward end of the wagon. At the
same time John and Tom would take the section on the opposite side of
the wagon and carry it around to form the end of the fort.

This would then give Harry and George the opportunity to take the part
below the wagon and erect it at the rear angle of the wagon, while Tom
and Ralph were getting the posts for the outer ends of the fort.

When all was ready, the signal was given, and the various divisions
sprang to their allotted work. They marveled at the celerity with which
the fort was put up.

"I see a serious defect in the arrangement at one point," said Tom.

"What is that?" was the question from all.

"You see we have the fort ready, but it is adapted for one side of the
wagon only. It may be most important to have it arranged so that either
side of the wagon can be used for the fort."

"A fine suggestion," answered John. "That change can be made by having
both sides of the body so they can be let down."

George also had a good suggestion to make. "According to the
calculations we have fourteen cubic feet of material, and it is light
wood, at that. Why couldn't the fort be utilized as a raft, so as to
save the cutting of green timber, which is so heavy?"

"Well," said the Professor, smiling, "we are developing this at an
immense rate. The new idea is the starting point for an invention to so
arrange the sections as to make them act as floats. Here is a great
opportunity for the genius."

Tom and Harry conferred on this subject for some time, and after
luncheon, announced the plan: "It is fortunate that the axles of our
wheels project. It will be an easy matter to take the sections from the
sides of the body and attach one edge of each section to the projecting
ends of the axles, and then the two posts can be used as braces to run
up from the outer edges on the sections to the upper edges of the body.
The third section can be left under the axles where it now is."

John was delighted at the simple solution of this problem.

"I really believe," said Tom, "that we can adjust the sections in that
way while the wagon is moving, as it can be attached without any
difficulty."

It is wonderful how one improvement marks the advance stride for the
next. Invention is really nothing but a step by step movement; a little
addition here, another accretion there, and so on, so that invention has
been shown to be, not a matter of quantity, but of quality. The mere
bending of a wire, if it produces a new and useful result, is just as
much entitled to the dignity of an invention, as a room full of
intricate mechanism.




CHAPTER XVIII

TRAILING A WARRING PARTY OF NATIVES


"Professor, won't you tell us what the difference is between weight and
gravity? We have been discussing that matter this afternoon."

"Gravity is a force by virtue of which all bodies tend to approach each
other constantly; and weight is the measure of the effect of gravity
acting upon a body. The two are often confounded."

"Now, the next thing we want to know is, does gravity act in all
directions?"

"Yes; and the attraction of one body for another is in proportion to its
mass--that is to say, if two bodies, one weighing one and the other two
pounds, should be hung near each other, the heavy object would pull the
lighter one twice the distance it would itself move."

"Do you mean to say that everything on earth attracts everything else? I
thought it was only the earth that had the power to attract."

"The earth is no different from any other object in that particular, but
on account of its immense size everything goes toward it and its motion
toward the small object is not noticed."

"Is there any way that such a statement could be proved?"

"I suggest one plan: select two walls, close together, or two tall
trees, and run a wire across, as I show in the sketch (Fig. 32). From
that cross wire, A, suspend three objects by cords, B, C, D. The cord B
is exactly midway between the two walls, and the other cords C, D, and
so attached that the objects at their lower ends hang close to the
walls. It will be found that the cords C, D are farther apart at their
lower ends than at the upper ends, and that the cord B is exactly plumb,
as it is affected equally by the attraction of the opposite walls."

[Illustration: _Fig. 34. Gravitational pull._]

The new raft attachment was completed, and Harry made the suggestion
that it ought to be put to a practical test, and that a good place to do
this would be below the cataract, where it was wide and deep enough to
float.

The drill was affected for attaching the sections, as shown in the
drawing (Fig. 35), in which A represents the section under the axles,
and B, C the two side sections, attached at their inner edges to the
ends of the axles, and with the posts D serving as braces.

The yaks seemed to know their business instinctively, and moved down
into the water slowly, and the improvised raft not only prevented the
body from sinking into the water very low, but it had a wonderful
steadying effect, because the side sections served as wings to prevent
lateral swaying.

[Illustration: _Fig. 35. Using the Fort as a Raft._]

The crossing and the return were made without accident, and the sections
returned and fixed in place, and the wagon was now completed for the
journey.

A considerable quantity of the barley flour was ground, and both honey
and cane sugar taken in the vessels which had been recovered from the
cave. The ammunition was stored in four boxes at convenient places
within the body, and the little metal stove, with the cooking utensils,
located near the rear end, where they could be conveniently taken out
and returned.

The three sleeping mattresses were stored in the bottom of the body,
near the forward end, and as the sides of the body were three feet high,
it can be understood that there was an abundance of room for them, and
for the other things which were carried along for their convenience and
comfort.

Everything was bustle and rush. Angel was as busy as the rest. It was
his joy to carry things to the wagon, at George's behest, and when the
hour for starting came, and the house was about to be locked, he rushed
into the room, before George could close it, and mount to the rafters.

George followed his movements without a word. He was back in an instant
with the little mirror which George had given him some weeks before. It
was the only time he had taken it down or brought it within sight of
those around him.

With this treasure in his hand he scrambled to the wagon, and found a
secure place in the top bows of the wagon, and then hung on the rear bow
and waited for the start. He loved these jaunts in the wagon, and they
had been frequently made during the past four weeks, but he had never
taken the mirror. How did he know that they were going for a journey?

With a good-by to their herd, the jolly party of boys began the trail
through the forests, this time not for the love of adventure, or to
learn what they had about them, but to relieve their fellows and to be
of service to the benighted people who were their neighbors.

As in former times, the Professor cautioned them against haste during
the initial portion of the journey, and until they became accustomed to
the rough part of the work. Much of the time during the first few days
could be devoted to hunting, so as to get a good supply of food, which,
later on, might be of great service to them.

The course decided on was to go directly west, and after entering the
forest to move southwardly until the South River was reached, and thus
pass the falls. Ralph and George had never been in that section of the
island, and all were desirous of again visiting the spot where so many
of their experiences had taken place, and in a region that gave them the
most startling surprises and mysteries, some of which were not yet
unraveled.

Shortly after the noonday hour the roaring of the falling water was
distinctly heard, and the boys hurried forward to see it, followed by
the wagon.

"Here is the place we found the lifeboat--the one we have at
Cataract--right across the river, near that tree. A little farther up
we'll show you where we put our boat--that is the one we started out
with to explore the river, and the one which disappeared."

While passing up toward the falls, John stopped suddenly at a mass of
the driftwood, and called to Tom, who was nearest, "Pull that log over;
I want to see what this is."

Tom obeyed at once, and while he held up the log indicated, John, after
considerable exertion, drew forth a smaller log, which had evidently
been cut off with some dull tool, and when Harry came to the rescue the
entire log was extricated, and all saw a piece of rope attached, and the
indication at two places where evidently it had been in scraping contact
with some other timbers.

"Did you see the rope?" asked the Professor, "before the log attracted
you?"

"No; the end of the log could not have been broken off in that manner,
and when it was drawn out the rope followed."

"It is the same kind of rope we found on our boat at the beach. The
boat, as you remember, was left by us a little above this place."

"I do not remember ever having been here before," answered John.

They had forgotten that John visited the place before he had recovered
his memory.

The log was evidence that some one above the falls used it as a raft,
and from its position could not have been there many months, and
probably was washed there at the time of the last severe rains about ten
weeks previously.

John removed the rope, and put it in the wagon, and the boys noted the
approving manner of the Professor as he did this.

They passed up around the falls, and camped for the night on the bank of
the river. In the morning the stream was followed for ten miles, and the
Professor stated that, owing to the rough character of the country
adjacent to the stream, it would be advisable to leave the valley and
pass to the right.

During one of the previous trips they were compelled to do this, but
that brought them to a dense forest, which was almost impenetrable in
many places, and they had to avoid this also.

Before evening this forest appeared in view, and a halt was called for
the purpose of reconnoitering the position, and to ascertain if it could
not be avoided. John and Ralph made a long trip to the north, and it was
found that it extended in that direction too far to make the long
detour.

"As the forest will be a very trying course to take, I suggest that we
turn directly south and either cross the river or investigate the
country on the other side in the direction of the mountains. We have
never gone there, and it is likely the country is not as rough, and what
little wood is in that neighborhood may not impede us much."

The suggestion was followed, and before night they again encamped on the
shore of South River.

"Before taking the team across let us make an investigation for several
miles, at least to see the traveling conditions, and if Ralph will
accompany me, it will be no difficulty to get back in time for a fairly
early start."

Ralph was only too willing to accompany John, and a raft was improvised
for the occasion, and they plunged into the rising ground beyond. As
they advanced it was apparent that the surface was much better than at
any part of the journey from the falls, and the return journey was made
as quickly as possible.

After crossing, the river was followed for a time, and then the rising
ground was considered more favorable, and good time was made during the
day. At the end of the second day the encampment was made for the night
by the side of a little stream which flowed from the mountains to the
left of their course.

During the previous nights Angel was quiet, but as darkness set in his
uneasiness gave George sufficient information to indicate some trouble,
and the boys attributed it to the presence of the wild animals, which
they knew abounded on the south side of the stream.

Two were delegated to watch during the night, and at recurring intervals
Angel manifested alarm. From midnight until the break of day he was
constantly awake, and showed his alarm, but when it was daylight a
hurried survey of the immediate locality betrayed no signs of an enemy.

Within a mile of their camp they came across a camp fire, around which
was strewn the bones which were left from the feast. The Professor and
John were up in an instant and carefully examined the litter surrounding
the fire, as well as the indications of footprints. The latter were
unmistakable at many places, and both announced that the savages had
been there, beyond question.

This meant the appointment of a scouting party for the advance of the
team, and John took this duty on himself, stipulating that the different
boys should alternately accompany him, and thus adapt themselves to the
serious work that scouting meant.

Harry was the first detailed to go with him, and at intervals he would
go back and signal the team to follow, so that they made fair time along
the immediate vicinity of the stream, and thus progressed with some
speed, in what now appeared to be the country where the savages lurked.

In the march John found numerous marks of the savages, and before noon
was halted at the remains of a fire still glowing, that the savages had
quitted not an hour before.

"How many do you think are in the party?"

"Not more than a half dozen."

"It seems to me we ought to stop a day, so they could get ahead of us,
or we might run into them."

"I am making every effort to catch up with them. We are out to meet the
savages, and the sooner we get a chance at them the better it will be."

Harry had not taken that view of it, and concluded John's plan was the
proper thing to follow out.

"I think myself it would be better to meet a half dozen than the whole
tribe." But that, even, was not John's purpose.

When they reached the wagon, after the glowing camp fire had been
discovered, John hurriedly gave his views: "The band is in our immediate
vicinity. If we hurry up we can catch up with them before night. I have
trailed them now for three hours. I will continue the pursuit as fast as
possible, and it would be well to follow me as fast as the yaks can be
driven through the brush. We must meet them and capture them before they
reach their main band, so that we can get such information as they may
have for our guidance."

John, Harry and Ralph now plunged forward, so that the two boys would
enable him to make a chain of information back to the wagon, and it was
understood that the moment they were sighted, the wagon was to be
hurried forward to the spot selected by John.

It was not anticipated that the band would be numerous enough to require
them to establish their traveling fort, and the sole object was to
capture one or more of the savages in the first engagement.

For some reason John did not report sighting them during the entire
afternoon, and they were again compelled to camp without getting a sight
of the enemy. On this occasion the fort was put up, but no attempt was
made to light a fire.

As soon as darkness set in, John motioned to Tom to follow him, and
together they quietly made their way to the southwest, in the direction
of the trail they had followed during the day.

Within an hour both returned, and announced that the camp had been
discovered to the front and right of their position, and George and Tom
went in that direction, after being cautioned by John to observe the
strictest care not to disturb them by approaching too close.

The Professor and John had a long conference as to the wisest course
under the circumstances. "I am of the opinion that we should never allow
them to leave that camp," was John's observation, "because we are in a
much better position to dictate to them during the hours of darkness, if
we surround them."

"My only doubts about that plan maybe summed up as follows: We can
easily defeat them in a hand-to-hand fight; but we do not want to
slaughter them. If we can make them captives we shall have a strong
lever to work with in treating with the main band. In the night time it
is always a hazardous enterprise, and we cannot afford to risk the lives
of the boys."

"Then," John responded, "let us wait until morning, and before the sun
is up we can surround their position, and when it is light enough to see
approach them from the six quarters and demand surrender."

"I like that suggestion better than the other. It looks like a safe
plan, and it will prevent needless bloodshed, without risking the lives
of any, unless they show a bitter fight."

When the two boys returned the decision to surround the camp before
daybreak was announced, and the night was a long, long period of anxiety
to them. They had no fear of the results, nor would either hesitate for
a moment to engage in it, because all had become seasoned with the
perils of the past year.

It was the unexpected, the exhilaration of knowing that they had the
strength to attack the savages, that made them restless and to long for
the morning hours.

The first appearance of the slightest gray in the east was the signal
for preparation.

John led the way. As they were starting, John said: "This is a most
important step, because if we succeed we may be able to dictate to at
least one tribe, and that tribe the most powerful and vindictive on the
island. When we approach within a certain distance the Professor, Harry
and Tom will remain at the spot selected, and you, Ralph and George must
follow me. In order that you may know the plans fully, I will state
that together we three will turn to the left and make a detour through
the woods around their position, and I will leave Ralph at one point in
the circle, and with George follow around to a point exactly opposite
this place, when he will go on around the camp toward your direction.

"When you think we have about reached the positions indicated, Harry
will take up his position to the left of the Professor, in the circle,
and Tom to the right, so that our respective positions will be in this
order: First, the Professor, then in order to the left, Harry, Ralph,
myself, George and Tom.

"Each has two guns, and I have also the pistol. The signal will be the
firing of the pistol. The moment you hear that all must rush forward in
the direction of the camp, and I will endeavor to reach the open so as
to attract them first and demand their surrender. After you have shown
yourselves, do not advance until I give the word, but have your guns
ready in case they attempt to make any resistance."

The party stole forward carefully, and the Professor with the two boys
waited a sufficient time to be sure they had selected the proper places
in the circle, when Ralph appeared, and held up his hand in token of
silence, and all he said was: "Back to the wagon as quickly as
possible."

The "Capture and Pursuit" will relate some of the most thrilling scenes
in the entire history of Wonder Island, following the adventure here
related.




GLOSSARY OF WORDS
USED IN TEXT

     Archeological. Pertaining to the study of man, or of relics.

     Attributed. To describe as belonging to; to refer, as an effect
                 to a cause.

     Amalgam. The unity of any metal with mercury.

     Accretion. To add to; an addition.

     Antiquity. Ancient. In olden times.

     Anticipation. The looking forward to the future.

     Analysis. To separate; to find out the principal parts.

     Aphasia. The term used to define the loss of memory.

     Abruptly. To cut off short; at once; speedily.

     Admonished. Warned; advised beforehand.

     Alacrity. Quickly; without delay.

     Animated. Lively, or quickened action.

     Attribute. A quality; as a kind act.

     Aspiration. A desire; a wish for another condition or state.

     Benighted. Not advanced, or civilized.

     Bolero. A Spanish dance illustrative of the passion of love.

     Brandished. A motion of the arms or body; the menacing motion of
                 a weapon.

     Caches. A hidden or concealed spot.

     Castilian. Pertaining to the Spanish.

     Calcareous. Lime formation.

     Celerity. With speed.

     Celestial. Pertaining to the heavens.

     Cereal. Any edible grass, seed or grain.

     Chaparral. A thick tangle of shrubbery or brush.

     Cotillion. A square dance for four couples.

     Cosack. A Russian dance.

     Contracted. Made smaller; reduced, compass.

     Conformation. In the same form; in the like manner.

     Concerted. By agreement; all together.

     Confirmation. A proven fact or thing.

     Consternation. Awe inspiring; fearful.

     Constellation. An arbitrary assemblage or group of stars, or a
                    portion of the heavens occupied by such group.

     Complication. Mixed up; without an intelligent or designed
                   arrangement.

     Coincidence. One thing happening with another.

     Commodious. Ample in size. Very large.

     Contend. To argue in favor of.

     Corrosive sublimate. A deadly poison; sulphid of mercury.

     Crouching. A low-bending attitude.

     Cracovienna. A graceful Polish dance.

     Crucial. The test; trying; decisive.

     Derision. To make the object of mockery or ridicule.

     Devolved. To throw the burden on. To assume the responsibility.

     Decomposition. To change; to put into its original form.

     Depletion. To take away from. To lessen.

     Denuded. To uncover.

     Disposition. To make the arrangements for.

     Discerned. Discovered; noticed.

     Discomfiture. Being beaten.

     Discarded. Thrown away; to dispense with.

     Diversion. To do something different; otherwise.

     Disclose. To show; to inform concerning.

     Disseminated. To spread broadcast.

     Disdain. To look down upon.

     Disjointed. Not in good condition; all awry.

     Divined. Understood; having knowledge of.

     Disquieting. Not at ease.

     Domesticated. Tamed; not wild, or in a wild state.

     Economic. Pertaining to the means or methods of living well.

     Effective. Well organized. Strong.

     Egotistic. Having a good opinion of one's self.

     Exhilarating. Joyful; brightening; happy condition.

     Elude. To evade; to circumvent.

     Enigma. Concealed; difficult to comprehend.

     Emaciated. Thin from want of food.

     Emergency. The appointed time for a difficult matter.

     Equinoctial. Referring to the time when the sun passes the
                  celestial equator.

     Eventually. Finally; when a certain time has arrived.

     Extricated. To rescue from.

     Factions. Parties; tribes; clans.

     Faculty. That quality or attribute of the mind or body, like
              intelligence or strength.

     Fandango. A Spanish dance in triple time.

     Facility. Ease; without difficulty.

     Fixed star. A heavenly body, supposedly like our sun, around
                 which certain planets revolve.

     Flanking. Going around; at the sides.

     Foundering. To sink, or to plunge downwardly.

     Gangue. The dross matter in ore.

     Gallopade. A brisk German dance in rapid measure.

     Geologist. One who studies the structure of the earth.

     Genial. A pleasant disposition.

     Gravity. The attraction of mass for mass.

     Guttural. A sound issuing forth from the lower part of the
               throat.

     Guardian. An individual appointed to care for the person of a
               minor.

     Harassment. To cause difficulties, troubles or worries.

     Hemisphere. One half of a globe.

     Heralded. To advertise; to notify; to inform.

     Hornpipe. A very lively English country dance for one person.

     Horizontal. A line at right angles to the center of the earth.
                 The surface of water is horizontal.

     Hoodoos. Coined from the cry "hoo" of a child, and the Scotch
              word "doo," meaning the cry of the dove. The general meaning
              now being low characters.

     Hypnotism. That quality which enables certain persons from
                influencing others by some power of the mind.

     Impervious. Of such a character that water will not go through.

     Imbued. To instill in; to convince.

     Impenetrable. So that it cannot be passed through or into.

     Intricate. Not easily solved. Difficult to understand.

     Installed. Set up; put into order. Built up.

     Interpreted. Made plain. To decipher a foreign tongue.

     Inevitable. Bound to come to pass; the natural course of events.

     Incessant. Continually; without stopping.

     Indescribable. Difficult to explain or set forth.

     Inflamed. To become heated; usually applied to a wound in the
               process of healing.

     Intuition. The condition of the mind where conditions are easily
                understood without explanations.

     Inaction. Not active; not disposed to take part.

     Integral. The principal element. A part of. Constituting a
               completed whole.

     Impetuosity. Being prompt; quick.

     Iodide. A compound or salt in which iodine is used.

     Jungle fever. A malarial or intermittent fever, well known in
                   Africa and India.

     Jig. A light gay dance with a very lively music.

     Lashed. Beaten with a whip.

     Loathsome. Exciting extreme aversion or disgust.

     Matured. Complete in the mind; a perfect plant, flower, fruit.

     Magnitude. Largeness; immensity.

     Mazurka. A lively round dance resembling the polka, intended for
              four or eight couples, based on the Polish national dance.

     Merge. To assimilate; to go into; to come together.

     Mechanically. Done with precision; partaking of mechanism.

     Metallurgical. Pertaining to the study of minerals.

     Minuet. A stately dance in triple measure, dating from the 17th
             century.

     Mimicry. To imitate in a comical way.

     Morose. Not a happy or bright disposition.

     Monotonous. Without change; in one tone; a continual similarity.

     Momentarily. For the instant; immediately.

     Monsoon. A terrible wind that blows in the southern hemisphere at
              regular intervals.

     Negative. No; the opposite of yes; not decisive.

     Nitrate. A salt of nitric acid.

     Nonchalant. A state of mind indicating lack of interest.

     Nonplussed. Confused or disconcerted.

     Numerically. Considered from the standpoint of numbers.

     Nutritious. Anything that has the quality of sustaining life, as
                 a food.

     Obeisance. An act of courtesy.

     Obliterate. To wipe out; to destroy.

     Orgy. Wild or wanton revelry.

     Ostentatiously. Open; to be readily seen.

     Quadrille. A square dance for four couples, dating from the 18th
                century.

     Quarantine. A system of police and medical regulations,
                 established at frontiers and ports.

     Pathetic. Arousing tender emotions.

     Parallelogram. A figure longer than its width, with the two
                    opposite sides parallel with each other.

     Petrified. Turned into stone, literally; seemingly rigid.

     Ostentatiously. Having the appearance of doing certain things.

     Perturbations. Disturbances. Worried.

     Perchance. By the way; a chance happening.

     Piracy. On the high seas an act of robbery, or unlawful taking of
             goods.

     Physics. The science of energy. That which treats of the
              phenomena of all matter.

     Posture. Position; condition.

     Portentous. Important; making a show; greater than ordinary.

     Propounded. An offer; a question.

     Proficient. Ability; well equipped.

     Precipitated. Thrown down; settlings; coming from above.

     Primitive. The first; original way of doing a thing.

     Prolific. Many; a great variety.

     Providential. Very fortunate; a happening of great value or
                   importance at the right time.

     Protestations. To assert earnestly.

     Precipitous. Quick action; doing without waiting.

     Predisposed. Having the desire beforehand; a set opinion.

     Precautionary. Acting slowly and wisely; taking advantage of
                    something ahead of the time to act.

     Psychological. Pertaining to the science of the human soul and
                    its operations.

     Ramie. A fibrous plant, used in making fabrics of various kinds.

     Rankling. A feeling of resentment.

     Secluded. Hidden; carefully kept out of sight.

     Shrouds. One of the stout ropes, often made of wire, that are
              stretched from the mast-head of a vessel to the sides or to
              the rims of a top, serving as a means of ascent and as
              lateral stays for the mast.

     Spasmodic. Not regular; in fits.

     Sortie. A term applied to rushing tactics in battle.

     Spectrum. The term applied to the scientific division of the
               light rays projected from an object.

     Stoically. A brave exhibition during pain, or when unfortunate;
                bearing up bravely.

     Strenuous. Vigorous; working diligently.

     Stipulate. Making an arrangement; a contract, or parts of an
                agreement.

     Stupefied. Rendered dumb or speechless for a time.

     Stanchion. A standard, post, or other upright.

     Sulphate. A metal having sulphur as its principal element in
               combination.

     Superficially. On the surface; not well considered.

     Tarantella. A lively Neapolitan dance in triplets for one couple.

     Tension. Stretched; a mind under stress.

     Tendon. The strong band or cord of connective tissue forming the
             connections of the fleshy portions of the muscle.

     Temporary. For the time being only; for a little while.

     Terminated. Ended; the stopping of a certain thing.

     Tenacity. Strong; fixed in purpose.

     Theodolite. A portable instrument for measuring horizontal and
                 vertical lines. It comprises a telescope and a graduated
                 circle, showing degrees.

     Toggle. A pin or short rod, properly attached in the middle as
             to a chain or rope, and designed to hold something by being
             passed through a hole or eye.

     Traversed. Gone over; traveled over that area.

     Transit. Passed; going by.

     Trophy. Something captured; usually applied to spoils in war.

     Tribute. A compliment; a reward.

     Tributary. Something which applies as a smaller to a greater; as
                a small stream which flows into a greater.

     Veered. Changed in direction; going aside.

     Vindictive. Bitter; hostile; with a desire for revenge.

     Volatilized. Changed from a solid into a gas.





THE "HOW-TO-DO-IT" BOOKS


CARPENTRY FOR BOYS

A book which treats, in a most practical and fascinating manner all
subjects pertaining to the "King of Trades"; showing the care and use of
tools; drawing; designing, and the laying out of work; the principles
involved in the building of various kinds of structures, and the
rudiments of architecture. It contains over two hundred and fifty
illustrations made especially for this work, and includes also a
complete glossary of the technical terms used in the art. The most
comprehensive volume on this subject ever published for boys.


ELECTRICITY FOR BOYS

The author has adopted the unique plan of setting forth the fundamental
principles in each phase of the science, and practically applying the
work in the successive stages. It shows how the knowledge has been
developed, and the reasons for the various phenomena, without using
technical words so as to bring it within the compass of every boy. It
has a complete glossary of terms, and is illustrated with two hundred
original drawings.


PRACTICAL MECHANICS FOR BOYS

This book takes the beginner through a comprehensive series of practical
shop work, in which the uses of tools, and the structure and handling of
shop machinery are set forth; how they are utilized to perform the work,
and the manner in which all dimensional work is carried out. Every
subject is illustrated, and model building explained. It contains a
glossary which comprises a new system of cross references, a feature
that will prove a welcome departure in explaining subjects. Fully
illustrated.


             _Price 60 cents per volume_

              THE NEW YORK BOOK COMPANY
             147 FOURTH AVENUE  NEW YORK




THE HICKORY RIDGE BOY SCOUTS


A SERIES OF BOOKS FOR BOYS

Which, in addition to the interesting boy scout stories by CAPTAIN ALAN
 DOUGLAS, Scoutmaster, contain articles on nature lore, native animals
     and a fund of other information pertaining to out-of-door life,
            that will appeal to the boy's love of the open

I. THE CAMPFIRES OF THE WOLF PATROL

Their first camping experience affords the scouts splendid opportunities
to use their recently acquired knowledge in a practical way. Elmer
Chenoweth, a lad from the northwest woods, astonishes everyone by his
familiarity with camp life. A clean, wholesome story every boy should
read.

II. WOODCRAFT; OR, HOW A PATROL LEADER MADE GOOD

This tale presents many stirring situations in which some of the boys
are called upon to exercise all their ingenuity and unselfishness. A
story filled with healthful excitement.

III. PATHFINDER; OR, THE MISSING TENDERFOOT

Some mysteries are cleared up in a most unexpected way, greatly to the
credit of our young friends. A variety of incidents follow fast, one
after the other.

IV. FAST NINE; OR, A CHALLENGE FROM FAIRFIELD

They show the same team-work here as when in camp. The description of
the final game with the team of a rival town, and the outcome thereof,
form a stirring narrative. One of the best baseball stories of recent
years.

V. GREAT HIKE; OR, THE PRIDE OF THE KHAKI TROOP

After weeks of preparation the scouts start out on their greatest
undertaking. Their march takes them far from home, and the good-natured
rivalry of the different patrols furnishes many interesting and amusing
situations.

VI. ENDURANCE TEST; OR, HOW CLEAR GRIT WON THE DAY

Few stories "get" us more than illustrations of pluck in the face of
apparent failure. Our heroes show the stuff they are made of and
surprise their most ardent admirers. One of the best stories Captain
Douglas has written.


BOY SCOUT NATURE LORE TO BE FOUND IN THE HICKORY RIDGE BOY SCOUT SERIES

Wild Animals of the United States--Tracking--in Number I.

Trees and Wild Flowers of the United States in Number II.

Reptiles of the United States in Number III.

Fishes of the United States in Number IV.

Insects of the United States in Number V.

Birds of the United States in Number VI.


_Cloth Binding  Cover Illustrations in Four Colors  40c. Per Volume_

              THE NEW YORK BOOK COMPANY
    147 FOURTH AVENUE (near 14th St.) NEW YORK




THE Campfire and Trail Series


1. In Camp on the Big Sunflower.

2. The Rivals of the Trail.

3. The Strange Cabin on Catamount Island.

4. Lost in the Great Dismal Swamp.

5. With Trapper Jim in the North Woods.

6. Caught in a Forest Fire.

By LAWRENCE J. LESLIE


A series of wholesome stories for boys told in an interesting way and
appealing to their love of the open.

   _Each, 12mo.  Cloth.  40 cents per volume_

              THE NEW YORK BOOK COMPANY
                 147 FOURTH AVENUE
                     NEW YORK




Christy Mathewson's Book

[Illustration]

_A Ripping Good Baseball Story by One Who Knows the Game_

This book has attained a larger sale than any baseball story ever
published.

The narrative deals with the students of a large university and their
baseball team, the members of which have names which enable the reader
to recognize them as some of the foremost baseball stars of the day
before their entrance into the major leagues.

One gains a very clear idea of "inside baseball" stripped of wearisome
technicalities. The book is profusely illustrated throughout and
contains also a number of plates showing the manner in which Mathewson
throws his deceptive curves, together with brief description of each.

_Cloth bound 5-1/2 x 7-5/8     Price 50c. per volume_

              THE NEW YORK BOOK COMPANY
             147 FOURTH AVENUE  NEW YORK


       *       *       *       *       *




TRANSCRIBER'S NOTES:

Obvious printing errors, both spelling and punctuation, were repaired.
Errors and notes other than punctuation are noted here.

Chapter VII    Original text: would would
               Correction: which would

Chapter XI     Original text: chapparal
               No correction: spelling retained.

Glossary       Collation order in glossary is not fully alphabetized
               No correction: original collation order in glossary
               retained.





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Wonder Island Boys:  The Tribesmen, by 
Roger Finlay

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK WONDER ISLAND BOYS ***

***** This file should be named 20753.txt or 20753.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/0/7/5/20753/

Produced by Joe Longo and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
